COAL  GASIFICATION  TECHNOLOGIES  AND  THE 

NEED  FOR  LARGE  SCALE  PROJECTS 

S.  HRG.  110–1130 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, AND 

INNOVATION 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

APRIL  9,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

74–322 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE,  TECHNOLOGY,  AND  INNOVATION 

JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts,  Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 9, 2008  ................................................................................
Statement of Senator Ensign  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

nology Policy, Executive Office of the President 

Childress, James M., Executive Director, Gasification Technologies Council  ....
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hawkins,  David  G.,  Director,  Climate  Center,  Natural  Resources  Defense 
Council  ..................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Marburger  III,  Ph.D.,  Hon.  John  H.,  Director,  Office  of  Science  and  Tech-
...............................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Mudd, Michael J., CEO, FutureGen Alliance, Inc.  ...............................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Novak,  John,  Executive  Director,  Federal  and  Industry  Activities,  Environ-
ment and Generation, Electric Power Research Institute  ................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Strakey,  Jr.,  Dr.  Joseph  P.,  Chief  Technology  Officer,  National  Energy  Tech-
nology Laboratory, U.S. Department of Energy  ................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. John F. Kerry to Dr. Joseph 
......................................................................................................
...................

Stevens, Hon. Ted, U.S. Senator from Alaska, prepared statement 

P. Strakey, Jr. 

Page 
1 
3 
4 
1 

13 
15 

35 
37 

6 
8 
30 
31 

45 
46 

24 
26 

81 
81 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

COAL  GASIFICATION  TECHNOLOGIES  AND 
THE  NEED  FOR  LARGE  SCALE  PROJECTS 

WEDNESDAY,  APRIL  9,  2008 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, AND INNOVATION, 
COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:39  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. John F. Kerry, Chair-
man of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator  KERRY.  The  hearing  will  come  to  order.  Thank  you  very 
much.  I  apologize  to  all  for  being  delayed.  Even  though  not  very 
much  is  going  on  here,  too  much  is  going  on  here,  if  you  get  my 
drift. So I apologize for not being able to open this on time. 

Thank  you  very,  very  much  for  joining  us  today  to  discuss  the 
Federal  Government’s  role  in  the  deployment  and  development  of 
carbon  capture  technology  at  coal-fired  power  plants.  I’ve  repeated 
this many times, but I think at each hearing it’s important to state 
clearly the urgent challenge that faces our country and, indeed, the 
planet, with respect to the issue of global climate change. 

We all know that last year the Nobel Prize-winning Intergovern-
mental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  found  that  nations  of  the  world 
have  to  reduce  their  greenhouse  gas  emissions  somewhere  in  the 
range  of  50  to  80  percent  by  mid-century  in  order  to  avert  dan-
gerous impacts of climate change. 

I  don’t  know  how  many  of  you  have  seen  what,  I  think  National 
Geographic produced, and probably Dow Chemical underwrote, the 
‘‘Six  Degrees’’  film,  which  was  on  television  recently,  which  was  a 
very  stark  and,  I  thought,  authoritative  analysis  of  the  various 
computer models, the science, and what that science tells us, what 
with each degree of warming we may or may not face. I can assure 
you  if  you  haven’t  seen  it,  it’s  worth  the  time  because  it  really  de-
picts,  in  no  uncertain  terms,  what  options  are  staring  us  in  the 
face, in the absence of adequate response to climate change. 

What  is  interesting  is,  that  every  time  you  sit  down  with  sci-
entists,  I  try  to  make  a  point  of  doing  a  fairly  regular  update  and 
briefing, and that these are not the alarmist type. I think scientists 
by definition are conservative people. Because to be a qualified, ca-
pable  scientist,  you  have  to  have  a  pedagogy  and  a  protocol,  and 
follow  it  pretty  strictly,  and  subject  your  analyses  to  peer  review. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

And what is interesting, as Al Gore pointed out in his An Incon-
venient Truth, the reality is that the evidence is coming back much 
faster  in  a  compounding  way.  Scientific  studies  now  on  the  table 
indicate that our task may be even more challenging then they all 
laid  out  only  a  year  ago,  with  findings  for  which  they  won  the 
Nobel  Prize.  The  point  I  wanted  to  make  about  Al  Gore  is  that  I 
think  there  were  650  or  900,  I  can’t  recall  the  exact  figure,  peer- 
reviewed studies, all affirming our contribution to the problem and 
all affirming the man-made input. 

It’s  really  important  to  understand  that  for  all  of  the  doubters, 
and  for  all  of  the  people  who  throw  out  sun  spots  and  other  kinds 
of theories, each of those has been disposed of within the scientific 
community.  There  is  no  peer-reviewed  study  whatsoever  that  tells 
us  that  a  factor  other  than  human  beings’  activities  are  creating 
climate  change,  or  what  is  creating  it.  That’s  a  twofold  test.  If 
you’re going to doubt, you’ve got to show what’s doing this, because 
everybody acknowledges it’s warming. And nobody can. 

What’s  alarming  to  me  is  that  about  3  or  4  weeks  ago,  we  re-
ceived evidence that the world may need to eliminate carbon emis-
sions  altogether,  within  a  matter  of  decades.  Zero  emissions.  This 
science  shows  that  coal  combustion  is  the  largest,  or  one  of  the 
largest contributors to global climate change. 

So, we need to find a way, obviously, coal isn’t going to go away, 
we  all  understand  that.  We  know  the  reserves,  we  know  the  num-
bers  on  China,  India,  ourselves,  South  Korea,  et  cetera,  so  coal  is 
not  going  away.  It’s  cheap  and  it’s  abundant,  and  here  in  America 
we  have  enormous  reserves,  which  people  want  to  be  able  to  use. 
In China, we know, on average they’re building about one pulver-
ized coal-fired power plant per week. And that coal accounts for 80 
percent  of  their  CO2 emissions.  No  matter  what  happens,  with  re-
spect to all the efforts to reduce, China is going to equal the United 
States and surpass it in emissions within the next 10 years. 

So,  China,  I  say  this  clearly  to  China  and  to  others  listening, 
China cannot consider itself a simple, old, out of annex one, devel-
oping country any more. It’s going to have to come into the fold and 
help  to  be  a  leader,  together  with  India  and  other  near-developed 
countries. Near-developed is at a level now that is compelling, with 
respect to the responsibility we all have to assume. 

My staff was just over at the meetings in Bangkok and I was in 
Bali, and under the terminology where we have to find common but 
differentiated  responsibilities.  It’s  a  critical  issue  the  threading  of 
this needle will depend on what life we give to the definition of dif-
ferentiated,  as  well  as  common.  The  common  we’ll  be  able  to  iden-
tify,  the  differentiated  we’re  going  to  have  to  struggle  with  a  little 
bit. 

That’s why it’s critical. This hearing is important and it’s critical 
that  we  develop  carbon  capture  and  storage  technology.  As  rec-
ommended  last  year  in  a  seminal  report  by  the  Massachusetts  In-
stitute of Technology, that can enable us to capture emissions from 
power  plants  and  other  industrial  facilities,  and  permanently  bury 
them  in  deep  saline  aquifers  and  other  geological  formations.  Two 
recent  reports  identified  carbon  capture  and  storage  as  the  most 
promising  area  for  emissions  reductions  in  the  electric  power  sec-
tor. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

A  December  2000  McKinsey  study  determined  that  by  2030,  9 
percent  of  electricity  could  come  from  coal  plants  equipped  with 
CCS. The Electric Power Research Institute, which is testifying be-
fore  the  Committee  today,  estimated  the  number  at  15  percent. 
These  studies  demonstrate  the  tremendous  potential  for  the  appli-
cation  of  CCS.  Our  government  ought  to  be  making  a  significant 
commitment to advancing this technology. 

Nevertheless,  in  late  January,  the  Department  of  Energy  an-
nounced that it was cancelling FutureGen, the premier program for 
developing  coal-fired  power  plants  with  CCS  technology.  The  an-
nouncement  brought  an  end  to  a  program  started  4  years  ago  and 
described, at that time, as ‘‘one of the boldest steps our Nation has 
taken toward a pollution-free energy future.’’ 

So today’s hearing will give us the opportunity to explore the rea-
sons  for  the  cancellation  of  the  program,  the  implications  of  that 
decision, and how, if there are not serious implications, we’re going 
to  make  up  for  that,  whatever  they  are,  by  accelerating  the  devel-
opment and deployment of CCS technology in this country. 

Many  of  us  in  the  Congress  are  working  very  hard  to  promote 
this.  The  energy  bill  that  passed  last  summer  was  a  start.  It  in-
cluded  key  provisions  to  inventory  the  country’s  sequestration  ca-
pacity  and  conduct  a  Central  Demonstration  Project.  Separately, 
I’ve  introduced  legislation  with  Senator  Stevens,  the  Ranking 
Member of this Committee, called the Carbon Capture and Storage 
Technology  Act  of  2007,  which  would  establish  three  to  five  com-
mercial-scale  sequestration  facilities  and  three  to  five  coal-fired 
demonstration plants with carbon capture. 

We’ve kept hearing from the industrial sector of our country, in-
deed  from  the  private  sector  that  the  big  gap  is  the  lack  of  any 
commercial-scale enterprise. So we don’t know exactly what this is 
going  to  take,  what  the  feasibility  is,  or  what  the  cost  is  going  to 
be in the end. 

It’s  on  this  that  we  really  want  to  focus  today.  We  want  to  look 
to the testimony of this expert panel of witnesses and focus on the 
role  of  commercial-scale  CCS  projects,  and  the  best  way  for  us  to 
advance  the  development  and  deployment  of  this  essential  tech-
nology.  And,  I  very  much  look  forward  to  exploring  that  with  you, 
and I thank you all for taking the time to come here. 

Senator Ensign? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN ENSIGN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEVADA 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  think  these  hear-
ings  are  very  important  hearings.  We  all  know  that  the  reserves 
of coal that we have in the United States will continue to be a big 
part  of  our  energy  supply.  People  have  talked  about  nuclear,  and 
we know that we don’t have a lot of nuclear expertise in this coun-
try  today.  Further,  even  if  we  wanted  to  build  nuclear  power 
plants,  building  them  would  take  time,  and  we  just  don’t  have  the 
capacity to build very many of them. 

The electricity needs of this country are growing faster than can 
be met. I am a strong supporter of alternative technologies. I would 
ask  consent,  by  the  way,  that  my  full  statement  be  made  part  of 
the record. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

[The prepared statement of Senator Ensign follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN ENSIGN, U.S. SENATOR FROM NEVADA 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  like  to  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  today  on  ‘‘Coal 

Gasification Technologies and the Need for Large Scale Projects.’’ 

It is widely recognized that continued reliance on Middle East oil is neither smart 
energy policy nor smart security policy. In order to meet the rapidly growing energy 
needs of this country, we must develop the resources that are available domestically. 
This cannot be done using only one fuel or one technology. It must be done by using 
all of the resources at our disposal, including coal. As an effort to break the partisan 
gridlock,  I  introduced  a  broadly  bipartisan  bill  with  Senator  Cantwell  last  week  to 
encourage the continued development of renewable energy. 

Coal  is  both  abundant  and  inexpensive.  In  the  United  States  alone,  coal-fired 
power plants satisfy more than half of the Nation’s energy needs, and this percent-
age is likely to increase in the future. 

The key is to ensure that we are employing this resource in the most efficient and 
environmentally  responsible  manner  possible.  New  technologies  to  make  this  pos-
sible  are  on  the  horizon.  Carbon  capture,  sequestration,  and  IGCC  technology  are 
just  a  few  of  many  processes  already  in  development.  Groundbreaking  research  is 
being conducted to develop ways to burn coal in order to maximize energy yield and 
employ cleaner and more efficient processes. 

As most of us are aware, the FutureGen project was designed to demonstrate the 
feasibility  of  these  new  technologies  by  constructing  a  state-of-the-art,  zero-emis-
sions  power  plant.  In  January  of  this  year,  the  Department  of  Energy  announced 
that it was restructuring the FutureGen program. It’s being restructured from a sin-
gle  demonstration  project  of  integrated  technologies  to  a  new  strategy  of  multiple 
commercial  demonstration  projects.  While  many  consider  this  a  setback,  I  believe 
that the idea of FutureGen can still be realized. 

Nevada is a prime example of a state dedicated to doing its part to meet our grow-
ing energy needs and has been a national leader in generating clean energy. Nevada 
is committed to keeping its energy supply diverse and is planning to advance state- 
of-the-art,  environmentally  compliant,  clean-coal  technologies  at  the  Ely  Energy 
Center. 

The Ely Energy Center is a 2,500 Megawatt complex that will incorporate the best 
available  emission  reduction  technology  today,  yet  provide  flexibility  for  CO2 re-
moval in the future. The first two coal units will use ultra super-critical pulverized 
coal  technology.  This  process  uses  a  boiler  design  that  produces  high  temperatures 
and pressures to improve the energy conversion efficiency. This increased efficiency 
results in the use of less coal per kilowatt-hour produced, which means lower emis-
sions. In addition to the ultra super-critical boilers, the Ely Energy Center is using 
a  water-efficient  hybrid  cooling  method,  reducing  water  use  by  50  percent.  Finally, 
the  plant  will  be  constructed  to  be  carbon  capture  ready  by  setting  aside  sufficient 
real  estate  within  the  plant  layout  to  accommodate  capture  equipment,  once  it  be-
comes technically feasible and commercially available. 

The remainder of the Ely Energy Center will be IGCC. The process of Integrated- 
Gas-Combined-Cycle creates a gas out of the coal that may have properties that will 
make the CO2 capture easier. 

In Nevada, we believe that technological advancements in carbon capture and se-
questration technologies are essential to our energy future. Sierra Pacific Resources, 
EPRI,  and  several  other  utilities  are  co-sponsoring  an  innovative  project  that  dem-
onstrates  a  new  technology  to  separate  and  capture  carbon  dioxide  emissions  from 
a coal-fueled power plant in Wisconsin. This technology is being tested to see wheth-
er  it  can  be  scaled  up  to  work  on  larger  facilities.  We  hope  the  Ely  Energy  Center 
will become home to the 3rd generation of CCS demonstration projects as EPRI con-
tinues to test such technologies. 

While  I  believe  it  is  vital  to  explore  several  energy  sources  in  order  to  meet  our 
growing  energy  needs,  I  also  recognize  that  there  will  be  times  when  the  wind  is 
not blowing and the sun is not shining. Coal will continue to provide the energy nec-
essary to keep America going. We must develop the technology that allows us to uti-
lize  this  abundant  natural  resource  in  a  manner  that  is  cleaner  and  friendlier  to 
our environment. 

I look forward to hearing from the witnesses. 

Senator KERRY. Without objection, it will be. 
Senator  ENSIGN.  Currently,  Senator  Cantwell  and  I  have  an  al-
ternative  energy  bill  on  the  floor  of  the  Senate  that  will  be  voted 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

on later today. I strongly believe in alternative energies and believe 
that they need to be a big part of our future. 

The fact is, however, that you cannot build enough solar, enough 
geothermal,  enough  wind,  etc.  to  offset  our  reliance  on  fossil  fuels. 
Technologies may continue to develop in the future, but right now, 
with  our  current  technologies,  we  certainly  cannot  come  close  to 
meeting  the  growth,  let  alone  replacing  the  greenhouse  gas-pro-
ducing emission plants that we have today. 

I think it’s very important that we come together and discuss the 
concerns  about  our  Nation’s  energy  security,  on  pumping  a  lot  of 
money  into  countries  that  don’t  necessarily  like  us,  and  combine 
those with economic concerns, and environmental concerns. 

In  my  state,  to  describe  it  simply,  we  have  more  renewable  en-
ergy sources per capita than any other location in the country. The 
sun  shines  more  than  it  does  in  any  other  state.  We  have  several 
areas where we’ll be able to take advantage of the wind. In eastern 
and  parts  of  northern  Nevada  we  have  some  of  the  largest  geo-
thermal  ‘‘reserves’’  in  the  United  States.  Northern  Nevada,  can  be 
powered just with geothermal. 

These technologies, however, are so expensive by themselves that 
they  cannot  justify  building  the  transmission  lines.  Currently,  we 
are trying to build a coal-fired power plant in eastern Nevada. This 
plant  would  allow  our  state  to  be  able  to  provide  alternative,  re-
newable  technology  throughout  the  State,  and  justify  the  cost  of 
the transmission lines. 

This  is  just  one  example  why  a  coal  plant  is  still  important. 
First,  this  will  be  a  new  coal  plant.  We  will  shut  down  two  older 
coal  plants  that  are  a  lot  less  efficient  and  a  lot  dirtier.  This  will 
bring  more  renewable  energies  that  are  good  for  the  environment, 
onboard. 

One of the reasons I think it’s important for holding this hearing 
is,  to  discuss  the  FutureGen  plant  closure.  There  are  different 
types  of  coal  in  different  parts  of  the  country,  and  there  are  dif-
ferent  geological  environments  that  we  need  to  study.  I  am  not 
sure  that  this  isn’t  the  best  strategy  to  find  a  few  different  sites 
to  study  the  technology  for  not  only  capturing  the  carbon,  but 
where  to  and  how  to  sequester  the  carbon  in  an  environmentally 
safe  way.  Further,  I  believe  that  we  should  study  this,  so  that  we 
can make this as commercially viable in the future as possible. 

I have talked to Secretary Bodman about the Ely Energy Center, 
which  will  be  the  coal-fired  plant  that  I  mentioned.  It’s  a  1,500- 
megawatt  plant  that  could  compete  for  one  of  these  sites  that  the 
Department of Energy is talking about. Ely is a suitable site to test 
carbon capture and sequestration technologies. 

I think that there is a bright future if we continue to invest. This 
really  is  an  investment  in  the  future  of  America,  the  future  of 
America’s  energy  needs,  the  future  of  America’s  economy,  and  the 
future  of  America’s  environment.  All  of  these  together  must  be  ex-
amined.  I  think  this  is  a  very,  very  important  hearing,  and  I  hope 
that we can continue to discuss this topic in the future. 

Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Ensign.  And  I’m 
delighted  to  have  you  as  a  Ranking  Member  and  as  a  partner  in 
this  effort.  I  think,  it’s  obviously  bipartisan  and  we  need  just  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

find  the  most  common  sense  approaches.  I’m  delighted  to  work 
with you on it, as well as on many other things. I appreciate it. 

Dr.  Marburger,  thank  you  for  coming  up  here  again,  you’re  get-
ting to be a regular, but we enjoy that, and we’re glad to have your 
expertise here today. 

Let me just run through everybody. We’ve got Dr. Marburger, the 
Director  of  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy,  Executive  Of-
fice  of  the  President;  Mr.  James  Childress,  the  Executive  Director 
of  Gasification  Technologies  Council;  Dr.  Joseph  Strakey,  Chief 
Technology  Officer,  U.S.  Department  of  Energy,  National  Energy 
Technology  Laboratory;  Michael  Mudd,  the  Chief  Executive  Officer 
of  FutureGen  Alliance;  David  Hawkins,  Director  of  the  Climate 
Center, Natural Resources Defense Council, and John Novak, Exec-
utive  Director  of  Federal  and  Industry  Activities  for  Environment 
and  Generation,  of  the  Electric  Power  Research  Institute.  Thank 
you all for being here. 

Dr.  Marburger,  would  you  lead  off  and  we’ll  just  run  right  down 

the line. We look forward to a good discussion. 

Let  me  just  remind  everybody,  I  know  you’ve  all  testified  and 
you’re  old  pros  at  this,  but  all  of  your  testimony  will  be  placed  in 
the  record  in  full.  If  you  can  sort  of,  draw  it  into  some  kind  of  a 
summary in 5 minutes, that would be great. Thanks. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN H. MARBURGER III, PH.D., 

DIRECTOR, OFFICE OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY POLICY, 

EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE PRESIDENT 

Dr.  MARBURGER.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Kerry,  and  Ranking 
Member Ensign. I am pleased to be here to respond to your invita-
tion  to  talk  about  the  Administration’s  technology  initiatives  to 
mitigate climate change. There’s a lot in my written testimony and 
I refer you to that for filling this out. You asked me to give an over-
view and I’ll just give a very brief summary in these oral remarks. 
It’s  true  that  anthropogenic  contributions  to  climate  change  are 
caused  mostly  by  burning  fossil  fuels  to  produce  energy,  and  coal 
is  the  cheapest,  most  abundant  fossil  fuel.  Coal  is  a  primary  fuel 
for electrical power in China, which is annually adding power-gen-
erating capacity equal to that of the entire country of France. 

Coal and natural gas together account for about 70 percent of the 
world’s  electric  power  production,  and  their  emissions  account  for 
a similarly large percentage of greenhouse gas emissions. And most 
of  the  remainder  comes  from  the  use  of  petroleum,  mainly  for 
transportation. 

So, strategies for substantially reducing the human production of 
greenhouse  gases  ultimately  become  strategies  for  producing  en-
ergy  in  a  way  that  does  not  release  CO2 into  the  atmosphere,  and 
this is a problem of technology. 

As  my  written  testimony  makes  clear,  this  is  a  very  difficult 
problem  because  energy  is  the  foundation  of  national  economies, 
and  there  is  a  strong  incentive  to  use  the  least  expensive  means 
for  producing  it.  Some  existing  energy  technologies  produce  zero 
net  carbon  emissions,  but  of  these,  only  nuclear  power  can  be 
scaled  up  to  the  magnitudes  necessary  to  meet  the  vast  energy 
needs  of  large  economies.  Wind  and  solar  are  intermittent  sources 
that  will  require  conventional  stand-by  power  until  new  energy 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

storage technologies become available. Other sources, such as tidal 
or geothermal, can address only a fraction of the need. 

The progress of nuclear power is inhibited by thorny issues of nu-
clear  proliferation  and  spent-fuel  management.  Biomass  is  an  at-
tractive energy source because it simply recycles carbon already in 
the  atmosphere,  rather  than  adding  to  it,  but  it,  too,  is  difficult  to 
scale  up  to  the  necessary  magnitude,  even  with  enhanced  tech-
nologies for extracting energy from more of its substance. 

This  overview  suggests  many  opportunities  for  new  or  improved 
technologies,  and  a  vigorous  policy  for  addressing  greenhouse  gas 
emissions  should  address  all  of  them.  In  no  case,  however,  are  ex-
isting  technologies  available  at  the  necessary  low  price  or  scale— 
or  large  scale—to  permit  large-scale  transitions  to  lower  zero-car-
bon energy production in the near future. 

The alternatives to new zero-carbon sources of energy production 
are to use less energy in the first place, and to remove carbon pro-
duced  by  existing  fossil  fuel  energy  technologies.  Energy  conserva-
tion  is  important  in  any  case  and  should  be  pursued,  but  it  can 
only  be  part  of  the  solution.  In  the  transportation  sector,  low-car-
bon  fuels  can  have  a  great  impact.  For  stationary  power  plants, 
capturing the carbon during the production cycle and storing it un-
derground seems to be feasible, but efficient large-scale carbon cap-
ture  technology  has  not  been  proven  and  the  stability  of  under-
ground storage arrangements has not yet been confirmed. 

So  this  overview  suggests  a  long  list  of  technology  opportunities 
that  need  to  be  pursued  across  the  spectrum,  from  basic  research 
to  the  development  of  new  energy  systems.  And  this  Administra-
tion has launched initiatives for every item on the list. 

My  written  testimony  gives  more  detail,  but  the  titles  of  these 
initiatives are familiar to many. Freedom Car, for example, is a hy-
drogen  fuel  initiative.  Advanced  Energy  Initiative,  FutureGen,  the 
20-in-10 Plan, the Coal Research Initiative, and so on. This country 
has  a  proud  record  of  investing  in  technologies  that  can  help  us 
with these problems. 

These  initiatives  are  funded  largely  through  the  Department  of 
Energy,  and  the  Department  of  Energy  is  the  lead  agency  for  the 
President’s  Climate  Change  Technology  Program  announced  in 
2001,  and  including  a  dozen  participating  agencies.  Their  strategic 
plan,  which  is  located  on  the  program’s  website,  which  is  included 
in my written testimony, contains much more detail. 

In  view  of  the  continuing  importance  of  coal  for  the  world’s  en-
ergy  supply,  clean  coal  initiatives  are  particularly  important,  not 
only  for  the  U.S.,  but  also  for  many  other  large  economies  around 
the  world,  including  the  large  Asian  countries.  The  President  has 
request  three-quarters  of  a  billion  dollars  for  fossil  fuel  energy  re-
search  development  and  demonstration  in  Fiscal  Year  2009,  fo-
cused almost exclusively on coal. 

Funding for the Coal Research Initiative, the CRI, has grown by 
87  percent  over  the  past  3  years,  and  the  research,  development, 
and  demonstration  activities  within  this  initiative  are  now  almost 
entirely  focused  on  carbon  capture  and  storage  technologies.  The 
funding request for these technologies is more than triple the 2001 
amount. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

The Coal Research Initiative, which includes the FutureGen Pro-
gram and Clean Coal Power Initiative, seeks to reduce the cost and 
demonstrate the commercial feasibility of coal gasification and CCS 
technologies. The CRI funds a full range of R&D activity, including 
applied  research,  advanced  technology  development,  pilot-scale 
testing, public and stakeholder outreach, and large-demonstrations 
in  partnership  with  industry.  Funding  requested  for  this  program 
is $588 million in the 2009 budget, up 20 percent—27 percent year 
to  year—with  the  FutureGen  program  more  than  doubling  to  $156 
million. 

Specific  activities  under  the  CRI,  include  carbon  sequestration 
research  and  demonstrations,  as  well  as  R&D  on  advanced  tur-
bines,  advanced  gasifiers,  and  other  IGCC  technologies,  such  as 
those for gas cleaning, conditioning and separation. 

This Administration is strongly committed to enabling cost-effec-
tive coal-based power generation, with near-zero atmospheric emis-
sions.  Coal  gasification,  and  the  associated  carbon  capture  and  se-
questration  technologies  are  an  essential  part  of  our  global  vision 
for a low-carbon future. 

Mr.  Chairman,  you  have  many  experts  on  this  panel,  and  I  will 
defer  technical  questions  to  them,  but  we’re  proud  of  the  capabili-
ties that have been brought to bear on this problem. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Marburger follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN H. MARBURGER III, PH.D., DIRECTOR, OFFICE 

OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY POLICY, EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE PRESIDENT 

Chairman  Kerry,  Ranking  Member  Ensign,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I 
am  pleased  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  ‘‘Coal  Gasification  Technologies 
and  the  Need  for  Large  Scale  Projects.’’  My  remarks  will  focus  on  some  contextual 
factors  that  make  coal  gasification  technologies  particularly  relevant  to  our  climate 
strategy. 

Fossil fuel energy production is the primary factor in the dramatic increase of at-
mospheric  CO2 since  the  beginning  of  the  industrial  revolution.  A  basic  under-
standing  of  the  science  of  climate  change  would  suggest  that  in  the  short  run,  we 
should seek to produce fewer greenhouse gases and increase absorption of those al-
ready  in  the  atmosphere.  In  the  long  run,  we  should  aim  to  limit  releases  to  an 
amount  much  smaller  than  current  values.  And  we  should  get  on  this  path  imme-
diately,  because  Earth’s  heat  balance  is  already  tilted  and  some  effects  of  massive 
CO2 production  are  already  evident.  As  you  know,  since  2001,  the  Administration 
has  taken  many  actions  to  confront  this  challenge,  and  we  are  continuing  to  make 
progress both domestically and internationally. 

As  we  contemplate  these  actions,  however,  here  are  some  numbers  to  keep  in 
mind.  The  U.S.  consumes  more  than  20  million  barrels  of  oil  per  day,  60  billion 
cubic  feet  of  natural  gas  per  day,  and  3  million  tons  of  coal  per  day.  This  is  about 
a  fifth  of  the  world’s  energy  consumption.  World-wide,  coal  accounts  for  about  45 
percent of electricity production, natural gas about 24 percent, nuclear about 12 per-
cent.  Oil  is  used  mainly  for  transportation  and  as  a  feedstock  for  the  chemical  in-
dustry. The current annual release from the world’s energy sector, by far the largest 
contributor  to  increased  atmospheric  CO2,  is  about  28  billion  tons  of  CO2—40  per-
cent from coal, 40 percent from oil, and most of the remaining 20 percent from nat-
ural gas.1 

Suppose you wanted to reduce global emissions by just one billion tons—less than 
4  percent  of  the  current  global  total.  That  would  require  building  136  new  1,000- 
MW  nuclear  plants  (equivalent  to  one-third  the  existing  world-wide  nuclear  capac-
ity),  or  150,000  2-MW  wind  turbines  (about  3  times  the  current  world  capacity),  or 
300 new coal gasification plants (500-MW each) with carbon capture and sequestra-

1 Energy  Information  Administration,  International  Energy  Outlook  2007,  www.eia.doe.gov/ 

oiaf/ieo/emissions.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

tion (CCS), in place of conventional coal plants. Today, there are several carbon se-
questration  projects  that  each  remove  about  1  million  tons  of  CO2 per  year.  This 
sounds  like  a  lot,  but  is  just  one-thousandth  of  the  billion  we  are  looking  for  to 
achieve  our  4  percent  reduction.  And  international  forums  are  talking  about  reduc-
tions on the order of 30 to 50 billion tons CO2 per year by 2050.2 

These  numbers  are  sobering.  Fossil  fuels  have  made  modern  economies  and  the 
incredible  advances  in  standard  of  living  over  the  last  century  possible.  The  eco-
nomic  development  path  has  been  paved  with  fossil  fuels.  For  any  given  economy, 
CO2 production  has  been  roughly  proportional  to  Gross  Domestic  Product  (GDP). 
The coefficient of proportionality is sensitive to technology; recently developed or de-
veloping  economies  are  significantly  more  ‘‘carbon  intensive’’  than  older,  developed 
economies. This is good news. It means that introducing modern energy technologies 
in  the  rapidly  developing  parts  of  the  world  can  slow  the  growth  of  fossil  CO2 rel-
ative  to  the  historical  development  path.  In  fact,  the  objective  of  a  CO2 mitigation 
strategy should be to eventually reduce the carbon intensity of the world’s economy 
toward zero, at the lowest possible socio-economic cost. 

A dramatic reduction in global energy emissions intensity will require deployment 
of  advanced  technology  at  a  rate  much  higher  than  projected  in  baseline  scenarios. 
The  Energy  Information  Administration  (EIA)  projects  that  under  current  policies 
U.S.  CO2 emissions  from  energy  use  will  increase  from  5.9  billion  metric  tons  in 
2006  to  6.9  billion  metric  tons  in  2030,  an  increase  of  16  percent,3 primarily  as  a 
result  of  increased  emissions  from  coal  power  plants  and  vehicle  emissions.  Total 
electricity consumption is expected to grow 30 percent over that time period—an av-
erage growth rate of 1.1 percent annually (which is much slower than the historical 
average,  largely  as  a  result  of  expected  efficiency  gains).4 In  that  timeframe,  the 
EIA projects that about 100 gigawatts of new U.S. coal-fired generating capacity will 
be  built  (in  addition  to  maintaining  the  existing  capacity  of  300  GW),  including  30 
gigawatts  of  integrated  gasification  combined-cycle  (IGCC)  plants  without  CCS.5 
From  2006  to  2030,  new  coal  power  plants  are  expected  to  increase  power  sector 
CO2 emissions  by  700  million  metric  tons  per  year,  representing  about  three-quar-
ters of the net increase in U.S. emissions over that time period. 

Globally, the rate of emissions growth is expected to be much more rapid. In 2005, 
global energy-related CO2 emissions amounted to 28 billion metric tons, of which the 
United States’ emissions represented 21 percent.6 By 2030, global emissions are pro-
jected  to  total  43  billion  metric  tons.7 The  EIA  projects  that  the  United  States  will 
account for about 16 percent of total global CO2 emissions in 2030, and about 7 per-
cent  of  the  growth  in  emissions  from  2005  to  2030.8 By  comparison,  about  60  per-
cent  of  the  increase  from  2005  levels  is  expected  to  come  from  China,  India,  and 
other  non-OECD  (Organization  for  Economic  Cooperation  and  Development)  Asian 
nations.  U.S.  coal-fired  generation  is  projected  to  be  6  percent  of  global  emissions 
in  2030,9 while  globally,  emissions  from  coal  combustion  in  all  forms  will  grow  by 
two-thirds, amounting to 18 billion tons-CO2 per year (43 percent of total CO2 emis-
sions) by 2030.6 

The global trends of rapid emissions growth in developing nations and a dramatic 
expansion  of  coal-related  emissions  have  been  obvious  for  some  time.  As  early  as 
2001, it was clear that a major factor in climate policy had to be a realistic strategy 
for  recruiting  large  developing  economies  into  an  international  framework.  It  was 
equally  clear  that  climate  policy  is  strongly  linked  to  energy  policy,  and  that  the 

2 Japan  has  proposed  a  global  2050  goal  to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions  to  50  percent  of 
current levels (i.e., reducing energy-related CO2 emissions to 14 billion tons-CO2 per year), while 
the EU has called for a 2050 goal of 50 percent of 1990 levels (i.e., reducing energy-related CO2 
emissions  to  10  billion  tons-CO2 per  year).  Others  have  proposed  even  more  aggressive  goals. 
Many  baseline,  medium-  to  high-growth  scenarios  project  global  emissions  in  the  range  of  50 
to  70  billion  tons-CO2 per  year  by  2050  (e.g.,  see  the  IPCC  Special  Report  on  Emissions  Sce-
narios, http://www.grida.no/climate/ipcc/emission/005.htm). 

3 AEO2008  Revised  Early  Release  (available  at  http://www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/aeo/excel/ 
aeotabl18.xls),  which  includes  the  expected  emissions  reductions  resulting  from  the  Energy 
Independence and Security Act of 2007. 

4 In  the  EIA  reference  case,  U.S.  electricity  consumption,  including  both  purchases  from  elec-
tric power producers and on-site generation, grows from 3,814 billion kilowatt hours in 2006 to 
4,974 billion kilowatt hours in 2030, increasing at an average annual rate of 1.1 percent. In com-
parison,  electricity  consumption  grew  by  annual  rates  of  7.3  percent,  4.2  percent,  2.6  percent, 
and  2.3  percent  in  the  1960s,  1970s,  1980s,  and  1990s,  respectively.  [AEO2008  Revised  Early 
Release] 

5 http://www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/aeo/excel/aeotabl9.xls. 
6 http://www.eia.doe.gov/pub/international/iealf/tableh1co2.xls. 
7 http://www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/ieo/emissions.html. 
8 http://www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/aeo/excel/aeotabl18.xls. 
9 http://www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/aeo/excel/aeotabl18.xls. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

scale  of  the  problem  would  require  a  campaign  that  would  have  to  be  maintained 
over the better part of a century. And it was clear that the already polarized nature 
of  the  public  discourse  was  obscuring  the  scale  and  nature,  not  so  much  of  the  re-
ality of anthropogenic climate change, but of the societal response that would be re-
quired. 

In  2002,  the  President  set  a  target  of  cutting  our  greenhouse  gas  intensity  by  18 
percent  through  the  year  2012.  When  announced,  this  commitment  was  estimated 
to  result  in  about  100  million  metric  tons  of  reduced  carbon-equivalent  emissions 
in 2012, with more than 500 million metric tons of reduced carbon-equivalent emis-
sions  in  cumulative  savings  over  the  decade.  Today,  we  are  well  ahead  of  the  in-
terim  milestones  to  achieve  that  target.  According  to  Environmental  Protection 
Agency  data  reported  to  the  United  Nations  Framework  Convention  on  Climate 
Change (UNFCCC), U.S. greenhouse gas intensity declined by 2 percent in 2003, 2.5 
percent  in  2004,  2.2  percent  in  2005,  and  4.2  percent  in  2006—a  10.4  percent  drop 
in those 4 years alone. 

Why shouldn’t the goal be simply to reduce the absolute carbon emissions toward 
zero? Why bring in the notion of ‘‘intensity’’? Because the cause of our climate anx-
iety  in  the  first  place—the  root  cause—is  the  overwhelming  desire  of  people  every-
where to improve their lot. That desire will not be denied. From all I have ever read 
or seen of human behavior, the will to better human circumstances must be accom-
modated in any social plan of action, and especially one designed to persist over dec-
ades, perhaps centuries. If we are to make any progress in mitigating anthropogenic 
climate change, it will be necessary to break the link between economic development 
and fossil fuel emissions. Economic development—i.e. growth in GDP—and simulta-
neous CO2 reduction implies reducing carbon intensity. This is a point of the utmost 
importance in crafting a successful global climate strategy. 

The  link  between  GDP  and  fossil  fuel  CO2 emissions  is  technology.  Technology 
choices  in  a  society,  especially  pervasive  ones  like  energy  technology,  are  dictated 
by cost. So what are the prospects for reducing the cost of low-carbon-emission tech-
nologies  to  the  point  where  they  will  replace  high-emission  technologies  in  rapidly 
developing  economies?  I  phrase  the  question  this  way  to  emphasize  that  dictating 
limits  on  carbon  emissions  to  such  a  country  is  a  fruitless  exercise  unless  alter-
native,  low-emission  technologies  are  commercially  available  and  feasible  at  scale. 
And  let  us  be  clear  that  if  we  are  serious  about  combating  anthropogenic  climate 
change,  fossil-related  carbon  emissions  must  be  reduced  in  all  major  economies.  It 
is  not  enough  for  only  the  ‘‘old  rich’’  economies  of  Europe  and  America  and  Japan 
to  eliminate  their  emissions.  All  major  economies  must  eventually  adopt  low-  or 
zero-carbon  energy  technologies.  This  poses  a  vexing  economic  conundrum,  because 
adjustments  in  energy  technologies  must  occur  during  precisely  that  epoch  in  post- 
Cold  War  history—our  epoch—when  a  major  transformation  in  global  patterns  of 
trade,  wealth,  and  economic  power  is  also  occurring.  Any  country  that  intervenes 
in its own economy to increase the price of low-cost, high-carbon-emitting energy in 
order to make higher-cost, lower-emitting technology more competitive, would likely 
put itself at a competitive disadvantage with countries that do not have similar poli-
cies, at least in the short term. And it is likely that there will always be dissimilar 
policies  as  long  as  significant  differences  in  standards  of  living  exist  among  econo-
mies around the world. 

The cost associated with altering the energy technology of a large economy is very 
large.  Economists  come  to  widely  different  conclusions  about  the  cost,  and  frankly 
I do not know how to evaluate the different claims. What I do know is that today— 
as  we  speak—very  few  low-carbon  technologies  exist  that  can  be  expanded  to  the 
necessary  scale  in  the  near  term.  I  can  think  of  only  one,  nuclear  fission,  that  is 
sufficiently  mature  and  sufficiently  scalable  to  be  a  serious  contender  with  low-cost 
coal plants. In the short term, renewable energy technologies such as wind and solar 
may help slow emissions, but we do not have low-cost versions of the ancillary tech-
nologies  of  electrical  storage  and  transmission  that  are  needed  to  scale  these  up 
even to their current potential. Biomass looks promising for transportation fuel, but 
is not yet very effective in reducing CO2 emissions overall, and is not obviously scal-
able  to  the  larger  electrical  power  industry.  Nuclear  power  is  carbon-free,  but  the 
subject  of  such  public  concern,  justified  or  not,  that  its  substantial  expansion  will 
come only with concerted effort. 

Coal,  natural  gas,  and  petroleum  will  continue  to  be  the  primary  energy  feed-
stocks  for  decades  to  come.  We  have,  however,  very  few  full-scale  demonstrations 
of the technologies for capturing the carbon emissions of fossil-fuel combustion. Coal 
is  the  fuel  we  have  to  worry  about  most,  especially  on  the  global  scale.  It  is  cur-
rently  the  cheapest,  most  ubiquitous  source  of  energy  for  stationary  power  genera-
tion,  and  it  releases  the  greatest  amount  of  CO2 when  burned.  The  U.S.  has  vast 
coal reserves and about half of its electricity is generated from this fuel. Meanwhile, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

China already uses 2.5 times as much coal as does the United States, and is adding, 
on average, more than one large coal-fired power plant every 2 weeks. Other devel-
oping nations such as India and the transitional Eastern European nations are also 
expected  to  rely  heavily  on  coal  for  their  economic  growth.  Thus  it  is  clear  that  de-
velopment  of  low-cost,  commercially  feasible  CCS  technologies  for  coal  plants  is  an 
essential component of any long-term strategy to address climate change. 

The  Administration  has  committed  enormous  resources  for  the  advancement  of 
low-carbon coal technologies. The President’s 2009 budget, when combined with the 
private match, will result in over $1 billion of investment for research, development 
and demonstration of these technologies. This is just the most recent addition to the 
already existing $1.6 billion in tax credits and at least $8 billion in loan guarantees 
for  advanced  coal  projects,  industrial  gasification  activities  at  retrofitted  and  new 
facilities that incorporate carbon capture and sequestration, and advanced coal gas-
ification facilities. 

The  Department  of  Energy  (DOE)  recently  restructured  the  FutureGen  program 
in  order  to  focus  government  resources  on  carbon  capture  and  storage.  The  new 
FutureGen will include multiple facilities, as opposed to just one, generating power 
at  a  commercial  scale.  This  revamped  initiative  is  expected  to  double  the  amount 
of CO2 sequestered compared to original FutureGen concept that was announced in 
2003. 

The Administration has implemented a broad array of strategies—including part-
nerships, consumer information campaigns, incentives, and regulations—that are di-
rected  at  developing  and  deploying  cleaner,  more  efficient  energy  technologies,  con-
servation,  biological  sequestration,  geological  sequestration  and  adaptation.  The 
President’s  2009  budget  includes  $8.6  billion  for  climate-change-related  activities 
and  tax  incentives—an  increase  of  9  percent  from  the  enacted  Fiscal  Year  2008 
(FY08) level. Since 2001, we have spent almost $45 billion on climate science, tech-
nology  development,  tax  incentives  and  international  assistance.  Funding  for  the 
U.S. Climate Change Technology Program (CCTP), a multi-agency R&D portfolio led 
by DOE, is $4.4 billion in the FY09 budget (3 percent higher than FY08 and 27 per-
cent higher than in FY07). This represents a large increase since the CCTP program 
office was formally established at DOE: the CCTP portfolio in FY03 was about $2.5 
billion.  Also,  the  President’s  Advanced  Energy  Initiative  (which  includes  the  Coal 
Research  Initiative,  nuclear  energy  R&D,  basic  energy  research,  and  energy  effi-
ciency and renewable energy R&D programs, all of which are within the CCTP port-
folio)  has  increased  80  percent  over  3  years,  with  $3.2  billion  in  the  FY09  request 
(versus $1.8 billion in FY06). 

The  Administration  is  implementing  mandatory  regulations  that  will  reduce  car-
bon  emissions.  After  calling  for  a  renewable  fuel  standard  and  a  large  increase  in 
vehicle efficiency standards in his 2007 State of the Union Address, President Bush 
signed  into  law  in  December  the  Energy  Independence  and  Security  Act  of  2007, 
which  includes  substantial,  mid-term  requirements  for  vehicle  fuel  efficiency  (40 
percent improvement), renewable fuels (36 billion gallons annually by 2022), and ef-
ficiency  of  appliances,  lighting  systems,  and  government  operations.  The  EIA  esti-
mates  that  this  law  will  result  in  some  of  the  largest  emission  cuts  in  our  Nation’s 
history,  between  3.9  and  4.9  cumulative  billion  tons  of  CO2 emissions  reductions 
through 2030. 

Internationally,  President  Bush  has  launched  a  Major  Economies  Process  (MEP) 
to  reach  agreement  on  key  elements  of  a  post-2012  energy  security  and  climate 
change arrangement under the UNFCCC, including the identification of a long term 
global goal for emissions reductions. The MEP will also focus on key sectors to help 
accelerate  the  development  of  advanced  energy  technologies.  Japan  currently  out-
spends  every  other  country  on  energy  R&D—more  than  $3.5  billion  in  2006.  The 
U.S.  was  second  in  that  year  with  more  than  $3  billion.  No  other  country  comes 
close. All the EU25 nations together contribute about $2.7 billion.10 Most of Japan’s 
energy  research  is  on  nuclear  power,  while  most  of  the  U.S.  budget  is  for  non-nu-
clear  energy  technology.  There  is  much  to  do.  Other  countries  can  and  should  do 
more. 

The  Administration  is  pursuing  global  cooperation  in  many  forums.  The  United 
States is working with other countries on a new international clean technology fund 
to  help  accelerate  the  use  of  cleaner,  lower-carbon  technologies  and  infrastructure. 
The  United  States  and  EU  have  jointly  proposed  in  the  Doha  negotiations  in  the 
World  Trade  Organization  to  rapidly  eliminate  the  tariff  and  non-tariff  trade  bar-
riers that impede investment in clean technologies and services. The Administration 
has played a leadership role in the recent, legally-binding agreement with key devel-
oping  countries  to  accelerate  the  phase-out  of  hydrochlorofluorocarbons  under  the 

10 International Energy Agency R&D Statistics, http://www.iea.org/Textbase/stats/rd.asp. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

Montreal Protocol, which will reduce emissions of greenhouse gases by at least 3 bil-
lion metric tons over the coming decades. Other significant efforts include the Asia- 
Pacific  Partnership  on  Clean  Development  and  Climate  with  China,  India,  Aus-
tralia, South Korea, Canada, and Japan; joint efforts to combat deforestation, which 
accounts  for  roughly  20  percent  of  global  greenhouse  gas  emissions;  and  inter-
national collaboration on monitoring and adaptation tools, such as the Global Earth 
Observation  System  of  Systems,  a  72-nation  collaboration  that  can  help  commu-
nities plan and prepare for the effects of climate variability and change. 

In  the  domestic  arena,  many  of  the  actions  by  this  Administration  with  respect 
to  climate  change  have  been  taken  in  the  name  of  energy  security.  The  two  goals 
are  not  quite  the  same,  the  points  of  divergence  being  the  increased  domestic  pro-
duction  of  oil  and  the  use  of  coal  without  carbon  sequestration.  That  is  why  it  is 
so important to invest in CCS technologies. For both climate change and energy se-
curity,  technology  development  must  focus  on  scalable  sources—nuclear  and  coal, 
while  maintaining  progress  in  other  areas  such  as  renewable  power  and  efficient 
end uses. Of course, there is no reason to delay picking the low-hanging fruit of low- 
carbon  technology.  We  can  increase  the  efficiency  of  cars,  and  convert  them  first  to 
run  on  biofuels  and  later  on  electricity  or  hydrogen.  We  can  capture  the  energy  of 
wind when it blows and sun when it shines, and later when we have better batteries 
we  can  use  such  transient  sources  more  effectively.  We  can  reduce  the  energy  con-
sumption of lighting, of buildings, of domestic machinery and appliances, and of in-
dustrial  processes,  with  existing  technology.  None  of  these  measures,  however,  ad-
dresses  the  very  large  share  of  emissions  from  stationary  power  sources  that  burn 
fossil fuels, and particularly coal. 

The  above  discussion  suggests  that  reducing  carbon  emissions  from  coal  power 
plants ought to be a high priority for federally funded R&D. Recognizing these reali-
ties,  the  President’s  request  for  Fossil  Energy  research,  development  and  dem-
onstration  in  FY09  is  $754  million,  which  is  focused  almost  exclusively  on  coal. 
Funding  for  the  Coal  Research  Initiative  (CRI)  has  grown  by  87  percent  over  the 
past  3  years,  and  the  research,  development,  and  demonstration  activities  within 
this  Initiative  are  now  almost  entirely  focused  on  CCS  technologies.  The  $588  mil-
lion for CRI in FY09 compares with $170 million when the President first took office 
in  2001,  or  more  than  3  times  as  much  spending.  As  a  result  of  these  efforts,  in 
partnership with industry and with other nations, coal gasification technology could 
enable  low-cost  capture  and  storage  of  a  significant  portion  of  the  projected  global 
carbon  emissions  over  the  next  fifty  years.  But  there  are  some  big  hurdles  to  over-
come.  While  the  United  States  and  other  coal-producing  nations  appear  to  have  an 
abundance of potential geologic storage capacity, the stunningly large fossil fuel con-
sumption  numbers  I  quoted  earlier  highlight  the  immense  challenges  inherent  in 
building the CCS infrastructure. Any industrial scale process has potential environ-
mental impacts, and there are few greater industrial scales than that of power gen-
eration.  The  sequestration  industry  would  have  to  be  of  comparable  scale.  Another 
challenge  is  cost.  DOE  estimates  that  IGCC  power  plants  with  CCS,  if  successfully 
implemented  using  today’s  technology,  would  generate  electricity  at  a  cost  40  to  70 
percent  higher  than  conventional  coal  plants.  Most  of  that  incremental  cost  derives 
from  the  energy  penalty  in  capturing  CO2 from  the  gasified  coal.  Clearly,  such  ex-
cessive costs will inhibit the deployment of these technologies, especially on a global 
scale.  Furthermore,  the  reliability  of  commercial-scale  IGCC  plants  with  CCS  has 
not been suitably demonstrated. 

The  Coal  Research  Initiative  (CRI),  which  includes  the  FutureGen  program  and 
Clean  Coal  Power  Initiative  (CCPI),  seeks  to  reduce  the  cost  and  demonstrate  the 
commercial  feasibility  of  coal  gasification  and  CCS  technologies.  The  CRI  funds  a 
full range of R&D activity, including applied research, advanced technology develop-
ment,  pilot-scale  testing,  public  and  stakeholder  outreach,  and  large-scale  dem-
onstrations in partnership with industry. Funding for the CRI is $588 million in the 
FY09  budget  (an  increase  of  27  percent,  or  $124  million,  above  FY08),  with  $156 
million  for  the  FutureGen  program  (versus  $74  million  in  FY08).  Specific  activities 
under the CRI include carbon sequestration research and demonstrations as well as 
R&D  on  advanced  turbines,  advanced  gasifiers,  and  other  IGCC  technologies,  such 
as  those  for  gas  cleaning,  conditioning,  and  separation.  Meanwhile,  the  recent  re-
focusing of FutureGen will enhance its usefulness as a demonstration (actually, sev-
eral demonstrations) of the commercial feasibility of these technologies. 

In summary, the Administration remains strongly committed to a goal of enabling 
cost-effective,  coal-based  power  generation  with  near-zero  atmospheric  emissions. 
Coal  gasification—and  the  associated  carbon  capture  and  sequestration  tech-
nologies—are an essential part of our global vision for a low-carbon future. 

Thank you for the opportunity to speak with you today. I am prepared to answer 

any questions you have. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much, Doctor. We’ll look forward 

to following up on that a bit. 

Mr. Childress? 

STATEMENT OF JAMES M. CHILDRESS, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

GASIFICATION TECHNOLOGIES COUNCIL 

Mr. CHILDRESS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The  Gasification  Technologies  Council  is  composed  of  more  than 
70  companies  involved  as  plant  owners,  operators,  technology  sup-
pliers,  and  equipment  suppliers,  and  collectively  account  for  about 
95 percent of world gasification capacity. 

I’d  like  to  briefly  summarize  my  written  remarks,  first  address-
ing, what is gasification? It is a proven manufacturing process that 
converts carbon-containing materials into a synthesis gas, or a syn- 
gas,  which  is  used  to  produce  chemicals,  plastics,  fertilizer,  fuels, 
and the subject of today’s hearing—electricity. 

It is not combustion—that’s an important differentiation when it 
comes  to  environmental  performance,  both  in  terms  of  air  emis-
sions and in terms of carbon capture and storage and, if necessary, 
we can get into that discussion later, it is in my written testimony. 
Gasification  has  been  in  commercial  use  for  more  than  50  years 
in  the  chemical  and  refining  industry,  and  for  more  than  35  years 
in the power industry. Today there are more than 140 plants in op-
eration  around  the  world,  with  capacity  expected  to  grow  by  an-
other  70  percent  by  2015,  80  percent  of  that  growth  will  be  in 
China. In the U.S., there are 19 operating gasification plants. 

Integrated  Gasification  Combined  Cycle  (IGCC)  joins  a  modern 
gasification  system  with  an  efficient  combined-cycle  power  plant, 
similar to that used for natural gas combined cycle generation, that 
provides the most efficient, cleanest way to produce electricity from 
coal. 

In  my  written  statement,  there  is  a  chart  that  compares  the  air 
emissions  of  criteria  pollutants  for  a  coal-combustion  plant,  IGCC, 
natural  gas  and  combined  cycle  plant.  The  differences  are  dra-
matic.  IGCC  is  clearly  cleaner,  and  it  also  has  the  potential  to  be 
the  least-cost  option  for  capturing  and  compressing  CO2 in  new 
coal-based  power  plants  using  currently  available  equipment  and 
processes.  That’s  an  important  differentiation  to  note,  because  in 
combustion  technologies,  they’re  very  low  on  the  learning  curve  on 
post-combustion CO2 removal. 

More  than  90  percent  of  gasification  capacity  in  the  world  al-
ready  captures  CO2.  That  is,  chemical  plants,  fertilizer  plants, 
those  producing  liquid  and  gaseous  fuels,  referred  to  as  industrial 
gasification,  already  capture  the  CO2,  but  because  there’s  no  eco-
nomic  or  regulatory  incentive,  do  not  compress  it  for  underground 
storage.  They  offer  a  lower-cost  option  for  CO2 capture  than  do 
power plants. 

Because  the  manufacturing  processes  require  the  CO2 to  be  re-
moved  as  part  of  the  process,  carbon  capture  in  industrial  gasifi-
cation is part on the sticker price, if you will. It’s not an expensive 
option to add on, and a number of these plants are offering—in the 
United States—the option for near-term, large-scale carbon capture 
and storage at a lower cost than for power generation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

I just make reference to the Great Plains Substitute Natural Gas 
Plant  in  North  Dakota  where  this  is  being  done  today.  It’s  not  a 
power  plant,  it’s  a  chemical  and  natural  gas  plant.  But  it  is  cap-
turing and selling the CO2 for enhanced oil recovery in Canada. 

Let  me  address  the  real  reason  for  all  of  this,  that’s  coal,  it’s 
what I call the ‘‘coal moratorium.’’ IGCC projects have not been im-
mune  to  the  political  and  regulatory  roadblocks  facing  new  coal 
combustion  plants.  A  number  of  IGCC  plants  in  development  have 
been  either  indefinitely  postponed,  or  cancelled,  because  of  state- 
level  regulations,  policies  and  programs,  that  require  all  new  coal- 
based  power  generation  to  capture  and  store  CO2,  right  out  of  the 
box. 

The  net  effect  of  this  moratorium  will  be  to  increase  demand  for 
natural gas. As Senator Ensign pointed out, we do have a lot of al-
ternatives—wind, solar, et cetera—but for base load power genera-
tion, the fuel of choice is going to be natural gas, and that is going 
to have an impact on price. 

I  have  a  table  in  my  written  statement  that  indicates  that  cer-
tain analysts—and I think most analysts—are saying that between 
now  and  2020,  the  demand  for  natural  gas  for  power  generation 
will  rise  by  45  percent—that  is  3  quadrillion  BTUs,  or  3  trillion 
cubic feet of natural gas demand per year. 

We  don’t  have  the  reserves,  we  don’t  have  the  production  capac-
ity. That’s going to raise the price. Second, we’re going to go to liq-
uefied natural gas imports, that opens the U.S. market up to com-
peting  with  higher-priced  markets,  basically  Europe,  Japan  and 
Korea—so  that  the  end  result  will  be  higher  natural  gas  prices  in 
the  U.S.  for  industry.  We’re  already  exporting  jobs  overseas  in 
many  of  our  natural  gas-dependent  industries,  such  as  chemicals, 
fertilizers.  Industries  using  natural  gas  for  fuel,  homeowners  will 
also suffer. 

Industrial  gasification  offers  one  opportunity  for  rectifying  this 
situation  but  even  the  industrial  gasification  facilities  with  lower 
CCS costs may, in fact, be faced with some of the same issues that 
have resulted from the coal moratorium. 

My recommendations are three-fold. First, we need financial sup-
port  for  demonstration  at  a  commercial  scale  of  multiple  IGCCs, 
using different technologies, different coals, different geological sit-
uations  so  we  can  prove  out,  at  a  commercial  scale,  what  we  can 
do  and  what  it’s  going  to  cost  with  power  generation  and  carbon 
capture and storage. 

We  need,  financial  incentives  for  industrial  gasification  that  rec-
ognize  its  unique  ability  for  lower  cost,  nearer  term  capture  and 
storage, and also offer some regulatory and liability protections for 
these first adopters. 

And finally, a uniform national policy on CO2. We need, whatever 
the  preference  is,  whatever  the  flavor  of  the  day  is,  we  need  a  na-
tional  program  for  CO2 capture,  regulation,  and  very  importantly, 
for  the  regulations  involving  storage.  It  gets  to  basic  legal  and  li-
ability issues, if we’re going to move forward with CCS, and power 
generation and gasification. 

Thank you. 
Senator KERRY. National standard for the reduction? 
Mr. CHILDRESS. Exactly. Yes, sir. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Childress follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES M. CHILDRESS, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

GASIFICATION TECHNOLOGIES COUNCIL 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee,  my  name  is  James  Childress. 
I  am  the  Executive  Director  of  the  Gasification  Technologies  Council  (GTC).  The 
GTC has more than seventy companies that own and operate plants, or provide the 
technologies,  processes,  services  and  equipment  essential  to  their  operation.  Gasifi-
cation  plants  in  which  our  members  are  involved  account  for  more  than  95  percent 
of world capacity. 

In my testimony today I would like to address issues associated with gasification’s 
readiness  to  compress  and  capture  CO2 and  public  policy  steps  that  could  be  taken 
to accelerate commercialization of sequestration of CO2 from IGCC power plants and 
gasification-based manufacturing facilities. Also, with opposition to coal-based power 
plants  threatening  to  put  severe  price  and  supply  pressures  on  natural  gas,  gasifi-
cation  technologies  can  help  the  United  States  meet  its  energy  needs  in  environ-
mentally and economically sound ways. 
The Technology 

Gasification  is  a  proven  and  efficient  manufacturing  process  that  converts  hydro-
carbons  such  as  coal,  wastes,  or  biomass  into  a  clean  synthesis  gas  (syngas),  which 
can  be  used  to  produce  chemicals,  plastics,  fertilizers,  fuels,  and  electricity.  Gasifi-
cation is not a combustion process. 

Gasification has been used commercially on a global scale for more than 50 years 
by  the  chemical,  refining,  and  fertilizer  industries  and  for  more  than  35  years  by 
the  electric  power  industry.  There  are  more  than  420  gasifiers  currently  in  use  in 
some  140  facilities  worldwide.  Nineteen  plants  are  operating  in  the  United  States. 
Growth in the Industry 

Worldwide  gasification  capacity  is  projected  to  grow  70  percent  by  2015,  with 
some  80  percent  of  the  growth  occurring  in  Asia.  China  is  expected  to  achieve  the 
most  rapid  growth  as  it  moves  aggressively  to  displace  use  of  oil  and  gas  in  its 
chemicals  and  fertilizer  industries.  There  are  also  seven  coal-to-substitute  natural 
gas projects in development in China. In addition, there are twelve proposed gasifi-
cation-based IGCC power plants under evaluation by the Chinese government. 

Since  2004,  29  new  gasification  plants  have  been  licensed  and/or  built  in  China. 
In  contrast,  no  new  gasification  plants  have  started  up  in  the  United  States  since 
2002.  In  the  U.S.,  plans  have  been  announced  for  some  45–50  new  gasification- 
based projects in twenty-five states. However, whether these plants will actually be 
constructed  depends  on  a  number  of  factors,  perhaps  the  most  important  of  which 
is  the  lack  of  a  clear  regulatory  framework  addressing  carbon  capture  and  seques-
tration. 
Power Generation—IGCC 

An Integrated Gasification Combined Cycle (IGCC) power plant combines the gas-
ification  plant  with  a  ‘‘combined  cycle’’  power  plant.  Clean  syngas  is  combusted  in 
high  efficiency  gas  turbines  to  produce  electricity.  The  excess  heat  from  the  gasifi-
cation  reaction  is  captured,  converted  into  steam  and  sent  to  a  steam  turbine  to 
produce  additional  electricity.  IGCC  offers  both  significant  environmental  benefits 
and  the  lowest-option  for  carbon  capture  of  any  coal-based  power  generation  meth-
od. 

Compared  to  traditional  combustion-based  technologies  producing  electricity  from 
coal,  an  IGCC  shows  marked  reductions  in  all  criteria  air  pollutants,  higher  effi-
ciency, and lower water use and solid waste generation. Air emissions from an IGCC 
approach those of a natural gas combined cycle (NGCC) plant. (Source: IL DEP, GE 
Energy) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

Commercial  technology  exists  today  to  remove  more  than  95  percent  of  the  mer-
cury from a gasification-based plant at one-tenth the cost of removal for a coal com-
bustion plant. 
Carbon Capture 

More  than  80  percent  of  global  gasification  capacity  is  already  capturing  CO2. 
What  are  commonly  called  ‘‘industrial  gasification’’  facilities,  chemical,  plastics,  fer-
tilizer,  fuels  and  hydrogen  plants  routinely  capture  the  CO2 as  part  of  their  manu-
facturing process. However, because of lack of economic incentives or regulatory re-
quirements, the CO2 is not sequestered. 

Gasification also provides the least cost path toward capturing CO2 emissions as-
sociated with power generation from coal, heavy petroleum residues such as petcoke 
and  other  fossil  fuels.  This  is  because  the  syngas  being  treated  in  an  IGCC  power 
plant  is  under  pressure  and  is  approximately  1  percent  of  the  volume  of  post-com-
bustion  exhaust  gas  that  must  be  cleansed  in  a  conventional  coal-fired  plant.  This 
results  in  lower  capital  and  operating  costs  for  the  IGCC  as  well  as  reduced  para-
sitic energy requirements. Costs of carbon capture and pressurization for industrial 
gasification facilities are even lower, because the equipment and processes necessary 
for  removing  CO2 from  the  gas  stream  are  part  of  the  manufacturing  process. 
(Source: Eastman Chemical, MIT) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
1
d

.

l
i

h
c
9
0
4

17 

Consequences of a Moratorium on Coal-based Power Generation, Including 

IGCC 

Despite  the  strong  environmental  benefits  of  IGCC,  coal-based  IGCC  plants  are 
facing  the  same  opposition  and  delay  encountered  by  combustion-based  plants. 
Much  of  this  is  due  to  demands  that  IGCC  plants  incorporate  carbon  capture  and 
sequestration in their initial operations. 

A prime example occurred in Florida last year when the Tampa Electric Polk Unit 
6 IGCC was indefinitely postponed when the state announced greenhouse gas reduc-
tions  goals,  but  without  the  necessary  regulatory  structure  and  certainty  to  imple-
ment  those  reductions.  The  Tampa  utility  has  been  successfully  running  its  first 
IGCC  at  the  Polk  plant  since  the  mid-1990s  and  expectations  were  that  the  new 
unit would provide valuable experience leading to increased investor and owner con-
fidence in IGCC technology. 

Since the postponement, Tampa Electric has announced that the additional capac-
ity the new IGCC would have provided will now be met by natural gas powered gen-
eration.  This  scenario  is  typical  of  coal  cancellations  in  the  U.S.  Despite  calls  for 
efficiency and renewables as alternatives to coal, the power generation fuel of choice 
is  natural  gas.  This  demand  for  natural  gas-based  power  generation  is  accelerating 
because of its low emissions and higher capacity factor. 

The Energy Information Administration estimates that by 2020 the use of coal for 

power will increase while the use of natural gas will decline. (Source: U.S. EIA) 

U.S. Fuel Demand for Power Generation (Quads) 

Coal 

Natural Gas 

Renewables 

2007 

2020 

20.68 

23.67 

6.77 

5.92 

3.65 

5.64 

The  EIA  forecast  is  clearly  unrealistic—coal  use  will  not  rise  under  the  current 
circumstances  and  gas  certainly  will  not  decline.  Industry  analysts  have  indicated 
that incremental natural gas demand of 3 quads will be needed to meet the expected 
coal shortfall, even while U.S. natural gas production has been essentially flat. 

One analysis of the consequences of a de facto coal plant moratorium lays out the 

following scenario: 

• Incremental natural gas demand will have to come from marginal gas supplies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
2
d

.

l
i

h
c
9
0
4

18 

• North American gas fields look to be maxed out at current demand levels. 
• Marginal  supplies  will  probably  need  to  be  purchased  from  the  global  liquefied 
• Therefore,  U.S.  gas  prices  will  be  determined  by  much  higher  European  and 

natural gas (LNG) market. 

Asian prices, will be oil indexed to attract spot cargoes. 

The  price  impacts  of  this  rise  in  natural  gas  demand  for  power  generation  will 
be  severe  for  industries  such  as  chemicals,  plastics  and  fertilizers  that  rely  on  nat-
ural gas as a feedstock, manufacturers that use gas as a fuel, and homeowners, al-
ready faced with skyrocketing oil and gasoline prices. 

Industrial  gasification  offers  one  element  of  a  solution—through  plants  gasifying 
coal  or  petroleum  coke  to  produce  chemicals,  fertilizers  or  substitute  natural  gas 
(SNG), but the public policy and political climate is not reassuring. We propose the 
outline of a way forward. 
Conclusions and Recommendations 

There is the need for a sustained, long term carbon capture and sequestration ini-
tiative involving government and industry. The initiative should provide assurances 
to  industry,  the  investment  community  and  regulators  that  CCS  via  gasification  is 
a viable option for capturing and sequestering CO2 emissions from power generation 
and manufacturing. The elements of the initiative should include: 

using a variety of coals; 

• Demonstration  at  a  commercial  scale  of  multiple  IGCC  power  plants  with  CCS 
• Incentives  that  recognize  and  reward  the  ability  of  industrial  gasification  to 
• A  uniform  national  policy  framework  addressing  regulation  of  CO2 emissions 
and  CCS,  including  incentives  and  liability  indemnification  for  early  adopters. 

offer large scale, near term opportunities for CCS at lower costs; and 

Thank you. I will be happy to answer any questions you may have. 

APPENDIX 

GASIFICATION TECHNOLOGIES COUNCIL 

Gasification: Background Information 
What is Gasification? 

Gasification is a manufacturing process that converts carbon-containing materials, 
such as coal, petroleum coke (‘‘petcoke’’), biomass, or various wastes to a ‘‘synthesis 
gas’’ or ‘‘syngas’’ which can then be used to produce valuable products, such as, elec-
tric power, chemicals, fertilizers, substitute natural gas, hydrogen, steam, and trans-
portation fuels. 
Gasification Is Not Combustion 

Gasification  is  a  partial  oxidation  (reaction)  process  which  produces  syngas  com-
prised  primarily  of  hydrogen  (H2)  and  carbon  monoxide  (CO).  It  is  not  a  complete 
oxidation (combustion) process, which produces primarily thermal energy (heat) and 
residual solid waste (slag), criteria air pollutants (NOX and SO2), and carbon dioxide 
(CO2). 
How Does Gasification Work? 
Feedstocks 

Gasification  enables  the  capture—in  an  environmentally  beneficial  manner—of 
the  remaining  ‘‘value’’  present  in  a  variety  of  low-grade  hydrocarbon  materials 
(‘‘feedstocks’’)  that  would  otherwise  have  minimal  or  even  negative  economic  value. 

and biomass, such as wood waste, agricultural waste, and household waste. 

Gasifiers can be designed to run on a single material or a blend of feedstocks: 
• Solids: All types of coal and petroleum coke (a low value byproduct of refining) 
• Liquids:  Liquid  refinery  residuals  (including  asphalts,  bitumen,  and  other  oil 
• Gas: Natural gas or refinery/chemical off-gas. 

sands residues) and liquid wastes from chemical plants and refineries. 

Gasifier 

The core of the gasification system is the gasifier, a pressurized vessel where the 
feed  material  contacts  with  oxygen  (or  air)  and  steam  at  high  temperatures.  There 
are  several  basic  gasifier  designs,  distinguished  by  the  use  of  wet  or  dry  feed,  the 
use of air or oxygen, the reactor’s flow direction (up-flow, down-flow, or circulating), 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

and the gas cooling process. Currently, gasifiers are capable of handling up to 3,000 
tons/day of feedstock throughput and this will increase in the near future. 

After  being  ground  into  very  small  particles—or  fed  directly  (if  a  gas  or  liquid)— 
the  feedstock  is  injected  into  the  gasifier  along  with  a  controlled  amount  of  air  or 
oxygen and steam. Temperatures in a gasifier range from 1,400–2,800 degrees Fahr-
enheit.  The  heat  and  pressure  inside  the  gasifier  break  apart  the  chemical  bonds 
of the feedstock forming syngas. 

The  syngas  consists  primarily  of  hydrogen  and  carbon  monoxide  and,  depending 
upon  the  specific  gasification  technology,  smaller  quantities  of  methane,  carbon  di-
oxide, hydrogen sulfide, and water vapor. Syngas can be combusted to produce elec-
tric  power  and  steam  or  used  as  a  building  block  for  a  variety  of  chemicals  and 
fuels. Syngas generally has a heating value of 250–300 Btu/scf, compared to natural 
gas at approximately 1,000 BTU/scf. 

Typically,  70  to  85  percent  of  the  carbon  in  the  feedstock  is  converted  into  the 
syngas.  The  ratio  of  carbon  monoxide  to  hydrogen  depends  in  part  upon  the  hydro-
gen and carbon content of the feedstock and the type of gasifier used. 
Oxygen Plant 

Most gasification systems use almost pure oxygen (as opposed to air) to help facili-
tate  the  reaction  in  the  gasifier.  This  oxygen  (95  to  99  percent  purity)  is  generated 
by  using  proven  cryogenic  technology.  The  oxygen  is  then  fed  into  the  gasifier 
through separate co-feed ports in the feed injector. 
Gas Clean-Up 

The  raw  syngas  produced  in  the  gasifier  contains  trace  levels  of  impurities  that 
must  be  removed  prior  to  its  ultimate  use.  After  the  gas  is  cooled,  the  trace  min-
erals, particulates, sulfur, mercury, and unconverted carbon are removed to very low 
levels using commercially-proven cleaning processes common to the chemical and re-
fining industries. 
Carbon Dioxide 

Carbon dioxide (CO2) can also be removed at the gas cleanup stage using a num-
ber  of  commercial  technologies.  In  fact,  CO2 is  routinely  removed  with  a  commer-
cially proven technology in ammonia and hydrogen manufacturing plants. Ammonia 
plants  already  capture  roughly  equivalent  to  90  percent  of  the  CO2 and  methanol 
plants capture approximately 70 percent. 
Byproducts 

Most solid and liquid feed gasifiers produce a glassy-like byproduct, which is non-
hazardous and can be used in roadbed construction or in roofing materials. Also, in 
most  gasification  plants,  more  than  99  percent  of  the  sulfur  is  removed  and  recov-
ered either as elemental sulfur or sulfuric acid. Finally, for feeds (such as coal) con-
taining  mercury,  more  than  95  percent  of  the  mercury  can  be  removed  from  the 
syngas using relatively small and commercially available activated carbon beds. 
Which Industries Use Gasification? 

Gasification  has  been  used  in  the  chemical,  refining,  and  fertilizer  industries  for 
more than 50 years and by the electric power industry for more than 35 years. Cur-
rently, there are more than 140 gasification plants—with more than 420 gasifiers— 
operating worldwide. Nineteen of those gasification plants are located in the United 
States. 

The  use  of  gasification  is  expanding.  For  example,  there  are  several  gasification 
projects  under  development  to  provide  steam  and  hydrogen  for  synthetic  crude  up-
grading  in  the  oil  sands  industry  in  Canada.  In  addition,  the  paper  industry  is  ex-
ploring how gasification can be used to make their operations more efficient and re-
duce waste streams. 
Gasification Applications and Products 

Hydrogen  and  carbon  monoxide,  the  major  components  of  syngas,  are  the  basic 
building  blocks  of  a  number  of  other  products,  such  as  chemicals  and  fertilizers.  In 
addition,  a  gasification  plant  can  be  designed  to  produce  more  than  one  product  at 
a  time  (co-production  or  ‘‘polygeneration’’),  such  as  the  production  of  electricity, 
steam, and chemicals (e.g., methanol or ammonia). This polygeneration flexibility al-
lows a facility to increase its efficiency and improve the economics of its operations. 
Chemicals and Fertilizers 

Modem gasification has been used in the chemical industry since the 1950s. Typi-
cally, the chemical industry uses gasification to produce methanol as well as chemi-
cals—such as ammonia and urea—which form the foundation of nitrogen-based fer-
tilizers. The majority of the operating gasification plants worldwide are designed to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

produce chemicals and fertilizers. And, as natural gas and oil prices continue to in-
crease, the chemical industry is developing additional coal gasification plants to gen-
erate these basic chemical building blocks. 

Eastman  Chemical  Company  helped  advance  the  use  of  coal  gasification  tech-
nology  for  chemicals  production.  Eastman’s  coal-to-chemicals  plant  in  Kingsport, 
Tennessee, converts Appalachian coals to methanol and acetyl chemicals. The plant 
began operating in 1983 and has gasified approximately 10 million tons of coal with 
a 98 to 99 percent on-stream availability rate. 
Hydrogen for Oil Refining 

Hydrogen, one of the two major components of syngas, is used to strip impurities 
from  gasoline,  diesel  fuel,  and  jet  fuel,  thereby  producing  the  clean  fuels  required 
by state and Federal clean air regulations. Hydrogen is also used to upgrade heavy 
crude oil. Historically, refineries have utilized natural gas to produce this hydrogen. 
Now,  with  the  increasing  price  of  natural  gas,  refineries  are  looking  to  alternative 
feedstocks  to  produce  the  needed  hydrogen.  Refineries  can  gasify  low  value  residu-
als,  such  as  petroleum  coke,  asphalts,  tars,  and  some  oily  wastes  from  the  refining 
process  to  generate  both  the  required  hydrogen  and  the  power  and  steam  needed 
to run the refinery. 
Transportation Fuels 

Gasification is the foundation for converting coal and other solid fuels and natural 
gas into transportation fuels, such as gasoline, ultra-clean diesel fuel, jet fuel, naph-
tha,  and  synthetic  oils.  Two  basic  paths  are  employed  in  converting  coal  to  motor 
fuels  via  gasification.  In  the  first,  the  syngas  undergoes  an  additional  process,  the 
Fischer-Tropsch  (FT)  reaction,  to  convert  it  to  a  liquid  petroleum  product.  The  FT 
process, with coal as a feedstock, was invented in the 1920s, used by Germany dur-
ing  World  War  II,  and  has  been  utilized  in  South  Africa  for  decades.  Today,  it  is 
also used in Malaysia and the Middle East with natural gas as the feedstock. 

In  the  second  process,  so-called  Methanol  to  Gasoline  (MTG),  the  syngas  is  first 
converted to methanol (a commercially used process) and the methanol is converted 
to gasoline by reacting it over a bed of catalysts. A commercial MTG plant success-
fully operated in the 1980s and early 1990s in New Zealand and one is under devel-
opment in China. 
Transportation Fuels From Oil Sands 

The  ‘‘oil  sands’’  in  Alberta,  Canada  are  estimated  to  contain  as  much  recoverable 
oil (in the form of bitumen) as the vast oil fields in Saudi Arabia. However, to con-
vert this raw material to saleable products requires mining the oil sands and refin-
ing the resulting bitumen to transportation fuels. The mining process involves mas-
sive  amounts  of  steam  to  separate  the  bitumen  from  the  sands  and  the  refining 
process demands large quantities of hydrogen to upgrade the ‘‘crude oil’’ to finished 
products. (Wastes from the upgrading process include petcoke, deasphalted bottoms, 
vacuum residuals, and asphalt/asphaltenes—all of which contain unused energy.) 

Traditionally,  oil  sand  operators  have  utilized  natural  gas  to  produce  the  steam 
and  hydrogen  needed  for  the  mining,  upgrading,  and  refining  processes.  However, 
a  number  of  operators  will  soon  gasify  petcoke  to  supply  the  necessary  steam  and 
hydrogen.  Not  only  will  gasification  displace  expensive  natural  gas  as  a  feedstock, 
it will enable the extraction of useable energy from what is otherwise a waste prod-
uct  (the  petcoke).  In  addition,  black  water  from  the  mining  and  refining  processes 
can be recycled to the gasifiers using a wet feed system, reducing fresh water usage 
and  waste  water  management  costs.  (This  is  not  inconsequential  since  traditional 
oil sand operations consume large volumes of water.) 
Substitute Natural Gas 

Gasification  can  also  be  used  to  create  substitute  natural  gas  (SNG)  from  coal. 
Using  a  ‘‘methanation’’  reaction,  the  coal-based  syngas—chiefly  carbon  monoxide 
(CO)  and  hydrogen  (H2)—can  be  profitably  converted  to  methane  (CH4).  Nearly 
chemically  identical  to  conventional  natural  gas,  the  resulting  SNG  can  be  used  to 
generate  electricity,  produce  chemicals/fertilizers,  or  heat  homes  and  businesses. 
SNG will enhance domestic fuel security by displacing imported natural gas that is 
likely to be supplied in the form of Liquefied Natural Gas (LNG). 
Power Generation With Gasification 

As stated above, coal can be used as a feedstock to produce electricity from gasifi-
cation.  This  particular  coal-to-power  technology  allows  the  continued  use  of  coal 
without  the  high  level  of  air  emissions  associated  with  conventional  coal-burning 
technologies.  This  occurs  because  in  gasification  power  plants  the  pollutants  in  the 
syngas are removed before the syngas is combusted in the turbines. In contrast, con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

ventional  coal  combustion  technologies  capture  the  pollutants  after  the  exhaust  gas 
has  passed  through  the  boiler  or  steam  generator—generally  using  an  expensive 
‘‘bag house’’ and/or ‘‘scrubber.’’ 
IGCC Power Plants 

An Integrated Gasification Combined Cycle (IGCC) power plant combines the gas-
ification  block  with  a  ‘‘combined  cycle’’  power  block  (consisting  of  one  or  more  gas 
turbines and a steam turbine). Clean syngas is combusted in high efficiency gas tur-
bines  to  produce  electricity.  The  excess  heat  from  the  gasification  reaction  is  then 
captured,  converted  into  steam  and  sent  to  a  steam  turbine  to  produce  additional 
electricity.  The  gas  turbines  can  be  operated  on  a  backup  fuel  such  as  natural  gas 
during  periods  of  scheduled  gasifier  maintenance  or  can  co-fire  the  backup  fuel  to 
compensate for any shortfall in syngas production. 
Gas Turbines 

In  IGCC—where  power  generation  is  the  focus—the  clean  syngas  is  combusted 
(burned)  in  high  efficiency  gas  turbines  to  generate  electricity  with  very  low  emis-
sions. The turbines used in these plants are derivatives of proven, natural gas com-
bined-cycle turbines that have been specially adapted for use with syngas. For IGCC 
plants  that  include  carbon  capture,  the  gas  turbines  must  be  able  to  operate  on 
syngas  with  higher  levels  of  hydrogen.  Although  modern  state-of-the-art  gas  tur-
bines  are  commercially  ready  for  this  ‘‘higher  hydrogen’’  syngas,  work  is  on-going 
in  the  United  States  to  develop  the  next  generation  of  even  more  efficient  gas  tur-
bines ready for carbon capture-based IGCC. 
Heat Recovery Steam Generator 

Hot gas from each gas turbine in an IGCC plant will ‘‘exhaust’’ into a heat recov-
ery steam generator (HRSG). The HRSG captures heat in the hot exhaust from the 
gas  turbines  and  uses  it  to  generate  additional  steam  that  is  used  to  make  more 
power in the steam turbine portion of the combined-cycle unit. 
Steam Turbines 

In  most  IGCC  plant  designs,  steam  recovered  from  the  gasification  process  is 
superheated in the HRSG to increase overall efficiency output of the steam turbines, 
hence  the  name  Integrated  Gasification  Combined  Cycle.  This  IGCC  combination, 
which includes a gasification plant, two types of turbine generators (gas and steam), 
and  the  HRSG  is  clean  and  efficient—producing  NOx levels  less  than  0.06  lb  per 
MMBtu (coal input basis) and combined cycle efficiencies exceeding 65 percent when 
process stream integrated from the gasification plant is included. 

Another  example  of  the  ‘‘integrated’’  design  in  the  fully  integrated  IGCC  is  the 
IGCC  gas  turbine  that  can  provide  a  portion  of  the  compressed  air  to  the  oxygen 
plant.  This  reduces  the  capital  cost  of  the  compressors  while  also  decreasing  the 
amount  of  power  required  to  operate  the  oxygen  plant.  Additionally,  gas  turbines 
use  nitrogen  from  the  oxygen  plant  to  reduce  combustion  NOX as  well  as  increase 
power output. 
Existing IGCC Power Plants 

Fourteen gasification based power plants are operating around the world with one 
more  under  construction.  Total  capacity  for  these  fifteen  plants  is  4.1  gigawatts  of 
electricity. Numerous additional projects are planned. 

In the U.S. two coal-based IGCC’s have been in operation for more than a decade. 
The 262 MW Wabash River Coal Gasification Repowering Project (Wabash) in Indi-
ana  began  commercial  operation  in  November  1995  and  helped  pioneer  the  use  of 
coal gasification for power in the United States. Since 1995, this facility has gasified 
over 1.7 million tons of bituminous coal and over 2.0 million tons of petcoke. 

Tampa  Electric  Company  also  helped  pioneer  the  use  of  coal  gasification  tech-
nology for power generation in the United States. Tampa’s 250 MW Polk Power Sta-
tion near Lakeland, Florida, began operating in 1996 and serves 75,000 households. 
The Polk plant uses high sulfur Illinois and other coals, but also blends Power River 
Basin  coal  and  petcoke  in  order  to  reduce  fuel  costs.  The  Polk  Power  station  mar-
kets the slag from the gasifier for use in manufacturing roofing and concrete blocks. 
Sulfuric acid, another byproduct, goes into fertilizer production. 
What are the Environmental Benefits of Gasification? 

Besides fuel and product flexibility, gasification-based systems offer significant en-
vironmental  advantages  over  competing  technologies,  particularly  coal-to-electricity 
combustion systems. This advantage occurs because the net volume of syngas being 
treated  pre-combustion  in  an  IGCC  power  plant  is  1⁄100 (or  less)  than  the  volume 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

of  post-combustion  exhaust  gas  that  must  be  cleansed  in  a  conventional  coal-fired 
plant. 
Air Emissions 

Gasification  can  achieve  greater  air  emission  reductions  at  lower  cost  than  other 
technologies, such as supercritical pulverized coal. In fact, coal IGCC offers the low-
est  emissions  of  sulfur  dioxide  (SOX)  nitrogen  oxides  (NOX)  and  particulate  matter 
(PM) of any coal-based power production technology. In addition, mercury emissions 
can be removed from an IGCC plant at one-tenth the cost of removal for a coal com-
bustion  plant.  Technology  exists  today  to  remove  more  than  95  percent  of  the  mer-
cury from a gasification based plant. 
Solids Generation 

During  gasification,  virtually  all  of  the  carbon  in  the  feedstock  is  converted  to 
syngas. The mineral material in the feedstock separates from the gaseous products, 
and  the  ash  and  other  inert  materials  fall  to  the  bottom  of  the  gasifier  as  a  non- 
leachable,  glass-like  solid  or  other  marketable  material.  This  material  can  be  used 
for  many  construction  and  building  applications.  In  addition,  more  than  99  percent 
of the sulfur can be removed using commercially proven technologies and converted 
into marketable elemental sulfur or sulfuric acid. (See chart). 
Water Usage 

Gasification  uses  approximately  14  to  24  percent  less  water  to  produce  electric 
power  from  coal  compared  to  other  coal-based  technologies  and  water  losses  during 
operation  are  about  32  to  36  percent  less  than  other  coal-based  technologies.  This 
is  a  major  issue  in  many  countries—such  as  the  United  States—where  water  sup-
plies have already reached critical levels. 
Sustainability 

Gasification can help move industrial and electric power facilities toward sustain-
ability. It can reduce the environmental footprint from low-value waste materials by 
utilizing  them  as  feedstock;  rather  than  disposing  of  them.  By  extracting  the  use-
able energy from materials that would otherwise be treated as a waste and enabling 
reuse of waste waters, a facility can both reduce its environmental footprint and im-
prove its operating margins. 
Carbon Dioxide 

In  a  gasification  system,  CO2 can  be  captured  using  commercially  available  cap-
ture  technologies  before  it  would  otherwise  be  vented  to  the  atmosphere.  One  com-
mercially available removal technology that is used as part of carbon capture, called 
the water-gas shift reaction, is illustrated below: 

Converting the CO to CO2 prior to combustion is much simpler and more economi-
cal than doing so after combustion, effectively ‘‘de-carbonizing,’’ or at least reducing 
the carbon in the syngas. 

Plants manufacturing ammonia, hydrogen, fuels, or chemical products with a gas-
ification  system  routinely  capture  CO2 as  part  of  the  manufacturing  process.  The 
Dakota Gasification plant in Beulah, North Dakota, captures the CO, while making 
substitute  natural  gas.  Since  2000,  this  plant  has  sent  captured  CO2 via  pipeline 
to  EnCana’s  Weyburn  oil  fields  in  Saskatchewan,  Canada,  where  it  is  used  for  en-
hanced  oil  recovery.  To  date,  more  than  five  million  tons  of  CO2 has  been  seques-
tered. 

According to the Environmental Protection Agency the higher thermodynamic effi-
ciency  of  the  IGCC  cycle  minimizes  CO2 emissions  relative  to  other  technologies. 
IGCC plants offer today’s least-cost alternative for capturing CO2 from a coal-based 
power plant. In addition, IGCC will experience less of an energy penalty that other 
technologies  if  carbon  capture  is  added.  While  CO2 capture  and  sequestration  will 
increase  the  cost  of  all  forms  of  power  generation,  the  U.S.  Department  of  Energy 
estimates  that  the  cost  of  CO2 capture  for  a  power  plant  concluded  that  the  CO2 
capture  cost  is  10  percent  more  expensive  for  a  conventional  coal  plant  as  for  an 
IGCC power generation facility. 
What are the Economic Benefits of Gasification? 

Gasification  can  compete  effectively  in  high-price  energy  environments.  While  a 
gasification  plant  is  capital  intensive  (like  any  manufacturing  unit),  its  operating 
costs  are  potentially  lower  than  many  other  manufacturing  processes  or  coal  com-
bustion  plants  because  a  gasification  plant  can  use  low-cost  feedstocks,  such  as 
petcoke.  Due  to  continued  research  and  development  efforts  the  cost  of  these  units 
will continue to decrease. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

There are a number of significant economic benefits with gasification. Inherent in 
the  technology  is  its  ability  to  convert  low-value  feedstocks  to  high-value  products, 
thereby increasing the use of available energy in the feedstocks while reducing dis-
posal costs. The ability to produce a number of high-value products at the same time 
(polygeneration)  helps  a  facility  offset  its  capital  and  operating  costs.  In  addition, 
the principal gasification byproducts (sulfur and slag) are readily marketable. 

Gasification  offers  wide  fuel  flexibility.  A  gasification  plant  can  vary  the  mix  of 
the solid feedstocks or run on natural gas or liquid feedstocks when desirable. This 
technology  enables  an  industrial  facility  to  replace  its  high-priced  natural  gas  feed 
with  lower  priced  feedstocks,  such  as  coal  or  petcoke—thus  reducing  its  operating 
costs. 

For  example,  a  refinery  using  gasification  to  manufacture  hydrogen  and  steam 
can replace its natural gas feedstock with waste materials that may otherwise have 
to  be  disposed  of  (such  as  petcoke).  The  ability  to  use  lower  value  fuels  enables  a 
refinery  to  reduce  both  its  fuel  and  disposal  costs  while  producing  the  large  quan-
tities of hydrogen that are needed for cleaner transportation fuels. 

In  addition,  gasification  units  require  less  pollution  control  equipment  because 

they generate fewer emissions; further reducing the plant’s operating costs. 
What is the Gasification Market Outlook? 

Worldwide  gasification  capacity  is  projected  to  grow  70  percent  by  2015,  with  81 
percent  of  the  growth  occurring  in  Asia.  The  prime  movers  behind  this  expected 
growth are the chemical, fertilizer, and coal-to-liquids industries in China, oil sands 
in Canada, polygeneration (hydrogen and power or chemicals) in the United States, 
and refining in Europe. China is expected to achieve the most rapid growth in gas-
ification  worldwide.  There  are  seven  coal-to-substitute  natural  gas  gasification 
plants  under  development  and  twelve  proposed  IGCC  plants  in  China.  Since  2004, 
29 new gasification plants have been licensed and/or built in China. In contrast, no 
new gasification plants have started up in the United States since 2002. 

The  gasification  industry  in  the  United  States  faces  a  number  of  challenges,  in-
cluding,  rising  construction  costs  and  uncertainty  about  policy  incentives  and  regu-
lations.  Despite  these  challenges,  gasification  is  expected  to  grow  significantly  in 
this country. 

A number of factors will contribute to a growing interest in gasification, including 
volatile  oil  and  natural  gas  prices,  more  stringent  environmental  regulations,  and 
a growing consensus that CO2 management should be required in power generation 
and energy production. All of these factors contribute to a growing interest in gasifi-
cation worldwide. 
Energy Security 

America is at a critical juncture in meeting its electric generating needs. Natural 
gas  prices  are  volatile  and  while  new  natural  gas  supplies  are  being  developed, 
those  supplies  are  generally  located  outside  the  country.  In  addition,  there  is  in-
creasing  concern  about  the  need  to  diversify  U.S.  fuel  requirements.  Gasification  is 
a  technology  that  can  help  address  some  of  these  energy  security  concerns.  Gasifi-
cation  can  generate  electricity  and  produce  substitute  natural  gas  and  transpor-
tation fuels using major domestic resources such as coal or petroleum coke, thus re-
ducing U.S. dependence on both foreign oil and foreign natural gas. 
Bioprocessing 

In  addition  to  using  the  traditional  feedstocks  of  coal  and  petroleum  coke,  gasi-
fiers  can  utilize  biomass,  such  as  yard  and  crop  waste,  ‘‘energy  crops’’,  (such  as 
switch  grass),  and  waste  and  residual  pulp/paper  plant  materials  as  feed.  Munici-
palities  as  well  as  the  paper  and  agricultural  industries  are  looking  for  ways  to  re-
duce the disposal costs associated with these wastes and for technologies to produce 
electricity and other valuable products from these waste materials. While still in its 
infancy, biomass gasification shows a great deal of promise. 
A Link to the Future 

Gasification  is  a  ‘‘link’’  technology  to  a  hydrogen  economy.  Because  gasification 
converts feedstocks such as coal directly into hydrogen, it can become a competitive 
route to producing the large quantifies of hydrogen that will be needed for fuel cells 
and  cleaner  fuels.  By  contrast,  other  technologies  must  first  create  the  electricity 
needed  to  separate  the  hydrogen  from  water  using  electricity  or  expensive  natural 
gas. 
Conclusions and Recommendations 

Gasification is the cleanest, most flexible way of using fossil fuels. Currently, over 
80 percent of the installed worldwide gasification capacity is capturing CO2. Gasifi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

cation also provides the lowest cost option for capturing CO2 from a fossil-fuel based 
power plant. 

While  there  are  strong  advantages  to  gasification,  it  also  faces  a  number  of  chal-
lenges,  particularly  for  coal-to-power  applications.  The  following  are  needed  to  help 
with the widespread deployment of this technology: 

• Demonstration on a commercial scale of multiple IGCC power plants with CCS; 
• Policies  that  recognize  and  reward  the  ability  of 
industrial  gasification’’  (in-

volved in the manufacture of products and fuels) to offer large scale, near term 
opportunities for CCS at lower costs; and 
• A uniform national policy framework addressing carbon dioxide including incen-

tives and liability indemnification for early adopters. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much. 
Dr. Strakey? 

STATEMENT OF DR. JOSEPH P. STRAKEY, JR., CHIEF 

TECHNOLOGY OFFICER, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY, 

NATIONAL ENERGY TECHNOLOGY LABORATORY 

Dr.  STRAKEY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Ensign,  for  in-

viting me to testify on DOE’s coal gasification program. 

My  written  testimony  provides  additional  background  on  coal 
gasification,  and  to  summarize  it,  it’s  highly  flexible—gasification 
can  use  a  wide  variety  of  feedstocks,  and  it  can  also  produce  mul-
tiple  products,  including  fuels.  Pollutants  can  be  reduced  down  to 
almost  any  desired  level,  and  CO2 can  be  easily  concentrated  and 
captured.  I  think  we’re  truly  approaching  zero-emission  coal  tech-
nology. 

Senator KERRY. Can you—you mind pulling the mike a little clos-

Mr. STRAKEY. Sorry. 
Senator  KERRY.  And  could  you  just  repeat  the  last  sentence 

er? 

again? 

Mr.  STRAKEY.  I  think  we  are  truly  approaching  zero-emission 

coal technology. 

We are aggressively pursuing other options, as well, namely oxy- 
combustion,  and  post-combustion  capture  of  CO2.  We  don’t  expect 
to see a single winner, but we do believe that coal gasification will 
play a major role in our energy future. 

However,  there  are  significant  challenges  that  lie  ahead,  and 

that’s what I’d like to talk about today. 

Commercial  experience  with  coal  gasification  in  the  United 
States  is  somewhat  limited.  There  are  only  6  gasification  plants, 
and  three  of  those  are  operating  in  Integrated  Gasification  Com-
bined Cycle mode, to produce power. 

There is virtually no experience where IGCC has been integrated 
with carbon capture and storage. And that’s really one of the major 
goals of the FutureGen program. We think that without that dem-
onstration, it’s highly doubtful that any future plants would be able 
to be financed. 

I  also  think  that  two  such  demonstrations  would  be  a  lot  better 
and more convincing than one, and three would be better than two. 
Reliability  is  always  a  key  concern,  especially  when  new  tech-
nologies  are  introduced.  We  need  additional  demonstrations  in  the 
clean  coal  technology  program,  to  test  the  technologies  that  are  in 
the  pipeline,  and  convince  bankers  that  their  investment  risks  are 
acceptable. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

Our regional carbon sequestration partnerships are making great 
strides  in  advancing  our  knowledge  of  the  geologic  storage  of  car-
bon  dioxide  and  about  its  permanence  and  safety.  The  third  phase 
of  this  program  is  just  beginning,  where  large  volumes  of  CO2 will 
be injected into various geologic formations, and its movement will 
be closely monitored and studied. 

The  outcome  of  these  tests  will  be  crucial  to  the  public  accept-

ance of zero-emission coal technology. 

Results of the Carbon Sequestration Regional Partnership’s anal-
ysis  of  the  capacity  in  the  United  States  to  store  carbon  are  very 
large.  Deep  saline  formations  could  store  all  of  the  CO2 emissions 
for North America for over 500 years, according to their upper esti-
mate. 

The  storage  capacity  for  enhanced  oil  recovery,  however,  is  a  lot 
lower.  And  it’s  also  geographically  limited.  We  need  IGCC  dem-
onstrations that are coupled with storage in deep saline formations. 
I would say that moving toward climate stabilization is an enor-
mous  global  challenge—we  need  really  big  solutions,  here.  Partial 
solutions, such as 50 percent carbon capture, or ‘‘as good as natural 
gas,’’  just  won’t  cut  it.  We  need  to  target  capture  levels  that  ap-
proach 90 percent. 

The increased cost for carbon capture and storage is a very major 
concern.  For  IGCC,  our  studies  indicate  that  CCS  adds  about  36 
percent  to  the  cost  of  electricity.  For  the  combustion  route,  it  adds 
over  80  percent.  A  large  part  of  that  huge  cost  increase  is  due  to 
the  large  parasitic  power  that’s  required  to  run  the  CCS  equip-
ment—it cuts the output of the plant by over 30 percent. 

I  recently  asked  some  of  our  systems  analysis  folks  what  I 
thought  was  a  simple  question—how  much  would  it  cost  to  imple-
ment  CCS,  nationwide,  out  to  2030?  I  guess  I  should  have  known 
that modelers don’t give simple answers to simple questions. 

They  analyzed  the  scenario  of  a  $30  a  ton  carbon  tax,  using  a 
modification  of  EIA’s  NEMS  model,  to  project  how  widely  CCS 
technology  would  penetrate,  both  in  the  new  and  retrofit  market. 
Their  analysis  showed  that  40  gigawatts  in  new  IGCC  would  be 
added, along with 100 gigawatts of retrofitted CCS capacity. In ad-
dition,  it  would  take  another  30  gigawatts  of  new  IGCC  capacity, 
just around the carbon capture equipment on those older plants. 

The total tab attributed both to the CCS portion, alone, would be 
$240 billion—that’s $240 billion—and that’s just the capital compo-
nent of the cost. 

We  think  that  R&D  is  the  key  idea  on  how  we’re  going  to  get 
that  enormous  cost-adder  down.  Our  program  looks  forward  to  get 
it  to  less  than  a  10  percent  increase  in  the  cost  of  electricity,  and 
we  are  on  a  pathway  to  get  there.  My  written  testimony  provided 
some specifics on the advantages we are pursuing. 

Turning to FutureGen—— 
Senator ENSIGN. Dr. Strakey? 
Mr. STRAKEY. Yes? 
Senator ENSIGN. If I may, Mr. Chairman? 
Did  they  do  any  cost  comparisons?  Because  natural  gas  is  pro-
jected to skyrocket in cost, were those comparisons done in relation 
to the increases projected in natural gas? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

Mr. STRAKEY. Yes. The NEMS analysis allows other technologies 
to  play  against  the  higher  cost  of  the  $30  a  ton  carbon  tax  added 
on to coal, and you get a different mix of what would occur, includ-
ing natural gas, nuclear, renewables, and so on. 

One  of  the  issues  that  you  may  be  interested  in,  is  that  the 
NEMS analysis, or the model, projects a fairly low price for natural 
gas—I don’t recall what it was offhand, but that would also, as you 
mentioned, impact the penetration of coal technology. 

Returning  to  FutureGen,  I’ve  provided  some  background  on  why 
we  need  one  or  more  commercial-scale  IGCC  demonstrations,  inte-
grated  with  carbon  capture  and  storage  in  deep  saline  formations. 
I  also  outlined  why  we  need  to  demonstrate  carbon  capture  levels 
approaching 90 percent. Basically, that is FutureGen, the keystone 
of our program. 

We’re  facing  major  challenges,  and  I  think  we  have  an  oppor-
tunity  to  lead  the  way  with  coal  gasification  and  carbon  capture 
and sequestration. 

Mr. Chairman, members of the Committee, thank you, that com-

pletes my statement. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Strakey follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. JOSEPH P. STRAKEY, JR., CHIEF TECHNOLOGY OFFICER, 

NATIONAL ENERGY TECHNOLOGY LABORATORY, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY 

Thank you Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee. I appreciate this oppor-
tunity  to  provide  testimony  on  the  Department  of  Energy’s  (DOE’s)  Coal  Gasifi-
cation Research and Development (R&D) Program. 

The  economic  prosperity  of  the  United  States  over  the  past  century  has  largely 
been  built  upon  an  abundance  of  fossil  fuels  in  North  America.  The  United  States’ 
fossil  fuel  resources  represent  a  tremendous  national  asset.  Making  full  use  of  this 
domestic  asset  in  a  responsible  manner  enables  the  country  to  fulfill  its  energy  re-
quirements,  minimize  detrimental  environmental  impacts,  positively  contribute  to 
national security, and provide for the economic welfare of its citizens. 

Coal  gasification,  when  done  in  conjunction  with  carbon  capture  and  storage 
(CCS), is one technology option that offers our Nation an attractive approach to uti-
lize  our  indigenous  fossil  energy  resources  in  a  more  efficient  and  environmentally 
sound manner for producing clean, affordable power from coal with dramatically re-
duced  carbon  emissions.  Coal  gasification  with  CCS  can  also  reduce  the  carbon  im-
pact  of  using  coal  to  produce  ultra-clean  fuels  for  the  transportation  sector,  sub-
stitute  natural  gas  (SNG)  to  heat  our  homes  and  fuel  our  industrial  sector,  fer-
tilizers to ensure an abundant food supply, and chemicals that play an integral part 
in our every day lives. 

Another  coal  gasification  concept  that  could  further  reduce  carbon  dioxide  (CO2) 
emissions  is  co-feeding  coal  and  biomass  into  gasifiers  to  produce  electricity  or  con-
ventional transportation fuels. The transportation fuels application is referred to as 
the coal-biomass-to-liquids (CBTL) process. When combined with CCS, CBTL can re-
duce the greenhouse gas footprint of the fuel by 20 percent (compared to petroleum) 
with  the  addition  of  roughly  10–18  percent  by  weight  biomass  to  the  coal  while  re-
maining  cost  competitive  at  today’s  world  oil  prices.  Similar  benefits  in  reduction 
of  carbon  emissions  can  be  achieved  by  co-feeding  coal  and  biomass  for  electricity 
generation in advanced gasification-based systems. 

Gasification-based  processes  are  an  efficient  and  environmentally  friendly  way  to 
produce  low-cost  electricity,  compared  with  other  conventional  coal-conversion  proc-
esses. For power generation applications, gasification technology utilizes 30–50 per-
cent  less  water  and  produces  about  one-half  the  amount  of  solid  wastes  as  conven-
tional  power  plants.  By  the  very  nature  of  the  process,  sulfur  oxides,  nitrogen  ox-
ides,  mercury,  particulates,  and  other  emissions  can  be  reduced  to  near-zero  levels 
and gasification is often the least expensive approach for the capture of CO2. 

The  gasification  of  coal  dates  back  as  far  as  the  end  of  the  eighteenth  century, 
and by the middle of the nineteenth century the basic underlying principles of gas-
ification  were  fairly  well  understood.  The  use  of  gasification  was  very  prominent  in 
the latter part of the nineteenth century and the first half of the twentieth century 
for  the  production  of  town  gas  for  residential  and  industrial  use.  Although  this  ap-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

plication  has  nearly  vanished,  due  to  its  displacement  by  inexpensive  natural  gas 
and  petroleum,  new  applications  evolved  in  the  industrial  and  manufacturing  sec-
tors. 

Gasification  is  at  the  heart  of  many  processes  that  offer  industry  low-cost,  reli-
able,  and  highly-efficient  options  for  meeting  a  host  of  market  applications.  Gasifi-
cation-based systems are capable of utilizing all carbon-based feedstocks, either sep-
arately or in combination with one another, including coal, petroleum coke, biomass, 
municipal  and  hazardous  wastes.  In  the  gasification  process,  carbon-based  feed-
stocks  are  converted  in  the  gasifier  in  the  presence  of  steam  and  oxygen  at  high 
temperatures and moderate pressure to synthesis gas, a mixture of carbon monoxide 
and  hydrogen.  The  synthesis  gas  is  cleaned  of  particulates,  sulfur,  ammonia, 
chlorides, mercury, and other trace contaminants to predetermined levels consistent 
with further downstream processing applications. At this point, various options exist 
for  the  utilization  of  the  synthesis  gas.  In  one  option,  Integrated  Gasification  Com-
bined  Cycle  (IGCC)  for  the  production  of  electricity,  the  cleaned  synthesis  gas  is 
combusted in a high-efficiency gas turbine/generator, and the heat from the turbine 
exhaust  gas  is  extracted  to  produce  steam  to  drive  a  steam  turbine/generator.  Fur-
thermore,  IGCC  can  be  readily  adapted  for  concentrating,  capturing,  and  seques-
tering CO2. 

In  addition  to  being  used  for  power  generation,  a  portion  or  all  of  the  synthesis 
gas can be chemically shifted (by reaction with steam) to a mixture of hydrogen (H2) 
and  CO2.  Here  the  H2 and  CO2 can  be  separated,  with  the  hydrogen  being  used  in 
the gas turbine or highly efficient fuel cells for the production of electricity in a car-
bon-constrained world, while the CO2 can be captured and sequestered. The shifted 
synthesis  gas  can  also  be  processed  in  chemical  reactors  to  produce  high-quality 
transportation  fuels,  SNG,  and  chemicals.  Gasification-based  systems  are  the  only 
advanced  processes  within  the  Department’s  research  portfolio  that  are  capable  of 
co-producing both power as well as a wide variety of commodity and premium prod-
ucts to meet future market requirements. 

Today, there are nineteen gasification plants operating in the United States. Nine 
of  these  plants  use  natural  gas  to  produce  carbon  monoxide  and  hydrogen  for  syn-
thesis  of  chemicals  and  petroleum  refining,  four  use  petroleum-based  liquids  for 
chemicals  production,  and  six  operate  using  solid  feedstocks,  i.e.,  coal  and/or  petro-
leum coke. Of the six solid-feed gasification plants, two produce chemicals, three op-
erate as IGCC power plants, and one produces SNG. The following are examples of 
gasification plants in operation in the United States today. 

The  largest  operating  coal  gasification  plant  in  the  United  States  is  the  Dakota 
Gasification  Company’s  Great  Plains  Synfuels  Plant  in  Beulah,  North  Dakota.  This 
plant  was  constructed  with  a  loan  guarantee  from  the  Department  of  Energy  and 
began  operation  in  1984.  The  plant  has  a  capacity  for  producing  up  to  170  million 
cubic  feet  per  day  of  SNG  from  nearly  18,500  tons  per  day  of  North  Dakota  lignite 
from an adjacent mine. The SNG is injected into an existing natural gas distribution 
pipeline to the Midwest. It should be noted that while the plant was a technical suc-
cess,  it  was  not  a  financial  success:  in  1985  the  project  sponsors  defaulted  on  the 
loan,  due  in  part  to  falling  natural  gas  prices  at  the  time,  and  the  U.S.  Treasury 
paid $1.550 billion to cover the guarantee. 

Eastman  Chemical  Company  operates  two  coal  gasifiers  at  its  Kingsport,  Ten-
nessee,  chemical  complex.  Approximately  1,200  tons  per  day  of  eastern  bituminous 
coal  is  converted  to  synthesis  gas  that  is  used  as  the  building  blocks  for  nearly  75 
percent  of  the  chemical  products  produced  at  the  plant.  Many  of  the  products  from 
this  plant  find  their  way  into  every  day  household  products  such  as  scotch  tape, 
screwdriver  handles,  Kodak  35-mm  film,  and  flat  screen  TV  panels.  In  addition, 
products such as Tylenol and NutraSweet also have their origins in coal from this 
facility. 

The Coffeyville Resources Nitrogen Fertilizer plant located in Coffeyville, Kansas, 
is  the  only  other  solid-feed  gasification  plant  focusing  on  chemicals  production, 
namely ammonia and urea fertilizer. This plant began operation in 2000 and today 
is the lowest cost manufacturer of nitrogen-based fertilizer products in North Amer-
ica. 

Three  IGCC  power  plants  using  solid  feedstocks  are  in  operation  today  in  the 
United  States—Tampa  Electric’s  Polk  Power  Station  in  Tampa,  Florida  (250  MWe); 
SG  Solutions  Wabash  River  plant  in  West  Terre  Haute,  Indiana  (262  MWe);  and 
Valero’s  Delaware  Clean  Energy  Cogeneration  project  in  Delaware  City,  Delaware 
(160  MWe).  The  Florida  and  Indiana  projects  both  received  Federal  cost-share 
through  DOE’s  Clean  Coal  Technology  Program.  These  two  projects  successfully 
demonstrated coal-fueled IGCC and have been instrumental in giving the utility in-
dustry  confidence  in  IGCC  technology  and  in  generating  commercial  interest  in 
IGCC deployment. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

The  Department’s  Office  of  Fossil  Energy  (FE),  which  manages  research  efforts 
within  the  Gasification  Program  that  are  implemented  by  the  National  Energy 
Technology  Laboratory,  recognizes  the  complex  energy  and  environmental  chal-
lenges  facing  America  today.  To  address  these  needs,  FE  has  a  core  coal  R&D  pro-
gram  that  provides  for  the  development  of  affordable  and  environmentally  effective 
technologies  to  use  coal.  This  core  coal  R&D  program  includes  not  only  the  Coal 
Gasification  Program  but  also  the  Advanced  Research  (advanced  materials,  sensors 
and  controls,  and  computational  modeling),  Advanced  Turbines,  Carbon  Sequestra-
tion, Fuel Cells, Hydrogen and Fuels, and Innovations for Existing Plants Programs. 
DOE  is  developing  advanced  gasification  technologies  to  meet  the  most  stringent 
environmental regulations in any state, and to facilitate the efficient capture of CO2 
for  subsequent  sequestration—a  pathway  to  ‘‘near-zero  atmospheric  emission’’  coal- 
based  energy.  Gasification  plants  are  complex  systems  that  rely  on  a  large  number 
of  interconnected  processes  and  technologies.  Advancements  in  the  state-of-the-art, 
as  well  as  development  of  novel  approaches,  could  expand  technical  pathways  and 
enable gasification to meet the demands of future markets while contributing to en-
ergy security. 

Technical  Issues/Hurdles—A  technical  report  prepared  by  the  Gasification  Pro-
gram  in  July  2002,  ‘‘Gasification  Markets  and  Technologies—Present  and  Future: 
An  Industry  Perspective,’’  specifically  outlines  key  technology  issues  affecting  the 
commercial  acceptance  and  deployment  of  gasification-based  processes.  Our  coal  re-
search  efforts  in  gasification  are  aimed  at  addressing  these  key  issues,  and  good 
progress  continues  to  be  made  toward  their  resolution.  Foremost  at  that  time  was 
the  need  to  improve  process  reliability  and  reduce  capital  cost.  More  recently,  our 
research  has  expanded  to  address  the  cost  and  integration  of  gasification,  particu-
larly IGCC, with CCS. 

Areas  identified  as  significantly  impacting  process  reliability  included  refractory 
wear,  feed-injector  life,  and  high-temperature  measurement  instrumentation.  Areas 
targeted for capital cost reduction efforts included improved feeding systems capable 
of  handling  multiple  feedstocks,  lower  cost  air-separation  technologies,  and  high- 
temperature  gas  cleaning  capable  of  deep  removal  of  all  contaminants.  Some  of  the 
significant research programs addressing these issues are described below. 

Ion  Transport  Membranes—Conventional  cryogenic  air-separation  technologies 
used  in  today’s  gasification  plants  are  both  capital  and  energy  intensive.  Typically, 
the cryogenic air separation constitutes 12–15 percent of the cost of an IGCC plant 
and can consume upwards of 10 percent of its gross power output. A promising tech-
nology  being  developed  today  that  offers  significant  potential  for  cost  and  parasitic 
power  reductions  are  known  as  Ion  Transport  Membranes  (ITM).  This  technology 
has  been  under  development  by  the  Department,  in  partnership  with  Air  Products 
and  Chemicals,  Inc.  (APCI),  for  nearly  10  years.  During  this  time,  ITM  technology 
has  progressed  from  fundamental  materials  development  to  the  operation  of  full- 
scale membranes and half-size modules in a 5 ton-per-day unit operating at APCI’s 
Sparrows  Point  industrial  gas  facility  near  Baltimore,  Maryland.  Engineering  anal-
yses  have  consistently  shown  nearly  a  35  percent  reduction  in  the  capital  cost  of 
the  air-separation  unit  for  an  IGCC  plant  and  nearly  a  one-point  gain  in  thermal 
efficiency. To achieve maximum benefit, the ITM must be integrated with a gas tur-
bine.  The  program  is  in  its  third  phase  of  development  that  will  culminate  in  the 
integrated  testing  of  a  150  ton-per-day  process  module  with  a  gas  turbine  that  will 
be  located  at  an  existing  coal  gasificationsite  in  2010.  Upon  successful  completion 
of this phase, plans are being discussed for further scale-up to a 1,500 to 2,000 ton- 
per-day prototype unit. 

High-Temperature Gas Cleanup—Removing sulfur and other impurities from coal- 
derived  gas  in  an  IGCC  plant  generally  accounts  for  10–12  percent  of  the  capital 
investment  of  the  plant  to  meet  recent  emissions  standards.  It  is  recognized  that 
deep-cleaning technologies are required to meet future near-zero emission standards 
from coal-fired power plants, as well as achieve the desired synthesis gas purity for 
the  production  of  transportation  fuels  and  chemicals.  Technologies  for  such  deep 
cleaning are available, but are very costly and inefficient due to their low tempera-
ture of operation. Development of innovative deep-cleaning technologies that operate 
at  process  temperatures  consistent  with  downstream  processing  applications,  i.e., 
400 to 900 degrees Fahrenheit, would provide significant benefits. Although several 
approaches  are  being  investigated,  the  most  advanced  employs  a  high-temperature, 
zinc-based  sorbent  in  a  transport  reactor.  Over  3,000  hours  of  operation  with  this 
particular sorbent have recently been completed using coal-derived synthesis gas at 
Eastman Chemical Company. Planning is in progress for slipstream testing of a 50- 
MWe size unit at a commercial gasificationsite. 

Coal-Feed  Pumps—The  development  of  coal-feed  pumps  will  reduce  the  cost  and 
improve the efficiency of all gasification-based processes. They will also improve the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

economics  of  utilization  of  vast  low-rank  coal  reserves.  With  DOE  support,  Stamet 
Incorporated successfully developed a single-stage rotary feed pump that has the ca-
pability  of  injecting  high-moisture  coal  into  the  high-pressure  gasifier—up  to  1,000 
psig.  In  2007,  General  Electric  purchased  Stamet  for  use  with  their  gasifier  tech-
nology  to  make  their  technology  suitable  for  low-rank  coal  gasification.  Concur-
rently,  DOE  was  engaged  with  Pratt  &  Whitney  Rocketdyne  to  also  develop  a  coal- 
feed  pump.  Detailed  design  of  a  400  ton-per-day  pump  is  in  progress  and  testing 
is scheduled to begin in late Fiscal Year 2009. 

H2 and CO2 Separation Membranes—Today’s technologies for CO2 removal impose 
significant  impacts  on  the  thermal  efficiency  and  capital  cost  of  IGCC  plants.  It  is 
believed  that  this  impact  can  be  greatly  reduced  through  the  use  of  advanced  tech-
nologies such as membranes for separation. Furthermore, cost-effective and efficient 
gas separation technologies are vital in any chemical process operation and will im-
pact  the  overall  cost  of  the  system.  For  the  production  of  hydrogen  from  coal,  gas 
separation  is  required  for  the  separation  of  the  shifted  synthesis  gas  stream  into 
pure  H2 and  CO2 streams.  Separation  of  hydrogen  from  shifted  synthesis  gas  is  a 
key unit operation of any gasification-based hydrogen production system. The Gasifi-
cation  Program  and  its  partner,  Eltron  Research  and  Development  Company,  are 
pursuing  the  development  of  a  dense  metallic-based  membrane  to  reduce  the  cost 
and increase the performance of hydrogen separation. This membrane has achieved 
nearly all of DOE’s 2015 performance goals for membrane-based systems. The Fuels 
program is also working on hydrogen separation technologies. 

Coal/Biomass  Gasification—The  process  for  turning  gasified  coal  and/or  biomass 
into  liquid  transportation  fuels  is  mature  and  commercially  available,  with  tech-
nology  improvements  driven  by  the  marketplace.  However,  the  technology  for  co- 
feeding  and  gasifying  coal-biomass  mixtures  is  not  commercially  available.  DOE’s 
program  includes  development  of  technology  for  co-feeding  and  gasifying  coal/bio-
mass for electricity generation application. As with much of DOE’s gasification pro-
gram,  DOE’s  FY  2009  coal/biomass  research  targets  electricity  generation  applica-
tions,  but  could  also  be  used  by  the  private  sector  for  other  applications,  such  as 
production  of  transportation  fuels.  Co-feeding  of  coal  and  biomass  up  to  about  20 
percent by weight is well within the range of operability for large-scale plants. Oper-
ators  of  the  NUON  IGCC  plant  in  Buggenum,  The  Netherlands,  successfully  fed  a 
mixture  of  coal  and  30  percent  (by  weight)  demolition  wood  into  a  high-pressure, 
entrained-flow gasifier. 

Gasification  and  Carbon  Sequestration—DOE  is  taking  a  leadership  role  in  the 
development of CCS technologies. The Carbon Sequestration Program is addressing 
the  key  challenges  that  confront  the  wide-scale  deployment  of  capture  and  storage 
technologies  through  research  on  cost-effective  capture  technologies;  monitoring, 
mitigation,  and  verification  technologies  to  ensure  permanent  storage;  permitting 
issues;  liability  issues;  public  outreach;  and  infrastructure  needs.  Gasification  tech-
nology  holds  substantial  promise  as  the  best  coal  conversion  technology  option  to 
utilize  carbon  capture  technologies.  The  Gasification  Program  is  aggressively  pur-
suing  developments  to  reduce  the  cost  of  carbon  capture  so  that  the  cost  of  elec-
tricity to the public will result in an increase of less than 10 percent for new gasifi-
cation-based energy plants. 

FutureGen—The  Department’s  FutureGen  program  offers  a  key  opportunity  to 
validate  gasification  technology  coupled  with  CCS  in  commercial  settings.  In  light 
of recent proposals for over 30 gasification-based commercial coal plants throughout 
the  United  States,  and  the  potential  siting  issues  that  may  require  these  plants  to 
have carbon capture capability, the restructured FutureGen focuses on multiple gas-
ification  technology  demonstrations  with  CCS  in  commercial  plant  settings.  With 
this new strategy, the Department will help fund the CCS portion of the demonstra-
tion  unit  of  the  overall  plant,  thereby  limiting  the  Department’s,  and  taxpayer’s, 
cost  exposure.  This  restructured  approach  allows  DOE  to  maximize  the  role  of  pri-
vate sector innovation, provide a ceiling on Federal contributions, and accelerate the 
Administration’s goal of increasing the use of clean energy technologies to help meet 
the steadily growing demand for energy while also mitigating greenhouse gas emis-
sions. 

In  today’s  business  environment,  markets  and  market  drivers  are  changing  at  a 
rapid  pace.  Environmental  performance  is  a  much  greater  factor  now  than  in  pre-
vious  years  as  emission  standards  tighten.  In  addition,  the  reduction  of  CO2 emis-
sions  is  one  of  the  major  challenges  facing  industry  in  response  to  global  climate 
change.  To  help  meet  these  challenges,  there  is  a  need  for  more  environmentally 
sound,  flexible,  efficient,  and  reliable  systems  that  still  meet  the  ever-present  de-
mand  for  higher  profitability.  Gasification  is  a  technology  that  is  poised  to  meet 
these requirements. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Mr. Chairman, Members of the Committee, this completes my statement. I would 

be happy to take any questions you may have. 

30 

Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you,  Dr.  Strakey.  I  look  forward  to  fol-

lowing up on that. 

Mr. Mudd, FutureGen Alliance? 

STATEMENT OF MICHAEL J. MUDD, CEO, 

FUTUREGEN ALLIANCE, INC. 

Mr. MUDD. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
It’s an honor to be here, thank you also, Senator Ensign, Senator 

Stevens. My name is Michael Mudd—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Pull  that  there,  will  you?  Would  you  just  pull  it 

toward you? There you go. 

Mr. MUDD. Well, my name is Michael Mudd, I’m the Chief Exec-
utive  Officer  of  the  FutureGen  Alliance,  formed  at  the  request  of 
the U.S. Department of Energy to co-fund, design and construct the 
world’s  first  near-zero  emission  IGCC  plant  with  90  percent  CO2 
capture and carbon sequestration. 

The Alliance is a nonprofit, global consortium comprised of 13 en-
ergy  and  power  companies  throughout  the  world.  Prior  to  my  cur-
rent position, I had the honor of working for over 30 years at Amer-
ican  Electric  Power,  where  I  spent  a  lot  of  time  managing  clean 
coal technology projects, including IGCC. 

My remarks today will address the FutureGen partnership—— 
Senator  KERRY.  American  Electric  Power  has  a  couple  of  plants 

that are IGCC now, right? Aren’t they building one in Ohio? 

Mr.  MUDD.  AEP  is  planning  to  build  two  IGCC  plants—one  in 

Ohio, and one in West Virginia, that is correct, Mr. Chairman. 

Senator KERRY. Right. 
Mr.  MUDD.  My  remarks  will  address  the  FutureGen  partnership 
and  the  impact  of  the  DOE’s  proposed  restructuring.  The  details 
are  in  my  written  remarks,  and  what  I’d  like  to  talk  about  today 
is three things which I will now summarize. 

The  first  one  is  FutureGen  located  at  Mattoon,  Illinois  is  in  the 
national  interest,  and  is  advancing  IGCC  technology  with  carbon 
capture and sequestration faster and further than any other project 
in  the  world.  Climate  technologies  must  be  globally  accepted  and 
globally deployed in order for them to have maximum impact. 

FutureGen  at  Mattoon  includes  international  involvement  at  an 
unprecedented  level,  with  13  companies  from  6  continents  taking 
part.  As  a  nonprofit  enterprise,  the  FutureGen  Alliance  will  be  in 
a  position  to  broadly  share  the  information  from  the  project.  This 
will  help  to  deploy  such  near-zero  emission  power  plants  through-
out the world. 

FutureGen at Mattoon will also meet all of the goals of the DOE 
program,  most  importantly—as  Dr.  Strakey  said—90  percent  car-
bon capture, which DOE has reported to Congress as critical to our 
energy future. 

FutureGen  at  Mattoon  also  fully  integrates  IGCC  and  carbon 
capture  and  sequestration  technology.  The  size  of  the  components 
are  at  a  full-commercial  scale,  therefore  it  will  validate  that  per-
formance and help to get it into the marketplace more quickly. 

With  respect  to  progress,  FutureGen  at  Mattoon  has  5  years  of 
demonstrated  success,  using  a  first-of-a-kind  siting  process  which 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

can, and should, serve as a model for future plants, a site has been 
ready—has  been  picked,  and  is  ready  to  go.  This  includes  identi-
fying  all  of  the  very  complex  issues  associated  with  injecting  CO2 
in these geologic formations—the legal, the liability, the regulatory 
and  geology—all  very  critical,  all  are  paving  new  paths  that  have 
not been done before. 

A  nearly  2,000-page  final  Environmental  Impact  Statement  has 
been  issued  by  the  Department  of  Energy,  which  proves  that  the 
Mattoon  site  is  acceptable  from  an  environmental  perspective.  A 
team  of  nearly  50  engineers  and  scientists  have  completed  an  ini-
tial design of the plant, and a cost for the plant. 

FutureGen  at  Mattoon  has  made  more  progress  in  advancing 
IGCC  technology  with  carbon  capture  and  sequestration  than  any 
other project in the world. 

The  second  theme  is  about  the  project  costs.  It  is  important  to 
remember  that  all  major  energy  projects  are  being  impacted  by 
rapidly  rising  prices  of  commodity,  equipment,  steel,  concrete,  and 
so on. FutureGen at Mattoon’s unique financing structure mitigates 
taxpayer  exposure.  The  Alliance  members  have  pledged  approxi-
mately  $400  million  to  the  project,  and  will  return  all  of  the  esti-
mated $300 million in plan revenue back to the project, will direct 
all  of  the  post-project  revenue  from  the  sale  of  power  to  benefit 
public R&D. 

Industry  financial  contributors  will  never  receive  a  single  dollar 
of financial return. Such a financial arrangement is unprecedented 
in such a public-private partnership. 

The  final  theme  of  my  testimony  is  that  the  DOE’s  proposed  re-
structuring  falls  short  of  addressing  the  national  need  for  tech-
nology  enhancement.  The  restructuring  will  result  in  an  unaccept-
able termination of FutureGen at Mattoon, in favor of projects that 
will delay technology development by 5 years, or more. 

DOE’s  proposed  restructuring  leaves  many  unanswered  ques-
tions,  which  are  addressed  in  my  written  testimony.  It  is  my  hope 
that the ongoing Congressional review surrounding IGCC, and car-
bon  capture  and  sequestration,  will  bring  an  appropriate  spotlight 
on  the  urgent  need  for  large-scale  projects.  There  remains  an  op-
portunity  for  the  U.S.  Government  to  reassert  its  position  that 
FutureGen at Mattoon is a top priority project for advancing IGCC 
and CCS, with carbon capture and sequestration. 

FutureGen at Mattoon should not be terminated, but instead, we 
need  additional  projects.  In  this  way,  DOE  can  reassume  its  posi-
tion  as  a  global  leader  in  near-zero  emission  coal  plants,  and  CCS 
development. 

That concludes my opening remarks, and I welcome further ques-

tions. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Mudd follows:] 

PREPARED STATMENT OF MICHAEL J. MUDD, CEO, FUTUREGEN ALLIANCE, INC. 
The  FutureGen  program  is  a  global  public-private  partnership  formed  to  design, 
build,  and  operate  the  world’s  first  near-zero  emission  coal-fueled  power  plant  with 
90  percent  capture  and  storage  of  carbon  dioxide  (CO2).  It  will  determine  the  tech-
nical  and  economic  feasibility  of  generating  electricity  from  coal  with  near-zero 
emission technology. FutureGen has 5 years of progress behind it and is positioned 
to  advance  Integrated  Gasification  Combined  Cycle  (IGCC)  and  carbon  capture  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

sequestration  (CCS)  technology  faster  and  further  than  any  other  program  in  the 
world.  The  location  of  the  plant  will  be  Mattoon,  Illinois.  The  nonprofit  structure 
of  the  FutureGen  Alliance,  and  involvement  of  thirteen  companies  that  operate  on 
six  continents,  is  consistent  with  its  mission  to  facilitate  rapid  deployment  of  near- 
zero  emission  technology  not  only  in  the  United  States,  but  throughout  the  world. 
Climate change is one of the most pressing environmental concerns, and it is clear 
that  Congress  intends  to  develop  policies  to  address  this  concern.  Irrespective  of 
which  specific  climate  policy  is  ultimately  adopted  by  the  U.S.,  the  success  of  that 
policy  and  our  economic  future,  will  hinge  on  the  availability  of  affordable  low-car-
bon  technology.  Nuclear,  renewables,  biomass,  and  efficiency  will  all  be  part  of  the 
low-carbon  technology  solution.  However,  given  that  coal  is  used  to  generate  over 
50  percent  of  the  electricity  in  the  U.S.  and  is  projected  to  remain  the  backbone  of 
the  U.S.  electricity  system  for  most  of  this  century,  and  the  growing  economies  of 
China and India will be fueled with coal plants, the availability of affordable, near- 
zero emission coal technology, incorporating carbon capture and sequestration, is es-
sential to our future energy security. 

The  Federal  Government  has  a  pivotal  role  to  play  in  fostering  the  development, 
demonstration and deployment of near-zero emission coal technology. It is important 
that, as a Nation, we invest at the scale required to develop, prove, and deploy CCS 
technologies  to  the  marketplace.  While  estimates  vary,  the  required  investment  is 
certainly in excess of $10 billion over the coming decade. This investment in our Na-
tion’s future must be supported by the development and demonstration of near-zero 
emission coal technologies and CCS in a variety of applications. 

The  U.S.  Department  of  Energy  (DOE)  is  to  be  commended  for  its  vocal  support 
of  near-zero  emission  coal  technology,  including  CCS.  Its  support  of  this  technology 
was  recognized  in  its  support  of  the  FutureGen  program  as  originally  envisioned, 
but  a  recent  proposal  to  restructure  FutureGen  fails  to  recognize  the  scale  of  the 
challenge  that  this  Nation,  and  indeed  the  world,  is  facing.  DOE’s  proposal  to  re-
structure the FutureGen program will delay technology development and integrated 
demonstration  of  commercial  scale  CCS  by  5  years  or  more.  It  backs  away  from  a 
nonprofit  partnership  that  was  created,  at  the  request  of  DOE,  to  act  in  the  public 
benefit  and  broadly  share  its  technical  results  throughout  the  world.  It  rebuffs  the 
participation of international companies (and countries) that are critical to the ulti-
mate  deployment  of  clean  coal  technology  around  the  world,  and  it  undermines  the 
reliability  of  the  U.S.  Department  of  Energy—and  the  United  States—as  a  depend-
able partner. 

Therefore, regardless of what other projects or what type of structuring DOE pro-
poses,  it  is  essential  that  the  Department  reaffirms  the  Unites  States’  position  as 
a  global  leader  in  near-zero  emission  coal  technology  and  CCS  development  by 
maintaining  the  position  that  DOE  has  stated  numerous  times  prior  to  its  an-
nouncement of restructuring: that FutureGen at Mattoon is the top priority program 
in advancing CCS technologies. 
FutureGen at Mattoon 

FutureGen,  located  in  Mattoon  Illinois,  is  in  the  national  interest  and  is  advanc-
ing  IGCC  technology  with  CCS  faster  and  further  than  any  other  project  in  the 
world. 

• FutureGen  at  Mattoon  offers  DOE  an  opportunity  to  beat  its  proposed  timeline. 
DOE’s January 15, 2008 Request for Information (RFI) suggests an on-line date 
of 2015 for projects using its restructured plan. The FutureGen Alliance has al-
ready delivered 5 years of progress, including contract negotiations, an enthusi-
astic and committed local community, a site that is technically and legally ready 
to go, a design and cost estimate, a final environmental impact statement, ven-
dor  relationships,  and  a  team  of  fifty  engineers  and  scientists.  No  fully  inte-
grated,  near-zero  emission  power-plant  project  in  the  world  can  compete  with 
FutureGen in terms of its ability to move forward with urgency on the required 
technology development and demonstration. 
• FutureGen  at  Mattoon  will  meet  or  exceed  all  DOE  emissions  and  CO2 capture 
goals.  All  emissions  and  CO2 capture  criteria  included  in  the  2004  FutureGen 
Report  to  Congress  and  DOE’s  current  Request  for  Information  (RFI)  will  be 
met  by  FutureGen  at  Mattoon,  including  90  percent  CO2 capture.  It  is  impera-
tive  that  DOE  maintain  the  requirement  of  90  percent  CO2 capture  from  the 
entire facility for the FutureGen program. 
• FutureGen  at  Mattoon  is  fully  integrated  and  commercial  scale.  FutureGen  at 
Mattoon  incorporates  a  commercial-scale  gasifier  and  commercial-scale  ‘‘Frame 
7’’  turbine.  As  configured,  and  with  the  commitment  to  share  lessons  learned 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

widely, it gives industry a chance to learn about the cost, performance, and op-
erating strategies for an integrated system with CCS. 

• Public  benefit  and  information  sharing  is  a  hallmark  of  FutureGen  at  Mattoon. 
As  a  nonprofit  enterprise,  the  FutureGen  Alliance  will  broadly  share  informa-
tion from the project, facilitating the deployment of commercial, near-zero emis-
sion  power  plants  throughout  the  world.  It  is  appropriate  for  DOE  to  provide 
cost  sharing  for  additional  commercial  CCS  projects  to  facilitate  deployment  of 
CCS  technology,  but  it  must  recognize  that  commercial  projects  by  their  very 
nature  will  feature  protection  of  technological  know-how  and  intellectual  prop-
erty within individual companies rather than sharing it for broad benefit. 

• International  involvement  is  essential  to  the  rapid  deployment  of  CCS  tech-
nologies,  and  FutureGen  at  Mattoon  is  a  model  that  provides  international  in-
volvement at an unprecedented level. Thirteen companies with operations on six 
continents  are  participating  as  members  of  the  Alliance.  Climate  technologies 
must be globally acceptable and globally deployed, or they will not be effective. 
International  participation  has  been  exceptionally  well-managed  and  has  been 
a  cornerstone  of  the  information  sharing  in  the  program.  No  other  project  or 
program  can  replicate  FutureGen  at  Mattoon’s  level  of  international  involve-
ment. 

• FutureGen  at  Mattoon  provides  a  platform  for  testing  advanced  technologies, 
which  accelerates  technology  development  and  saves  the  taxpayer  money.  Once 
built,  and  power  generation,  carbon  capture,  and  sequestration  operations  are 
underway,  FutureGen  at  Mattoon  can  serve  as  a  test  bed  for  advanced  tech-
nologies  emerging  from  DOE’s  Fossil  Energy  R&D  program  and  industry  R&D 
efforts.  Such  testing  will  not  interfere  with  the  primary  mission  of  the  facility 
to prove integrated CCS technology at a 90 percent capture level and sequester 
a minimum of one million tons per year of CO2, and to develop and prove cost- 
effective  approaches  to  advancing  CCS  technology.  Alternative  testing  ap-
proaches  will  be  far  more  expensive.  Areas  where  DOE  expects  advancements 
to occur include oxygen production, gasifier improvements, gas clean-up, H2 and 
CO2 separation,  H2 turbine  advancements  and  fuel  cells.  By  proposing  to  end 
its  support  of  FutureGen  at  Mattoon,  DOE  will  be  increasing  the  cost  and  dif-
ficulty  of  testing  the  very  advanced  technologies  that  its  program  managers 
seek to develop and deploy. 

FutureGen at Mattoon’s Costs 

All major, global energy infrastructure projects are being impacted by rapidly ris-
ing  commodity  and  equipment  costs.  FutureGen  at  Mattoon  is  no  exception.  Other 
IGCC  and  CCS  projects  also  are  no  exception.  However,  FutureGen  at  Mattoon’s 
unique  financing  structure  mitigates  taxpayer  exposure.  The  Alliance  has  pledged 
approximately $400 million to the program, will return 100 percent of the estimated 
$300  million  in  plant  revenues  back  to  the  program,  and  will  direct  100  percent  of 
post-program  electricity  revenues  to  public  benefit  R&D.  After  the  program  is  com-
plete,  if  the  plant  is  ever  sold,  the  Alliance  has  advised  the  DOE  that  it  would  be 
eligible  for  partial  to  full  repayment.  Industry  financial  contributors  will  never  re-
ceive  a  single  dollar  of  financial  return.  This  represents  an  unprecedented  level  of 
commitment  by  the  Alliance  membership  to  a  public-private  partnership.  The  Alli-
ance is willing to make this commitment because this investment is squarely in the 
interest of both the Nation and the world. 

With respect to the commercial status of IGCC without CCS, while there are some 
IGCC  plants  being  planned,  the  marketplace  is  still  in  its  infancy.  Only  one  IGCC 
without  CCS  is  under  construction  and  that  plant  received  substantial  government 
subsidies and required a major increase in electricity rates for it to proceed. Of the 
other  IGCC  plants  in  the  planning  stage,  very  few  have  been  able  to  secure  full  fi-
nancing and/or regulatory approval. The high cost of new power plants coupled with 
the  difficulty  in  getting  either  bank  financing  or  regulatory  approval  has  resulted 
in  the  cancellation  of  many  coal  plants.  Further,  taking  a  broader  look  at  coal-re-
lated  plants  of  all  technologies,  according  to  Source  Watch,  in  2007  alone,  59  pro-
posed plants were cancelled, abandoned, or put on hold, and of those plants remain-
ing, few are IGCC’s with real prospects of being built. The challenges in the market-
place, even when CCS is not considered, are clear. The addition of CCS with 90 per-
cent capture fundamentally changes the underlying IGCC plant configuration—it is 
not a simple addition, it adds significant additional cost and complexity. 

Thus,  it  is  an  appropriate  role  for  the  Federal  Government  to  take  on  the  chal-
lenge  of  building  the  world’s  first  IGCC  with  90  percent  CCS.  In  the  current  mar-
ketplace environment, on its own, the technology simply will not come forward. With 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

the  continued  funding  from  the  U.S.  DOE,  FutureGen  will  have  a  high  probability 
of proceeding. 
DOE’s Proposed Restructuring 

The Alliance believes that it is in the national interest to complement FutureGen 
at  Mattoon  with  additional  projects  in  a  variety  of  engineered  applications  and  a 
variety  of  geologic  formations.  However,  complementary  projects  must  not  come  at 
the  expense  or  delay  of  the  number  one  priority,  FutureGen  at  Mattoon.  Further, 
it is doubtful that real projects with CCS technology that capture 90 percent of the 
CO2 and sequester the CO2 in geologic formations can be brought to fruition absent 
the  trailblazing  of  FutureGen  at  Mattoon.  Currently,  DOE’s  proposed  restructuring 
leaves  many  unanswered  issues  that  are  of  concern.  Some  of  the  specific  concerns 
about the DOE proposed restructuring include: 

DOE’s schedule under the restructuring proposal is unrealistic. DOE has an im-
portant  obligation  to  the  taxpayer  to  follow  comprehensive  contracting  proc-
esses,  conduct  technology  reviews,  and  prepare  an  environmental  impact  state-
ment on any new project. The schedule in the RFI (i.e., a proposed on-line date 
of 2015) is not realistic for a project that meets 100 percent of the stated goals. 
Many  potential  industrial  partners  are  unfamiliar  with  DOE’s  required  prac-
tices,  and  it  is  important  that  the  DOE  inform  them  of  a  reasonable  schedule 
so  that  they  can  properly  conduct  the  project  and  deal  with  their  third-party 
investors.  Overly  optimistic  schedules  are  a  disservice  to  Congress,  industry, 
and the public. 
Based on my experience, I would envision the following as a fast-track schedule 
for DOE to identify an alternative, fully integrated project that meets all of the 
existing performance goals for the FutureGen program: 
» 2009+: project selection and cooperative agreement negotiation 
» 2012: completion of preliminary design, environmental impact assessment and 

record of decision 

» 2013: completion of detailed design and procurement of major technology com-

ponents 

» 2017: completion of construction 
» 2018: initial operation 
» 2022: completion of test period 
• DOE’s  restructured  approach  has  problematic  business  parameters.  DOE’s  pro-
posal implies that 90 percent capture simply involves the addition of new tech-
nology  to  an  existing  IGCC.  It  does  not.  The  complex  integration  of  CCS  into 
a  commercial  IGCC  plant  will  entail  significant  modifications  to  many  other 
systems,  including  commercial  systems  inside  the  base  plant.  It  would  also 
largely  require  a  restart  of  design  work  done  to  date  on  the  base  commercial 
plant.  Thus,  the  government,  its  procurement  rules,  and  its  oversight  practices 
could  easily  extend  into  the  commercial,  for-profit  power  plant.  Further,  apply-
ing FutureGen funds to a project with anything appreciably less than capturing 
90  percent  of  the  total  CO2 emissions  from  the  entire  plant  would  fall  short  of 
what is needed to rapidly develop near-zero coal plants. 
• DOE’s  restructured  approach  does  not  address  the  increased  marginal  cost  of 
electricity due to adding CCS to a plant. The modified plant that DOE proposes 
that  industry  build  will  cost  substantially  more  to  operate  than  a  traditional 
plant.  DOE’s  RFI  is  largely  silent  on  operating  costs.  Adding  CCS  to  an  IGCC 
plant  is  expected  to  increase  the  cost  of  electricity  by  as  much  as  50  percent 
and  the  marginal  production  cost  by  as  much  as  20  percent.  Because  power 
plants  dispatch  electricity  to  the  grid  based  on  their  marginal  operating  cost, 
the approach DOE proposes could result in a plant that is too expensive for in-
dustry to operate. 
• Increased appropriations will be required to offset Federal taxation. DOE is pro-
posing  moving  away  from  its  partnership  with  the  nonprofit  Alliance  to  pro-
viding  Federal  funds  for  a  for-profit  entity.  While  it  is  appropriate  for  DOE  to 
work  with  for-profit  and  nonprofit  entities,  the  precedent  in  the  Clean  Coal 
Power Initiative is that DOE grants awarded to for-profit entities can be subject 
to  taxation  by  the  IRS,  if  determined  to  be  income.  Thus,  whereas  100  percent 
of the funding going to FutureGen at Mattoon goes to on-the-ground technology 
and operations, under DOE’s new program, DOE will need increased appropria-
tions if it intends to make the same ultimate on-the-ground investment in tech-
nology  and  operations.  This  could  result  in  either:  (1)  hundreds  of  millions  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

dollars  of  additional  appropriations  to  offset  taxes  or  (2)  a  major  dilution  of 
DOE’s program investment through taxation. 

• DOE appropriately retained the 90 percent capture goal in its RFI and must do 
so  in  any  awarded  projects.  The  FutureGen  program  has  identified  90  percent 
CO2 capture  as  an  important  requirement  to  advance  CCS  technology.  This 
level  of  CO2 capture  has  significant  impact  on  the  design  of  many  critical  com-
ponents of the facility, such as the combustion turbine, gas clean-up system, and 
syngas  clean-up  system.  It  would  be  a  serious  mistake  if  this  target  level  is  re-
laxed. Ninety percent is a technical goal designed to ensure a sustainable future 
for coal in a carbon-constrained world. Today’s commercial projects cannot tech-
nically  or  economically  achieve  this  goal  and  DOE’s  program  should  focus  on 
bold technological advances not incremental change. 

• Plant  revenue  must  go  to  the  industrial  partner.  In  a  commercial  project,  it  is 
expected that 100 percent of revenue would need to go to the industry partner. 
Unlike  FutureGen  at  Mattoon,  in  which  DOE  shared  in  the  project  revenues 
substantially offsetting Federal investment, for projects conducted under DOE’s 
new approach, a successful commercial project would insist that plant revenues 
go  to  the  industrial  partner  so  that  private  sector  participants  can  generate  a 
commercial return. 

In  its  2004  report  ‘‘FutureGen  Integrated  Hydrogen  and  Electric  Power  Produc-
tion  and  Carbon  Sequestration  Research  Initiative’’,  DOE  acknowledged  the  neces-
sity  for  the  type  and  level  of  risk  sharing  associated  with  FutureGen  at  Mattoon, 
if technology is to advance at the required pace. In its report, DOE said: 

‘‘FutureGen’s  integration  of  concepts  and  components  is  key  to  providing  tech-
nical  and  operational  viability  to  the  generally  conservative,  risk-adverse  coal 
and  utility  industries.  Integration  issues  such  as  the  dynamics  between  up-
stream  and  downstream  subsystems  (e.g.,  between  interdependent  subsystems 
such  as  the  coal  conversion  and  power  and  hydrogen  production  systems  and 
carbon separation and sequestration systems) can only be addressed by a large- 
scale  integrated  facility  operation.  Unless  the  production  of  hydrogen  and  elec-
tricity  from  coal  integrated  with  sequestrating  carbon  dioxide  can  be  shown  to 
be  feasible  and  cost  competitive,  the  coal  industry  will  not  make  the  invest-
ments necessary to fully realize the potential energy security and economic ben-
efits of this plentiful domestic energy resource.’’ 

Technology  advancements  and  market  changes  in  the  last  5  years  have  not 
changed  this  need  for  a  full  scale  demonstration  envisioned  in  DOE’s  report  and 
FutureGen at Mattoon. 

There  is  no  program  in  the  world  that  can  move  near-zero  emission  power  and 
CCS  faster  or  further  than  FutureGen  at  Mattoon.  The  FutureGen  Alliance  is  non-
profit,  includes  unprecedented  international  involvement  and  information  sharing, 
and  has  a  site  that  is  technically  and  legally  ready  to  go.  Alternatives  will  cost  the 
country 5 years or more of delay and/or deliver less in terms of results. 

As  Congress  and  the  administration  debate  the  appropriate  structure  for  the 
FutureGen  program,  the  Alliance  urges  that  all  of  these  factors  be  taken  into  ac-
count.  FutureGen  at  Mattoon  should  be  maintained  as  a  global  flagship  program 
that  is  the  Nation’s  top  priority  for  advancing  near-zero  emission  coal  technology, 
and  complementary  projects  should  be  added  to  the  program  as  the  budget  allows. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you, Mr. Mudd. 
Mr. Hawkins? Thanks for your many years of effort at this. 

STATEMENT OF DAVID G. HAWKINS, DIRECTOR, CLIMATE 

CENTER, NATURAL RESOURCES DEFENSE COUNCIL 

Mr. HAWKINS. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman, for inviting 
me  to  present  NRDC’s  views  on  carbon  capture,  on  coal,  climate 
protection, and the role of gasification. 

Today,  coal  use  and  climate  protection  are  on  a  collision  course, 
and  coal  is  at  the  center  of  that  collision.  Coal  is  ubiquitous,  it  is 
abundant,  and  if  one  ignores  its  environmental  costs,  it  comes  to 
the marketplace at low cost. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

Because  it’s  so  abundant,  it’s  going  to  be  very  difficult  to  con-
vince  political  leaders  to  walk  away  from  coal.  It  would  take  dec-
ades to do it, in my opinion, and we don’t have decades. 

So, a critical need today is to develop a method for changing the 
investments in the coal plants that are being built—being proposed 
here  in  the  United  States  as  you  mentioned—and  being  built  very 
rapidly in countries like China. 

The  reason  that  this  is  so  critical  is  the  magnitude  of  the  global 
warming  pollution  that  would  come  from  those  new  coal  plants, 
and how much more difficult it would make our job. 

There  are  about  3,000  new  coal  plants  that  are  on  the  drawing 
boards,  globally,  for  construction  in  the  next  25  years—about  two- 
thirds  of  those  in  the  developing  world,  and  about  40  percent  in 
China. If those plants operated for 60 years—which is a typical life-
time—and  they  released  all  of  their  CO2 into  the  atmosphere,  the 
total  would  be  astounding—it  would  be  about  750  billion  tons  of 
carbon  dioxide.  To  put  that  number  in  perspective,  that’s  30  per-
cent  more  emissions  than  all  emissions  from  coal  use  in  previous 
human  history,  and  that’s  with  25  years  worth  of  investments  in 
coal plants alone. 

So you can see that we’ve got a huge train coming at us that we 
have to address without delay. Otherwise we’re going to make this 
problem of protecting the climate, impossible. 

There is an answer for the coal plants that are built: carbon cap-
ture and geologic disposal technologies are ready for use today and 
gasification is a commercially demonstrated component of that sys-
tem. 

What  we  need  is  not  an  R&D  program,  we  need  a  technology 
framework  for  deploying  these  technologies,  and  a  policy  that  is 
supportive. 

We  recommend  three  parts  of  a  package,  in  order  to  make  this 
happen. First, enactment of a comprehensive cap-and-trade legisla-
tion on global warming emissions. We need this, in order to put the 
Nation  on  a  path  to  achieve  the  needed  reductions;  we  need  it  to 
provide flexibility that can keep costs low; and most importantly we 
need  it  to  provide  a  reason  for  investing  in  carbon  capture  tech-
nology  in  the  first  place.  Without  an  emissions  cap  program,  and 
without a requirement for capture, there’s no economic rationale to 
capture the carbon. 

The  second  element  of  this—to  get  the  program,  to  get  this  de-
ployment happening faster, is what we call a low-carbon generation 
obligation.  This  would  overcome  a  major  financial  problem.  Right 
now,  someone  wants  to  built  a  new  project—absent  specific  large 
government  subsidies,  all  of  the  costs  would  fall  on  the  ratepayers 
of  that  particularly  company,  and  not  surprisingly,  a  lot  of  them 
are hesitant to do that. 

A  low-carbon  generation  obligation  would  have  the  merit  of 
spreading  the  incremental  costs  of  these  first  projects  over  the  en-
tire electric generating system, and providing this technology to be 
demonstrated at very low cost to any individual ratepayer. 

The third thing that we recommend is a new source performance 
standard  for  new  coal  generation.  We  simply  shouldn’t  build  new 
coal plants without capturing the carbon. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

The  first  rule  of  holes  is,  when  you’re  in  one,  stop  digging.  And 
building  a  new  coal  plant  that  emits  all  of  its  CO2 in  the  atmos-
phere will simply make us dig our hole deeper. 

But,  if  we  combine  these  measures,  we  can  stimulate  the  imme-
diate  deployment  of  this  technology.  I  would  say,  today,  that  if 
something  like  the  Lieberman-Warner  climate  bill  were  law  today, 
that the FutureGen project would be under construction today—we 
wouldn’t  be  sitting  here  talking  about  why  it  was  encountering  all 
of these obstacles—it would be built. 

So,  I  would  say,  in  concluding,  that  if  Congress  takes  steps  to 
enact these policies, and programs in this Congress, we’ll be on our 
way to addressing this problem, we’ll be on our way to avoiding the 
lock-in  of  a  huge  amount  of  new  global  warming  emissions  associ-
ated  with  new  coal  plants,  and  we  will  be  able  to  demonstrate  the 
commercial reliability and feasibility of these new technologies, and 
that is something that the world will take notice of. And it is some-
thing that will engage countries like China, and India, and help us 
solve this problem. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Hawkins follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID G. HAWKINS, DIRECTOR, CLIMATE CENTER, 

NATURAL RESOURCES DEFENSE COUNCIL 

Thank you for the opportunity to testify today on coal gasification and carbon cap-
ture technologies. My name is David Hawkins. I am Director of the Climate Center 
at  the  Natural  Resources  Defense  Council  (NRDC).  NRDC  is  a  national,  nonprofit 
organization  of  scientists,  lawyers  and  environmental  specialists  dedicated  to  pro-
tecting public health and the environment. Founded in 1970, NRDC has more than 
1.2  million  members  and  online  activists  nationwide,  served  from  offices  in  New 
York, Washington, Los Angeles and San Francisco, Chicago and Beijing. 

Today,  the  U.S.  and  other  developed  nations  around  the  world  run  their  econo-
mies largely with industrial sources powered by fossil fuel and those sources release 
billions of tons of carbon dioxide (CO2) into the atmosphere every year. There is na-
tional  and  global  interest  today  in  capturing  that  CO2 for  disposal  or  sequestration 
to prevent its release to the atmosphere, something that can be achieved with com-
mercially demonstrated coal gasification systems. To distinguish this industrial cap-
ture  system  from  removal  of  atmospheric  CO2 by  soils  and  vegetation,  I  will  refer 
to the industrial system as carbon capture and disposal or CCD. 

The  interest  in  CCD  stems  from  a  few  basic  facts.  We  now  recognize  that  CO2 
emissions  from  use  of  fossil  fuel  result  in  increased  atmospheric  concentrations  of 
CO2, which along with other so-called greenhouse gases, trap heat, leading to an in-
crease in temperatures, regionally and globally. These increased temperatures alter 
the energy balance of the planet and thus our climate, which is simply nature’s way 
of  managing  energy  flows.  Documented  changes  in  climate  today  along  with  those 
forecast  for  the  next  decades,  are  predicted  to  inflict  large  and  growing  damage  to 
human health, economic well-being, and natural ecosystems. 

Coal is the most abundant fossil fuel and is distributed broadly across the world. 
It  has  fueled  the  rise  of  industrial  economies  in  Europe  and  the  U.S.  in  the  past 
two centuries and is fueling the rise of Asian economies today. Because of its abun-
dance,  coal  is  cheap  and  that  makes  it  attractive  to  use  in  large  quantities  if  we 
ignore  the  harm  it  causes.  However,  per  unit  of  energy  delivered,  coal  today  is  a 
bigger  global  warming  polluter  than  any  other  fuel:  double  that  of  natural  gas;  50 
percent more than oil; and, of course, enormously more polluting than renewable en-
ergy,  energy  efficiency,  and,  more  controversially,  nuclear  power.  To  reduce  coal’s 
contribution to global warming, we must deploy and improve systems that will keep 
the  carbon  in  coal  out  of  the  atmosphere,  specifically  systems  that  capture  carbon 
dioxide (CO2) from coal-fired power plants and other industrial sources for safe and 
effective disposal in geologic formations. 
The Toll From Coal 

Before  turning  to  the  status  of  CCD  let  me  say  a  few  words  about  coal  use  gen-
erally.  The  role  of  coal  now  and  in  the  future  is  controversial  due  to  the  damages 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

its  production  and  use  inflict  today  and  skepticism  that  those  damages  can  or  will 
be reduced to a point where we should continue to rely on it as a mainstay of indus-
trial  economies.  Coal  is  cheap  and  abundant  compared  to  oil  and  natural  gas.  But 
the  toll  from  coal  as  it  is  used  today  is  enormous.  From  mining  deaths  and  illness 
and  devastated  mountains  and  streams  from  practices  like  mountain  top  removal 
mining,  to  accidents  at  coal  train  crossings,  to  air  emissions  of  acidic,  toxic,  and 
heat-trapping  pollution  from  coal  combustion,  to  water  pollution  from  coal  mining 
and combustion wastes, the conventional coal fuel cycle is among the most environ-
mentally  destructive  activities  on  Earth.  Certain  coal  production  processes  are  in-
herently  harmful  and  while  our  society  has  the  capacity  to  reduce  many  of  today’s 
damages,  to  date,  we  have  not  done  so  adequately  nor  have  we  committed  to  doing 
so. These failures have created well-justified opposition by many people to continued 
or increased dependence on coal to meet our energy needs. 

Our progress of reducing harms from mining, transport, and use of coal has been 
frustratingly  slow  and  an  enormous  amount  remains  to  be  done.  Today  mountain 
tops  in  Appalachia  are  destroyed  to  get  at  the  coal  underneath  and  rocks,  soil,  de-
bris,  and  waste  products  are  dumped  into  valleys  and  streams,  destroying  them  as 
well.  Waste  impoundments  loom  above  communities  (including,  in  one  particularly 
egregious  case,  above  an  elementary  school)  and  thousands  of  miles  of  streams  are 
polluted.  In  other  areas  surface  mine  reclamation  is  incomplete,  inadequately  per-
formed  and  poorly  supervised  due  to  regulatory  gaps  and  poorly  funded  regulatory 
agencies. 

In  the  area  of  air  pollution,  although  we  have  technologies  to  dramatically  cut 
conventional  pollutants  from  coal-fired  power  plants,  in  2004  only  one-third  of  U.S. 
coal  capacity  was  equipped  with  scrubbers  for  sulfur  dioxide  control  and  even  less 
capacity  applied  selective  catalytic  reduction  (SCR)  for  nitrogen  oxides  control.  And 
under  the  Administration’s  so-called  CAIR  rule,  even  in  2020  nearly  30  percent  of 
coal  capacity  will  still  not  employ  scrubbers  and  nearly  45  percent  will  lack  SCR 
equipment.  Moreover,  because  this  administration  has  deliberately  refused  to  re-
quire use of available highly effective control technologies for the brain poison mer-
cury,  we  will  suffer  decades  more  of  cumulative  dumping  of  this  toxin  into  the  air 
at  rates  several  times  higher  than  is  necessary  or  than  faithful  implementation  of 
the Clean Air Act would achieve. Finally, there are no controls in place for CO2, the 
global warming pollutant emitted by the more than 330,000 megawatts of coal-fired 
plants;  nor  are  there  any  CO2 control  requirements  adopted  today  for  old  or  new 
plants save in California. 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee, the environmental community has 
been  criticized  in  some  quarters  for  our  generally  negative  view  regarding  coal  as 
an energy resource. But consider the reasons for this. Our community reacts to the 
facts  on  the  ground  and  those  facts  are  far  from  what  they  should  be  if  coal  is  to 
play a role as a responsible part of the 21st century energy mix. Rather than simply 
decrying  the  attitudes  of  those  who  question  whether  using  large  amounts  of  coal 
can and will be carried out in a responsible manner, the coal industry in particular 
should support policies to correct today’s abuses and then implement those reforms. 
Were  the  industry  to  do  this,  there  would  be  real  reasons  for  my  community  and 
other critics of coal to consider whether their positions should be reconsidered. 
The Need for CCD 

Turning  to  CCD,  NRDC  supports  rapid  deployment  of  such  capture  and  disposal 
systems for sources using coal. Such support is not a statement about how depend-
ent the U.S. or the world should be on coal and for how long. Any significant addi-
tional use of coal that vents its CO2 to the air is fundamentally in conflict with the 
need  to  keep  atmospheric  concentrations  of  CO2 from  rising  to  levels  that  will 
produce  dangerous  disruption  of  the  climate  system.  Given  that  an  immediate 
world-wide  halt  to  coal  use  is  not  plausible,  analysts  and  advocates  with  a  broad 
range of views on coal’s role should be able to agree that, if it is safe and effective, 
CCD  should  be  rapidly  deployed  to  minimize  CO2 emissions  from  the  coal  that  we 
do use. 

Today coal use and climate protection are on a collision course. Without rapid de-
ployment  of  CCD  systems,  that  collision  will  occur  quickly  and  with  spectacularly 
bad  results.  The  very  attribute  of  coal  that  has  made  it  so  attractive—its  abun-
dance—magnifies the problem we face and requires us to act now, not a decade from 
now.  Until  now,  coal’s  abundance  has  been  an  economic  boon.  But  today,  coal’s 
abundance, absent corrective action, is more bane than boon. 

Since  the  dawn  of  the  industrial  age,  human  use  of  coal  has  released  about  150 
billion metric tons of carbon into the atmosphere—about half the total carbon emis-
sions due to fossil fuel use in human history. But that contribution is the tip of the 
carbon iceberg. Another 4 trillion metric tons of carbon are contained in the remain-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

ing global coal resources. That is a carbon pool nearly seven times greater than the 
amount  in  our  pre-industrial  atmosphere.  Using  that  coal  without  capturing  and 
disposing of its carbon means a climate catastrophe. 

And the die is being cast for that catastrophe today, not decades from now. Deci-
sions  being  made  today  in  corporate  board  rooms,  government  ministries,  and  Con-
gressional hearing rooms are determining how the next coal-fired power plants will 
be  designed  and  operated.  Power  plant  investments  are  enormous  in  scale,  more 
than  $1  billion  per  plant,  and  plants  built  today  will  operate  for  60  years  or  more. 
The  International  Energy  Agency  (IEA)  forecasts  that  more  than  $5  trillion  will  be 
spent globally on new power plants in the next 25 years. Under IEA’s forecasts, over 
1,800 gigawatts (GW) of new coal plants will be built between now and 2030—capac-
ity equivalent to 3,000 large coal plants, or an average of ten new coal plants every 
month  for  the  next  quarter  century.  This  new  capacity  amounts  to  1.5  times  the 
total of all the coal plants operating in the world today. 

The astounding fact is that under IEA’s forecast, 7 out of every 10 coal plants that 
will be operating in 2030 don’t exist today. That fact presents a huge opportunity— 
many  of  these  coal  plants  will  not  need  to  be  built  if  we  invest  more  in  efficiency; 
additional numbers of these coal plants can be replaced with clean, renewable alter-
native  power  sources;  and  for  the  remainder,  we  can  build  them  to  capture  their 
CO2, instead of building them the way our grandfathers built them. 

If  we  decide  to  do  it,  the  world  could  build  and  operate  new  coal  plants  so  that 
their  CO2 is  returned  to  the  ground  rather  than  polluting  the  atmosphere.  But  we 
are losing that opportunity with every month of delay—10 coal plants were built the 
old-fashioned way last month somewhere in the world and 10 more old-style plants 
will be built this month, and the next and the next. Worse still, with current policies 
in  place,  none  of  the  3,000  new  plants  projected  by  IEA  are  likely  to  capture  their 
CO2. 

Each  new  coal  plant  that  is  built  carries  with  it  a  huge  stream  of  CO2 emissions 
that  will  likely  flow  for  the  life  of  the  plant—60  years  or  more.  Suggestions  that 
such  plants  might  be  equipped  with  CO2 capture  devices  later  in  life  might  come 
true but there is little reason to count on it. As I will discuss further in a moment, 
while  commercial  technologies  exist  for  pre-combustion  capture  from  gasification- 
based power plants, most new plants are not using gasification designs and the few 
that  are,  are  not  incorporating  capture  systems.  Installing  capture  equipment  at 
these new plants after the fact is implausible for traditional coal plant designs and 
expensive for gasification processes. 

If  all  3,000  of  the  next  wave  of  coal  plants  are  built  with  no  CO2 controls,  their 
lifetime  emissions  will  impose  an  enormous  pollution  lien  on  our  children  and 
grandchildren.  Over  a  projected  60-year  life  these  plants  would  likely  emit  750  bil-
lion tons of CO2, a total, from just 25 years of investment decisions, that is 30 per-
cent greater than the total CO2 emissions from all previous human use of coal. Once 
emitted,  this  CO2 pollution  load  remains  in  the  atmosphere  for  centuries.  Half  of 
the CO2 emitted during World War I remains in the atmosphere today. 

In  short,  we  face  an  onrushing  train  of  new  coal  plants  with  impacts  that  must 
be  diverted  without  delay.  What  can  the  U.S.  do  to  help?  The  U.S.  is  forecasted  to 
build  nearly  300  of  these  coal  plants,  according  to  reports  and  forecasts  published 
by the U.S. EIA. We should adopt a national policy that new coal plants be required 
to employ CCD without delay. By taking action ourselves, we can speed the deploy-
ment  of  CCD  here  at  home  and  set  an  example  of  leadership.  That  leadership  will 
bring  us  economic  rewards  in  the  new  business  opportunities  it  creates  here  and 
abroad and it will speed engagement by critical countries like China and India. 

To  date  our  efforts  have  been  limited  to  funding  research,  development,  and  lim-
ited demonstrations. Such funding can help in this effort if it is wisely invested. But 
government  subsidies—which  are  what  we  are  talking  about—cannot  substitute  for 
the driver that a real market for low-carbon goods and services provides. That mar-
ket  will  be  created  only  when  requirements  to  limit  CO2 emissions  are  adopted.  In 
this Congress serious attention is finally being directed to enactment of such meas-
ures. 
Key Questions About CCD 

I  started  studying  CCD  in  detail  10  years  ago  and  the  questions  I  had  then  are 
those asked today by people new to the subject. Do reliable systems exist to capture 
CO2 from  power  plants  and  other  industrial  sources?  Where  can  we  put  CO2 after 
we  have  captured  it?  Will  the  CO2 stay  where  we  put  it  or  will  it  leak?  How  much 
disposal  capacity  is  there?  Are  CCD  systems  ‘‘affordable’’?  To  answer  these  ques-
tions,  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  (IPCC)  decided  4  years  ago 
to prepare a special report on the subject. That report was issued in September 2005 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

as  the  IPCC  Special  Report  on  Carbon  Dioxide  Capture  and  Storage.  I  was  privi-
leged to serve as a review editor for the report’s chapter on geologic storage of CO2. 
CO2 Capture 

The  IPCC  special  report  groups  capture  or  separation  of  CO2 from  industrial 
gases into four categories: post-combustion; pre-combustion; oxyfuel combustion; and 
industrial  separation.  I  will  say  a  few  words  about  the  basics  and  status  of  each 
of these approaches. In a conventional pulverized coal power plant, the coal is com-
busted  using  normal  air  at  atmospheric  pressures.  This  combustion  process  pro-
duces a large volume of exhaust gas that contains CO2 in large amounts but in low 
concentrations and low pressures. Commercial post-combustion systems exist to cap-
ture  CO2 from  such  exhaust  gases  using  chemical  ‘‘stripping’’  compounds  and  they 
have  been  applied  to  very  small  portions  of  flue  gases  (tens  of  thousands  of  tons 
from  plants  that  emit  several  million  tons  of  CO2 annually)  from  a  few  coal-fired 
power plants in the U.S. that sell the captured CO2 to the food and beverage indus-
try.  However,  industry  analysts  state  that  today’s  systems,  based  on  publicly  avail-
able information, involve much higher costs and energy penalties than the principal 
demonstrated alternative, pre-combustion capture. 

New and potentially less expensive post-combustion concepts have been evaluated 
in  laboratory  tests  and  some,  like  ammonia-based  capture  systems,  are  scheduled 
for  small  pilot-scale  tests  in  the  next  few  years.  Under  normal  industrial  develop-
ment scenarios, if successful such pilot tests would be followed by larger demonstra-
tion  tests  and  then  by  commercial-scale  tests.  These  and  other  approaches  should 
continue  to  be  explored.  However,  unless  accelerated  by  a  combination  of  policies, 
subsidies, and willingness to take increased technical risks, such a development pro-
gram  could  take  one  or  two  decades  before  post-combustion  systems  would  be  ac-
cepted for broad commercial application. 

Pre-combustion  capture  is  applied  to  coal  conversion  processes  that  gasify  coal 
rather than combust it in air. In the oxygen-blown gasification process coal is heated 
under pressure with a mixture of pure oxygen, producing an energy-rich gas stream 
consisting mostly of hydrogen and carbon monoxide. Coal gasification is widely used 
in industrial processes, such as ammonia and fertilizer production around the world. 
Hundreds  of  such  industrial  gasifiers  are  in  operation  today.  In  power  generation 
applications  as  practiced  today  this  ‘‘syngas’’  stream  is  cleaned  of  impurities  and 
then burned in a combustion turbine to make electricity in a process known as Inte-
grated  Gasification  Combined  Cycle  or  IGCC.  In  the  power  generation  business, 
IGCC  is  a  relatively  recent  development—about  two  decades  old  and  is  still  not 
widely deployed. There are two IGCC power-only plants operating in the U.S. today 
and  about  14  commercial  IGCC  plants  are  operating,  with  most  of  the  capacity  in 
Europe.  In  early  years  of  operation  for  power  applications  a  number  of  IGCC 
projects  encountered  availability  problems  but  those  issues  appear  to  be  resolved 
today, with Tampa Electric Company reporting that its IGCC plant in Florida is the 
most dispatched and most economic unit in its generating system. 

Commercially  demonstrated  systems  for  pre-combustion  capture  from  the  coal 
gasification  process  involve  treating  the  syngas  to  form  a  mixture  of  hydrogen  and 
CO2 and  then  separating  the  CO2,  primarily  through  the  use  of  solvents.  These 
same techniques are used in industrial plants to separate CO2 from natural gas and 
to make chemicals such as ammonia out of gasified coal. However, because CO2 can 
be released to the air in unlimited amounts under today’s laws, except in niche ap-
plications,  even  plants  that  separate  CO2 do  not  capture  it;  rather  they  release  it 
to  the  atmosphere.  Notable  exceptions  include  the  Dakota  Gasification  Company 
plant in Beulah, North Dakota, which captures and pipelines more than one million 
tons  of  CO2 per  year  from  its  lignite  gasification  plant  to  an  oil  field  in  Saskatch-
ewan,  and  ExxonMobil’s  Shute  Creek  natural  gas  processing  plant  in  Wyoming, 
which  strips  CO2 from  sour  gas  and  pipelines  several  million  tons  per  year  to  oil 
fields in Colorado and Wyoming. 

Today’s  pre-combustion  capture  approach  is  not  applicable  to  the  installed  base 
of conventional pulverized coal in the U.S. and elsewhere. However, it is ready today 
for  use  with  IGCC  power  plants.  The  oil  giant  BP  has  announced  an  IGCC  project 
with  pre-combustion  CO2 capture  at  a  site  in  California.  When  operational  the 
project will gasify petroleum coke, a solid fuel that resembles coal more than petro-
leum  to  make  electricity  for  sale  to  the  grid.  The  captured  CO2 will  be  sold  to  an 
oil  field  operator  in  California  to  enhance  oil  recovery.  The  principal  obstacle  for 
broad  application  of  pre-combustion  capture  to  new  power  plants  is  not  technical, 
it is economic: under today’s laws it is cheaper to release CO2 to the air rather than 
capturing  it.  Enacting  laws  to  limit  CO2 pollution  can  change  this  situation,  as  I 
discuss later. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

While  pre-combustion  capture  from  IGCC  plants  is  the  approach  that  is  ready 
today for commercial application, it is not the only method for CO2 capture that may 
emerge  if  laws  creating  a  market  for  CO2 capture  are  adopted.  I  have  previously 
mentioned  post-combustion  techniques  now  being  explored.  Another  approach, 
known  as  oxyfuel  combustion,  is  also  in  the  early  stages  of  research  and  develop-
ment.  In  the  oxyfuel  process,  coal  is  burned  in  oxygen  rather  than  air  and  the  ex-
haust gases are recycled to build up CO2 concentrations to a point where separation 
at  reasonable  cost  and  energy  penalties  may  be  feasible.  Small  scale  pilot  studies 
for  oxyfuel  processes  have  been  announced.  As  with  post-combustion  processes,  ab-
sent an accelerated effort to leapfrog the normal commercialization process, it could 
be  one  or  two  decades  before  such  systems  might  begin  to  be  deployed  broadly  in 
commercial application. 

Given  the  massive  amount  of  new  coal  capacity  scheduled  for  construction  in  the 
next two decades, we cannot afford to wait until we see if these alternative capture 
systems  prove  out,  nor  do  we  need  to.  Coal  plants  in  the  design  process  today  can 
employ proven IGCC and precombustion capture systems to reduce their CO2 emis-
sions by about 90 percent. Adoption of policies that set a CO2 performance standard 
now for such new plants will not anoint IGCC as the technological winner since al-
ternative  approaches  can  be  employed  when  they  are  ready.  If  the  alternatives 
prove  superior  to  IGCC  and  pre-combustion  capture,  the  market  will  reward  them 
accordingly. As I will discuss later, adoption of CO2 performance standards is a crit-
ical  step  to  improve  today’s  capture  methods  and  to  stimulate  development  of  com-
peting systems. 

I  would  like  to  say  a  few  words  about  so-called  ‘‘capture-ready’’  or  ‘‘capture-capa-
ble’’ coal plants. Some years ago I was under the impression that some technologies 
like  IGCC,  initially  built  without  capture  equipment  could  be  properly  called  ‘‘cap-
ture-ready.’’  However,  the  implications  of  the  rapid  build-out  of  new  coal  plants  for 
global  warming  and  many  conversations  with  engineers  since  then  have  educated 
me to a different view. Unfortunately, the term ‘‘capture-ready’’ has been embraced 
by industry lobbyists in a manner that strips the concept of any meaning. According 
to  some  industry  representatives,  a  power  plant  that  simply  leaves  physical  space 
for  an  unidentified  black  box  deserves  to  be  called  ‘‘capture-ready.’’  If  that  makes 
a  power  plant  ‘‘capture-ready’’  Mr.  Chairman,  then  my  driveway  is  ‘‘Ferrari-ready.’’ 
We should not be investing today in coal plants at more than a billion dollars apiece 
with  nothing  more  than  a  hope  that  some  kind  of  capture  system  will  turn  up.  We 
would  not  get  on  a  plane  to  a  destination  if  the  pilot  told  us  there  was  no  landing 
site but options were being researched. 

It  is  correct  that  an  IGCC  unit  built  without  capture  equipment  can  be  equipped 
later with such equipment and at much lower cost than attempting to retrofit a con-
ventional pulverized coal plant with today’s demonstrated post-combustion systems. 
However,  the  costs  and  engineering  reconfigurations  of  such  an  approach  are  sub-
stantial.  More  importantly,  we  need  to  begin  capturing  CO2 from  new  coal  plants 
without delay in order to keep global warming from becoming a potentially runaway 
problem. Given the pace of new coal investments in the U.S. and globally, we simply 
do not have the time to build a coal plant today and think about capturing its CO2 
down the road. 
Geologic Disposal 

We have a significant experience base for injecting large amounts of CO2 into geo-
logic formations. For several decades oil field operators have received high pressure 
CO2 for injection into fields to enhance oil recovery, delivered by pipelines spanning 
as much as several hundred miles. Today in the U.S. a total of more than 35 million 
tons  of  CO2 are  injected  annually  in  more  than  70  projects.  (Unfortunately,  due  to 
the lack of any controls on CO2 emissions, about 80 percent of that CO2 comes from 
natural  CO2 formations  rather  than  captured  from  industrial  sources.  Historians 
will  marvel  that  we  persisted  so  long  in  pulling  CO2 out  of  holes  in  the  ground  in 
order  to  move  it  hundreds  of  miles  and  stick  in  back  in  holes  at  the  same  time  we 
were  recognizing  the  harm  being  caused  by  emissions  of  the  same  molecule  from 
nearby  large  industrial  sources.)  In  addition  to  this  enhanced  oil  recovery  experi-
ence, there are several other large injection projects in operation or announced. The 
longest running of these, the Sleipner project, began in 1996. 

But  the  largest  of  these  projects  injects  on  the  order  of  one  million  tons  per  year 
of  CO2,  while  a  single  large  coal  power  plant  can  produce  about  five  million  tons 
per  year.  And  of  course,  our  experience  with  man-made  injection  projects  does  not 
extend  for  the  thousand  year  or  more  period  that  we  would  need  to  keep  CO2 in 
place  underground  for  it  to  be  effective  in  helping  to  avoid  dangerous  global  warm-
ing. Accordingly, the public and interested members of the environmental, industry 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

and policy communities rightly ask whether we can carry out a large scale injection 
program safely and assure that the injected CO2 will stay where we put it. 

Let  me  summarize  the  findings  of  the  IPCC  on  the  issues  of  safety  and  efficacy 
of  CCD.  In  its  2005  report  the  IPCC  concluded  the  following  with  respect  to  the 
question  of  whether  we  can  safely  carry  out  carbon  injection  operations  on  the  re-
quired scale: 

‘‘With  appropriate  site  selection  based  on  available  subsurface  information,  a 
monitoring  programme  to  detect  problems,  a  regulatory  system  and  the  appro-
priate  use  of  remediation  methods  to  stop  or  control  CO2 releases  if  they  arise, 
the  local  health,  safety  and  environment  risks  of  geological  storage  would  be 
comparable  to  the  risks  of  current  activities  such  as  natural  gas  storage,  EOR 
and deep underground disposal of acid gas.’’ 

The knowledge exists to fulfill all of the conditions the IPCC identifies as needed 
to assure safety. While EPA has authority regulate large scale CO2 injection projects 
its current underground injection control regulations are not designed to require the 
appropriate  showings  for  permitting  a  facility  intended  for  long-term  retention  of 
large  amounts  of  CO2.  With  adequate  resources  applied,  EPA  should  be  able  to 
adopt  the  necessary  revisions  to  its  rules  in  one  to  2  years.  While  EPA  has  an-
nounced  its  intention  to  issue  a  proposed  rule  this  year,  intense  oversight  by  Con-
gress is likely to be needed to assure this happens. 

Do  we  have  a  basis  today  for  concluding  that  injected  CO2 will  stay  in  place  for 
the  long  periods  required  to  prevent  its  contributing  to  global  warming?  The  IPCC 
report concluded that we do, stating: 

‘‘Observations from engineered and natural analogues as well as models suggest 
that the fraction retained in appropriately selected and managed geological res-
ervoirs is very likely to exceed 99 percent over 100 years and is likely to exceed 
99 percent over 1,000 years.’’ 

Despite this conclusion by recognized experts there is still reason to ask what are 
the implications of imperfect execution of large scale injection projects, especially in 
the  early  years  before  we  have  amassed  more  experience?  Is  this  reason  enough  to 
delay  application  of  CO2 capture  systems  to  new  power  plants  until  we  gain  such 
experience  from  an  initial  round  of  multi-million  ton  ‘‘demonstration’’  projects?  To 
sketch  an  answer  to  this  question,  my  colleague  Stefan  Bachu,  a  geologist  with  the 
Alberta  Energy  and  Utilities  Board,  and  I  wrote  a  paper  for  the  Eighth  Inter-
national Conference on Greenhouse Gas Control Technologies in June 2006. The ob-
vious and fundamental point we made is that without CO2 capture, new coal plants 
built  during  any  ‘‘delay  and  research’’  period  will  put  100  percent  of  their  CO2 into 
the air and may do so for their operating life if they were ‘‘grandfathered’’ from ret-
rofit  requirements.  Those  releases  need  to  be  compared  to  hypothetical  leaks  from 
early injection sites. 

Our  conclusions  were  that  even  with  extreme,  unrealistically  high  hypothetical 
leakage  rates  from  early  injection  sites  (10  percent  per  year),  a  long  period  to  leak 
detection (5 years) and a prolonged period to correct the leak (1 year), a policy that 
delayed  installation  of  CO2 capture  at  new  coal  plants  to  await  further  research 
would  result  in  cumulative  CO2 releases  twenty  times  greater  than  from  the  hypo-
thetical  faulty  injectionsites,  if  power  plants  built  during  the  research  period  were 
‘‘grandfathered’’ from retrofit requirements. If this wave of new coal plants were all 
required  to  retrofit  CO2 capture  by  no  later  than  2030,  the  cumulative  emissions 
would  still  be  four  times  greater  than  under  the  no  delay  scenario.  I  believe  that 
any  objective  assessment  will  conclude  that  allowing  new  coal  plants  to  be  built 
without CO2 capture equipment on the ground that we need more large scale injec-
tion experience will always result in significantly greater CO2 releases than starting 
CO2 capture without delay for new coal plants now being designed. 

The  IPCC  also  made  estimates  about  global  storage  capacity  for  CO2 in  geologic 

formations. It concluded as follows: 

‘‘Available  evidence  suggests  that,  worldwide,  it  is  likely  that  there  is  a  tech-
nical  potential  of  at  least  about  2,000  GtCO2 (545  GtC)  of  storage  capacity  in 
geological formations. There could be a much larger potential for geological stor-
age in saline formations, but the upper limit estimates are uncertain due to lack 
of information and an agreed methodology.’’ 

Current  CO2 emissions  from  the  world’s  power  plants  are  about  10  Gt  (billion 
metric tons) per year, so the IPCC estimate indicates 200 years of capacity if power 
plant  emissions  did  not  increase  and  100  years  capacity  if  annual  emissions  dou-
bled. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Policy Actions to Speed CCD 

43 

As I stated earlier, research and development funding is useful but it cannot sub-
stitute for the incentive that a genuine commercial market for CO2 capture and dis-
posal systems will provide to the private sector. The amounts of capital that the pri-
vate  sector  can  spend  to  optimize  CCD  methods  will  almost  certainly  always  dwarf 
what  Congress  will  provide  with  taxpayer  dollars.  To  mobilize  those  private  sector 
dollars,  Congress  needs  a  stimulus  more  compelling  than  the  offer  of  modest  hand-
outs  for  research.  Congress  has  a  model  that  works:  intelligently  designed  policies 
to  limit  emissions  cause  firms  to  spend  money  finding  better  and  less  expensive 
ways to prevent or capture emissions. 

Where a technology is already competitive with other emission control techniques, 
for example, sulfur dioxide scrubbers, a cap and trade program like that enacted by 
Congress  in  1990,  can  result  in  more  rapid  deployment,  improvements  in  perform-
ance,  and  reductions  in  costs.  Today’s  scrubbers  are  much  more  effective  and  much 
less costly than those built in the 1980s. 

However,  a  CO2 cap  and  trade  program  by  itself  may  not  result  in  deployment 
of  CCD  systems  as  rapidly  as  we  need.  Many  new  coal  plant  design  decisions  are 
being  made  literally  today.  Depending  on  the  pace  of  required  reductions  under  a 
global  warming  bill,  a  firm  may  decide  to  build  a  conventional  coal  plant  and  pur-
chase  credits  from  the  cap  and  trade  market  rather  than  applying  CCD  systems  to 
the  plant.  While  this  may  appear  to  be  economically  rational  in  the  short  term,  it 
is likely to lead to higher costs of CO2 control in the mid and longer term if substan-
tial  amounts  of  new  conventional  coal  construction  leads  to  ballooning  demand  for 
CO2 credits.  Recall  that  in  the  late  1990s  and  the  first  few  years  of  this  century, 
individual firms thought it made economic sense to build large numbers of new gas- 
fired  power  plants.  The  problem  is  too  many  of  them  had  the  same  idea  and  the 
resulting increase in demand for natural gas increased both the price and volatility 
of natural gas to the point where many of these investments are idle today. 

Moreover,  delaying  the  start  of  CCD  until  a  cap  and  trade  system  price  is  high 
enough  to  produce  these  investments  delays  the  broad  demonstration  of  the  tech-
nology  that  the  U.S.  and  other  countries  will  need  if  we  continue  substantial  use 
of  coal  as  seem  likely.  The  more  affordable  CCD  becomes,  the  more  widespread  its 
use will be throughout the world, including in rapidly growing economies like China 
and  India.  But  the  learning  and  cost  reductions  for  CCD  that  are  desirable  will 
come only from the experience gained by building and operating the initial commer-
cial plants. The longer we wait to ramp up this experience, the longer we will wait 
to see CCD deployed here and in countries like China. 

Accordingly, we believe the best policy package is a hybrid program that combines 
the  breadth  and  flexibility  of  a  cap  and  trade  program  with  well-designed  perform-
ance  measures  focused  on  key  technologies  like  CCD.  One  such  performance  meas-
ure  is  a  CO2 emissions  standard  that  applies  to  new  power  investments.  California 
enacted such a measure in S.B. 1368 last year. It requires new investments for sale 
of  power  in  California  to  meet  a  performance  standard  that  is  achievable  by  coal 
with a moderate amount of CO2 capture. 

Another  approach  is  a  low-carbon  generation  obligation  for  coal-based  power. 
Similar in concept to a renewable performance standard, the low-carbon generation 
obligation requires an initially small fraction of sales from coal-based power to meet 
a  CO2 performance  standard  that  is  achievable  with  CCD.  The  required  fraction  of 
sales  would  increase  gradually  over  time  and  the  obligation  would  be  tradable. 
Thus,  a  coal-based  generating  firm  could  meet  the  requirement  by  building  a  plant 
with CCD, by purchasing power generated by another source that meets the stand-
ard,  or  by  purchasing  credits  from  those  who  build  such  plants.  This  approach  has 
the  advantage  of  speeding  the  deployment  of  CCD  while  avoiding  the  ‘‘first  mover 
penalty.’’  Instead  of  causing  the  first  builder  of  a  commercial  coal  plant  with  CCD 
to  bear  all  of  the  incremental  costs,  the  tradable  low-carbon  generation  obligation 
would  spread  those  costs  over  the  entire  coal-based  generation  system.  The  builder 
of  the  first  unit  would  achieve  far  more  hours  of  low-carbon  generation  than  re-
quired and would sell the credits to other firms that needed credits to comply. These 
credit sales would finance the incremental costs of these early units. This approach 
provides  the  coal-based  power  industry  with  the  experience  with  a  technology  that 
it  knows  is  needed  to  reconcile  coal  use  and  climate  protection  and  does  it  without 
sticker shock. 

A bill introduced last year, S. 309, contains such a provision. It begins with a re-
quirement  that  one-half  of  one  per  cent  of  coal-based  power  sales  must  meet  the 
low-carbon  performance  standard  starting  in  2015  and  the  required  percentage  in-
creases over time according to a statutory minimum schedule that can be increased 
in specified amounts by additional regulatory action. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

A  word  about  costs  is  in  order.  With  today’s  off  the  shelf  systems,  estimates  are 
that  the  production  cost  of  electricity  at  a  coal  plant  with  CCD  could  be  as  much 
as  40  percent  higher  than  at  a  conventional  plant  that  emits  its  CO2.  But  the  im-
pact on average electricity prices of introducing CCD now will be very much smaller 
due  to  several  factors.  First,  power  production  costs  represent  about  60  percent  of 
the  price  you  and  I  pay  for  electricity;  the  rest  comes  from  transmission  and  dis-
tribution costs. Second, coal-based power represents just over half of U.S. power con-
sumption.  Third,  and  most  important,  even  if  we  start  now,  CCD  would  be  applied 
to  only  a  small  fraction  of  U.S.  coal  capacity  for  some  time.  Thus,  with  the  trading 
approach  I  have  outlined,  the  incremental  costs  on  the  units  equipped  with  CCD 
would be spread over the entire coal-based power sector or possibly across all fossil 
capacity depending on the choices made by Congress. Based on CCD costs available 
in  2005  we  estimate  that  a  low-carbon  generation  obligation  large  enough  to  cover 
all  forecasted  new  U.S.  coal  capacity  through  2020  could  be  implemented  for  about 
a two per cent increase in average U.S. retail electricity rates. 
Recent Congressional Action 

Title  VII  of  the  Energy  Independence  and  Security  Act  of  2007  (EISA)  contains 
some provisions that, if funded, will help to make CCD a reality. These include au-
thorizations to conduct at least seven large-scale geologic sequestration projects and 
separate  authorizations  for  projects  for  large-scale  capture  of  CO2 from  industrial 
sources.  A  third  provision  requires  the  U.S.  Geological  Survey  to  carry  out  a  com-
prehensive assessment of capacity for geologic disposal of CO2. 

NRDC supports implementation of these provisions but we urge that they be com-
plemented  with  enactment  this  year  of  a  comprehensive  program  to  cap  CO2 and 
other  greenhouse  gases,  along  with  complementary  policies  to  accelerate  CCD  de-
ployment. Enacting such a cap and trade bill will demonstrate the policy resolve to 
shift  to  lower-emitting  energy  investments,  including  CCD.  That  will  help  ensure 
that  the  demonstrations  called  for  in  EISA  are  integrated  with  commercial  energy 
investments  rather  than  being  carried  out  with  a  science  experiment  mentality.  It 
will  also  spur  much  more  cost-effective  cost-sharing  arrangements  with  industry 
since  these  projects  will  help  industry  participants  meet  their  obligations  under  a 
cap  and  trade  program.  As  is  shown  by  legislation  like  the  Lieberman-Warner  Cli-
mate Security Act, S. 2191, such comprehensive legislation can provide much larger 
resources  to  promote  early  CCD  projects  than  the  amounts  authorized  by  EISA, 
even if the EISA funds were fully appropriated. 

NRDC  believes  that  the  large-scale  projects  in  EISA  should  be  implemented  as 
an  integral  component  of  a  policy  to  move  forward  with  near-term  deployment  of 
CCD.  New  coal-fired  power  plants  continue  to  be  proposed  in  the  U.S.  and  it  is  es-
sential  that  any  such  plants  should  employ  CCD.  EISA’s  large-scale  injection 
projects  can  serve  as  repositories  for  the  CO2 produced  by  such  plants.  Thus,  these 
projects should not be thought of as short-term operations that will be operated for 
a few years and then shut down. Any early ‘‘demonstration’’ projects should be per-
mitted  by  EPA  for  operation  as  permanent  repositories.  Such  projects  also  should 
use anthropogenic CO2, as opposed to the use of naturally occurring or recycled CO2 
used in most enhanced oil recovery projects today. 

Finally,  I  want  to  repeat  the  importance  of  prompt  adoption  of  permitting  and 
operational  requirements  for  CO2 disposal  by  EPA.  While  EPA  has  announced  an 
intention to propose rules this year, we encourage this Committee to work with the 
Environment  and  Public  Works  and  the  Appropriations  Committees  to  assure  that 
EPA adopts final rules in an expeditious manner. 
Conclusions 

To  sum  up,  since  we  will  almost  certainly  continue  using  large  amounts  of  coal 
in  the  U.S.  and  globally  in  the  coming  decades,  it  is  imperative  that  we  act  now 
to  deploy  CCD  systems.  Commercially  demonstrated  CO2 capture  systems  exist 
today  and  competing  systems  are  being  researched.  Improvements  in  current  sys-
tems and emergence of new approaches will be accelerated by requirements to limit 
CO2 emissions.  Commercial  deployment  of  such  systems  will  only  happen  with  en-
actment of comprehensive climate bills that cap CO2 and incorporate complementary 
policies  to  promote  accelerated  deployment  of  CCD.  Geologic  disposal  of  large 
amounts of CO2 is viable and we know enough today to conclude that it can be done 
safely  and  effectively.  EPA  must  act  without  delay  to  revise  its  regulations  to  pro-
vide  the  necessary  framework  for  efficient  permitting,  monitoring  and  operational 
practices for large scale permanent CO2 repositories. 

Finally CCD is an important strategy to reduce CO2 emissions from fossil fuel use 
but  it  is  not  the  basis  for  a  climate  protection  program  by  itself.  Increased  reliance 
on low-carbon energy resources is the key to protecting the climate. The lowest car-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

bon  resource  of  all  is  smarter  use  of  energy;  energy  efficiency  investments  will  be 
the  backbone  of  any  sensible  climate  protection  strategy.  Renewable  energy  will 
need  to  assume  a  much  greater  role  than  it  does  today.  With  today’s  use  of  solar, 
wind and biomass energy, we tap only a tiny fraction of the energy the sun provides 
every  day.  There  is  enormous  potential  to  expand  our  reliance  on  these  resources. 
We have no time to lose to begin cutting global warming emissions. Fortunately, we 
have technologies ready for use today that can get us started. 

Mr.  Chairman,  that  completes  my  testimony,  I  will  be  happy  to  take  any  ques-

tions you or other committee members may have. 

Senator KERRY. Well, thank you, Mr. Hawkins. 
I,  personally,  couldn’t  agree  with  you  more,  but  we’ll  talk  about 

that a lot more in a second. 

Mr. Novak? 

STATEMENT OF JOHN NOVAK, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

FEDERAL AND INDUSTRY ACTIVITIES, ENVIRONMENT AND 

GENERATION, ELECTRIC POWER RESEARCH INSTITUTE 

Mr.  NOVAK.  Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Kerry,  Ranking  Member 

Ensign, and Senator Stevens. 

I’m  John  Novak,  Executive  Director  of  Federal  and  Industry  ac-
tivities at the Electric Power Research Institute and as I hope you 
know, EPRI conducts research and development on technology, op-
erations  and  the  environment,  for  the  global  electric  power  indus-
try. 

As  Senator  Kerry  mentioned,  last  November  my  colleague,  Dr. 
Bryan  Hannegan  testified  before  this  committee,  this  Sub-
committee,  about  our  PRISM  and  MERGE  analyses.  These  anal-
yses  show  the  need  for,  and  the  value  of,  having  a  full  portfolio  of 
technologies,  including  end-  use  energy  efficiency,  renewable  nu-
clear  power,  advanced  coal  with  CO2 capture  and  storage,  and 
plug-in  hybrid  electric  vehicles  in  order  to  meet  future  electricity 
demand, and to meet global climate change goals. 

As  EPRI’s  President,  Steve  Specker,  has  said  on  numerous  occa-

sions about technologies, ‘‘We need them all.’’ 

Information  on  the  PRISM/MERGE  analysis  can  be  found  in  a 
recent, the Fall issue of our EPRI journal, and I’ve provided copies 
for  the  Subcommittee.  One  fundamental  implication  of  our  work  is 
very  clear—we  must  move  from  analysis  to  action  if  we  are  to  de-
ploy this full portfolio of technologies in a timely and effective man-
ner. For coal, this implies a full portfolio of coal technologies. 

We’re talking about IGCC, IGCC—particularly when you plan to 
capture  and  store  CO2—has  some  advantages  over  traditional  pul-
verized  coal.  But  today’s  IGCC  designs  have  some  disadvantages, 
as well. 

EPRI’s  Coalfleet  for  Tomorrow program  has  identified  the 
RD&D  pathways  to  demonstrate,  by  2025,  a  full  portfolio  of  eco-
nomically attractive, commercial-scale, advanced coal-powered inte-
grated CO2 capture and storage technologies suitable for use within 
the  broad  range  of  U.S.  coal  types,  and  information  on  that  path-
way is included in my testimony. 

The key to proving CO2 capture and storage capability is a dem-
onstration of CO2 capture and storage at large scale—at IGCC, for 
pulverized  coal  and  for  oxy-combustion—the  storage  of  the  CO2 in 
a  variety  of  geologies.  Large,  combined  capture  and  storage  dem-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

onstrations should be encouraged in different regions, and with dif-
ferent coals and technologies. 

To help move from analysis to action, EPRI has identified a num-
ber  of  demonstration  projects  that  target  critical  gaps,  that  must 
be achieved to achieve this full portfolio of technologies. 

Five of the critical projects are aimed at demonstrating the effec-
tiveness,  and  reducing  the  cost,  of  CO2 capture  and  storage  from 
coal  plants.  These  five  coal  projects  include  two  projects  for  dem-
onstrating different post-combustion CO2 capture technologies with 
storage, one with American Electric Power and one with the South-
ern company—it includes a project to demonstrate IGCC operation 
with  integrated  CO2 capture  and  storage,  a  high-efficiency  pulver-
ized  coal  plant  with  state-of-the-art  emissions  controls,  and  inte-
grated  CO2 capture  and  storage—we  call  that  our  UltraGen 
project—and  the  demonstration  of  a  key  enabling  technology  to 
lower  the  cost  of  oxygen  production  for  IGCC  and  oxy-combustion 
plants. 

These  projects  are  designed  to  compliment  ongoing  private  and 
government  sector  activities.  All  of  these  critical  demonstration 
projects  were  identified  through  EPRI’s  collaborative  process,  and 
we  expect  to  participate  in  each  of  them.  But  they  are  electricity- 
sector  projects,  not  EPRI  projects.  Each  will  require  a  consortium 
of companies, drawing on both private sector and government fund-
ing, as appropriate for each project. 

EPRI and its members are further evaluating these projects and, 
in  some  cases,  are  already  moving  forward  on  a  plan  to  fund  and 
implement each project. 

EPRI  appreciates  the  opportunity  to  provide  testimony  to  the 
Subcommittee on this important topic, and I would be happy to an-
swer any questions. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Novak follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN NOVAK,  EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR,  FEDERAL AND 
INDUSTRY ACTIVITIES,  ENVIRONMENT AND GENERATION,  ELECTRIC POWER 
RESEARCH INSTITUTE 

Introduction 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member  Ensign,  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee. I am John Novak, Executive Director of Federal and Industry Activities 
for  the  Environment  and  Generation  Sectors  of  the  Electric  Power  Research  Insti-
tute (EPRI). EPRI conducts research and development on technology, operations and 
the environment for the global electric power industry. As an independent, non-prof-
it Institute, EPRI brings together its members, scientists and engineers, along with 
experts from academia, industry and other centers of research to: 

• collaborate in solving challenges in electricity generation, delivery and use; 
• provide technological, policy and economic analyses to drive long-range research 

and development planning; and 

• support multi-discipline research in emerging technologies and issues. 
EPRI’s  members  represent  more  than  90  percent  of  the  electricity  generated  in 
the United States, and international participation extends to 40 countries. EPRI has 
major  offices  and  laboratories  in  Palo  Alto,  California;  Charlotte,  North  Carolina; 
Knoxville, Tennessee, and Lenox, Massachusetts. 

EPRI  appreciates  the  opportunity  to  provide  testimony  to  the  Subcommittee  on 
the topic of integrated gasification combined cycle (IGCC) technologies and the need 
for large scale IGCC demonstration projects that feature CO2 capture and sequestra-
tion. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Integrated Gasification Combined Cycle (IGCC) 

47 

In  integrated  gasification  combined  cycle  plants,  coal  or  petroleum  coke  is  par-
tially  oxidized  with  oxygen  to  CO  and  hydrogen,  the  impurities  cleansed  in  an  acid 
gas removal process and the clean gas (called ‘‘syngas’’) burned in a combined cycle 
to  produce  electricity.  The  energy  use  in  the  cycle  is  integrated  between  the  gasifi-
cation section and the power block, hence the name. 

There  are  only  six  IGCC  plants  in  the  world  operating  on  coal.  These  operating 
units  also  use  petroleum  coke  or  blends  due  to  its  lower  price.  One,  the  Vresova 
IGCC  based  in  the  Czech  Republic  (Lurgi-type  gasifier)  is  350  MW.  The  others  are 
each  about  250  MW.  The  two  in  the  United  States  are  Wabash  (Conoco  Phillips 
gasifier)  and  Polk  (GE  gasifier)  in  Indiana  and  Florida.  Two  additional  IGCCs  in 
Europe  are  Buggenum,  Netherlands  and  Puertollano,  Spain  (both  variations  on  the 
Shell gasifier). A new IGCC started operation this year at Nakoso, Japan (MHI gasi-
fier).  Chemical  plants  around  the  world  have  accumulated  a  100-year  experience 
base  operating  coal-based  gasification  units  and  related  gas  cleanup  processes.  The 
most advanced of these units are similar to the front end of a modern IGCC facility. 
Similarly,  several  decades  of  experience  firing  natural  gas  and  petroleum  distillate 
have  established  a  high  level  of  maturity  for  the  basic  combined  cycle  generating 
technology. 

IGCC  technology  is  still  relatively  new  and  needs  more  commercial  installations. 
Based  on  the  limited  data  available,  today’s  IGCC  plants  are  available  5–7  percent 
fewer hours per year than conventional pulverized coal (PC) plants. While it is like-
ly  that  IGCC  will  ‘‘catch  up’’  with  PC,  the  initial  learning  curve  on  all  IGCCs  to 
date  has  been  slow.  Better  designs,  models,  incorporation  of  lessons  learned  would 
all help. Ongoing RD&D continues to provide significant advances in the base tech-
nologies, as well as in the suite of technologies used to integrate them into an IGCC 
generating facility. 

The emissions of air pollutants and greenhouse gases from an IGCC are less than 
a  conventional  pulverized  coal  plant  (though  latest  designs  make  this  difference 
smaller).  The  IGCC  design  uses  less  water  than  a  conventional  coal  plant  since  a 
great deal of power comes from the gas turbine. The pre-cleaning of primary pollut-
ants prior to combustion in the gas turbine allows possible later capture of CO2 from 
a concentrated high-pressure gas requiring relatively low energy use. 

IGCC plants (like PC plants) do not capture CO2 without substantial plant modi-
fications,  energy  losses,  and  investments  in  additional  process  equipment.  No  one 
is  currently  capturing  CO2 at  full  scale  from  IGCC  plants  that  generate  electricity 
from coal. CO2 separation processes suitable for IGCC plants are used commercially 
in the oil and gas and chemical industries at a scale close to that ultimately needed, 
but their application requires the addition of more processing equipment to an IGCC 
plant and the deployment of gas turbines that can burn nearly pure hydrogen. 

The electricity cost premium for including CO2 capture in IGCC plants, along with 
drying,  compression,  transportation,  and  storage,  is  about  40–50  percent.  Although 
this  is  a  lower  cost  increase  in  percentage  terms  than  that  for  conventional  PC 
plants,  IGCC  plants  initially  cost  more  than  PC  plants.  Thus,  the  bottom-line  cost 
to  consumers  for  power  from  IGCC  plants  with  capture  using  today’s  technology  is 
likely to be comparable to that for PC plants with capture (the actual relative com-
petitiveness depends on coal moisture content and other factors as described below). 
However,  the  magnitude  of  these  impacts  could  likely  be  reduced  substantially 
through aggressive investments in R&D. 

The  CO2 capture  cost  premiums  listed  above  vary  in  real-world  applications,  de-
pending on available coals and their physical-chemical properties, desired plant size, 
the  CO2 capture  process  and  its  degree  of  integration  with  other  plant  processes, 
plant elevation, the value of plant co-products, and other factors. Nonetheless, IGCC 
with  CO2 capture  generally  shows  an  economic  advantage  in  studies  based  on  low- 
moisture  bituminous  coals.  For  coals  with  high  moisture  and  low  heating  value, 
such as subbituminous and lignite coals, an EPRI study shows PC with CO2 capture 
being  competitive  with  or  having  an  advantage  over  IGCC.1 EPRI  stresses  that  no 
single advanced coal generating technology (or any generating technology) has clear- 
cut economic advantages across the range of U.S. applications. The best strategy for 
meeting  future  electricity  needs  in  an  economic  and  environmentally  sustainable 
way lies in developing multiple technologies from which power producers (and their 
regulators) can choose the one best suited to local conditions and preferences. EPRI 
strongly recommends that policies reflect a portfolio approach that enables commer-
cial incorporation of CCS into multiple advanced coal power technologies. 

1 Feasibility  Study  for  an  Integrated  Gasification  Combined  Cycle  Facility  at  a  Texas  Site, 

EPRI report 1014510, October 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

The key to proving CCS capability is the demonstration of CCS at large-scale (on 
the order of 1 million tons CO2/year) for both pre- and post-combustion capture with 
storage  in  a  variety  of  geologies.  Large  combined  capture  and  storage  demonstra-
tions  should  be  encouraged  in  different  regions  and  with  different  coals  and  tech-
nologies. 
Advanced Coal Generation With CO2 Capture and Storage 

Through the development and deployment of advanced coal plants with integrated 
CO2 capture and storage (CCS) technologies, coal power can become part of the solu-
tion  to  satisfying  both  our  energy  needs  and  our  global  climate  change  concerns. 
However,  a  sustained  RD&D  program  at  heightened  levels  of  investment  and  the 
resolution of legal and regulatory unknowns for long-term geologic CO2 storage will 
be  required  to  achieve  the  promise  of  advanced  coal  with  CCS  technologies.  The 
members  of  EPRI’s  CoalFleet  for  Tomorrow program—a  research  collaborative 
comprising  more  than  60  organizations  representing  U.S.  utilities,  international 
power generators, equipment suppliers, government research organizations, coal and 
oil  companies,  and  a  railroad—see  crucial  roles  for  both  industry  and  governments 
worldwide  in  aggressively  pursuing  collaborative  RD&D  over  the  next  20+  years  to 
create  a  full  portfolio  of  commercially  self-sustaining,  competitive  advanced  coal 
power generation and CCS technologies. 

foster a full portfolio of technologies. 

Key Points: 
• Advanced  coal  power  plant  technologies  with  integrated  CO2 capture  and  stor-
age  (CCS)  will  be  crucial  to  lowering  U.S.  electric  power  sector  CO2 emissions. 
They will also be crucial to substantially lowering global CO2 emissions. 
• The  availability  of  advanced  coal  power  and  integrated  CCS  and  other  tech-
nologies  could  dramatically  reduce  the  projected  increases  in  the  cost  of  whole-
sale electricity under a carbon cap. 
• It  is  important  to  avoid  choosing  between  coal  technology  options.  We  should 
• While there are well-proven methods for capturing CO2 resulting from coal gas-
ification,  no  IGCC  plant  captures  CO2.  IGCC  technology  is  still  relatively  new 
and in need of more commercial installations. 
• PC  technology  is  already  well  proven  commercially  in  the  power  industry,  al-
though  potential  for  significant  improvement  exists;  the  need  is  for  demonstra-
tion of post combustion capture at a commercial and affordable scale. 
• There will inevitably be additional costs associated with CCS. EPRI’s latest esti-
mates  suggest  that  the  levelized  cost  of  electricity  (COE)  from  new  coal  plants 
(IGCC  or  supercritical  PC)  designed  for  capture,  compression,  transportation 
and storage of the CO2 will be 40–80 percent higher than the COE of a conven-
tional supercritical PC (SCPC) plant. 
• EPRI’s  technical  assessment  work  indicates  that  the  preferred  technology  and 
the  additional  cost  of  electricity  for  CCS  will  depend  on  the  coal  type,  location 
and  the  technology  employed.  Without  CCS,  SCPC  has  an  advantage  over 
IGCC. However, the additional CCS cost is generally lower with IGCC than for 
SCPC. 
• Some  studies  show  an  advantage  for  IGCC  with  CCS  with  bituminous  coal. 
With  lignite  coal,  SCPC  with  CCS  is  generally  preferred.  With  sub-bituminous 
coal, SCPC with CCS and IGCC with CCS appear to show similar costs. 
• Our  initial  work  with  post-combustion  CO2 capture  technologies  suggests  we 
can  potentially  reduce  the  current  estimated  30  percent  energy  penalty  associ-
ated with CCS to about 15 percent over the longer-term. Improvements in IGCC 
plants offer a comparable potential for reducing the cost and energy penalty as 
well. 
• The  key  to  proving  CCS  capability  is  the  demonstration  of  CCS  at  large-scale 
(i.e., on the order of 1 million tons CO2/year) for both pre- and post-combustion 
capture  and  oxy-combustion  with  storage  in  a  variety  of  geologies.  Large  com-
bined capture and storage demonstrations should be encouraged in different re-
gions and with different coals and technologies. 
• EPRI’s CoalFleet for Tomorrow program has identified the RD&D pathways to 
demonstrate,  by  2025,  a  full  portfolio  of  economically  attractive,  commercial- 
scale  advanced  coal  power  and  integrated  CCS  technologies  suitable  for  use 
with the broad range of U.S. coal types. EPRI is currently developing collabora-
tions to develop and demonstrate a series of IGCC and post combustion capture 
processes to improve the cost and energy use of integrated gasification plus cap-
ture and post combustion technologies. Some technologies will be ready for some 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

fuels sooner, but the economic benefits of competition are not achieved until the 
full portfolio is developed. 
• The identified RD&D is estimated to cost $8 billion between now and 2017 and 
$17  billion  cumulatively  by  2025,  and  we  need  to  begin  immediately  to  ensure 
that  these  climate  change  solution  technologies  will  be  fully  tested  at  scale  by 
2025. 
• Major  non-technical  barriers  associated  with  CO2 storage  need  to  be  addressed 
before  CCS  can  become  a  commercial  reality,  including  resolution  of  regulatory 
and long-term liability uncertainties. 

The  Role  of  Advanced  Coal  Generation  With  CO2 Capture  and  Storage  in 

a Carbon-Constrained Future 

Coal currently provides over half of the electricity used in the United States, and 
most forecasts of future energy use in the United States show that coal will continue 
to have a dominant share in our electric power generation for the foreseeable future. 
Coal  is  a  stably  priced,  affordable,  domestic  fuel  that  can  be  used  in  an  environ-
mentally  responsible  manner.  Through  development  of  advanced  pollution  control 
technologies  and  sensible  regulatory  programs,  emissions  of  criteria  air  pollutants 
from  new  coal-fired  power  plants  have  been  reduced  by  more  than  90  percent  over 
the  past  three  decades.  And  by  displacing  otherwise  needed  imports  of  natural  gas 
or  fuel  oil,  coal  helps  address  America’s  energy  security  and  reduces  our  trade  def-
icit with respect to energy. 

EPRI’s  ‘‘Electricity  Technology  in  a  Carbon-Constrained  Future’’  study  suggests 
that  it  is  technically  feasible  to  reduce  U.S.  electric  sector  CO2 emissions  by  25–30 
percent  relative  to  current  emissions  by  2030  while  meeting  the  increased  demand 
for electricity. The study showed that the largest single contributor to emissions re-
duction  would  come  from  the  integration  of  CCS  technologies  with  advanced  coal- 
based power plants coming on-line after 2020. 

Economic  analyses  of  scenarios  to  achieve  the  study’s  emission  reduction  goals 
show that in 2050, a U.S. electricity generation mix based on a full portfolio of tech-
nologies,  including  advanced  coal  technologies  with  integrated  CCS  and  advanced 
light water nuclear reactors, results in wholesale electricity prices at less than half 
of  the  wholesale  electricity  price  for  a  generation  mix  without  advanced  coal/CCS 
and nuclear power. In the case with advanced coal/CCS and nuclear power, the cost 
to  the  U.S.  economy  of  a  CO2 emissions  reduction  policy  is  $1  trillion  less  than  in 
the case without advanced coal/CCS and nuclear power, with a much stronger man-
ufacturing sector. Both of these analyses are documented in the 2007 EPRI Summer 
Seminar  Discussion  paper,  ‘‘The  Power  to  Reduce  CO2 Emissions—the  Full  Port-
folio,’’ available at http://epri-reports.org/DiscussionPaper2007.pdf. 
Accelerating RD&D on Advanced Coal Technologies With CO2 Capture and 

Storage—Investment and Time Requirements 

The  portfolio  aspect  of  advanced  coal  with  integrated  CCS  technologies  must  be 
emphasized  because  no  single  advanced  coal  technology  (or  any  generating  tech-
nology) has clear-cut economic advantages across the range of U.S. applications. The 
best  strategy  for  meeting  future  electricity  needs  while  addressing  climate  change 
concerns  and  minimizing  economic  disruption  lies  in  developing  a  full  portfolio  of 
technologies  from  which  power  producers  (and  their  regulators)  can  choose  the  op-
tion best suited to local conditions and preferences and provide power at the lowest 
cost  to  the  customer.  Toward  this  end,  four  major  technology  efforts  related  to  CO2 
emissions reduction from coal-based power systems must be undertaken: 

1. Increased efficiency and reliability of IGCC power plants 
2. Increased thermodynamic efficiency of PC power plants 
3.  Improved  technologies  for  capture  of  CO2 from  coal  combustion-  and  gasifi-
cation-based power plants 
4. Reliable, acceptable technologies for long-term storage of captured CO2 

Identification  of  mechanisms  to  share  RD&D  financial  and  technical  risks  and  to 

address legal and regulatory uncertainties must take place as well. 

In  short,  a  comprehensive  recognition  of  all  the  factors  needed  to  hasten  deploy-
ment  of  competitive,  commercial  advanced  coal  and  integrated  CO2 capture  and 
storage  technologies—and  implementation  of  realistic,  pragmatic  plans  to  overcome 
barriers—is  the  key  to  meeting  the  challenge  to  supply  affordable,  environmentally 
responsible energy in a carbon-constrained world. 

A typical path to develop a technology to commercial maturity consists of moving 
from  the  conceptual  stage  to  laboratory  testing,  to  small  pilot-scale  tests,  to  larger- 
scale  tests,  to  multiple  full-scale  demonstrations,  and  finally  to  deployment  in  full- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

scale  commercial  operations.  For  capital-intensive  technologies  such  as  advanced 
coal  power  systems,  each  stage  can  take  years  or  even  a  decade  to  complete,  and 
each  sequential  stage  entails  increasing  levels  of  investment.  As  depicted  in  Figure 
1,  several  key  advanced  coal  power  and  CCS  technologies  are  now  in  (or  approach-
ing) an ‘‘adolescent’’ stage of development. This is a time of particular vulnerability 
in  the  technology  development  cycle,  as  it  is  common  for  the  expected  costs  of  full- 
scale  application  to  be  higher  than  earlier  estimates  when  less  was  known  about 
scale-up  and  application  challenges.  Public  agency  and  private  funders  can  become 
disillusioned with a technology development effort at this point, but as long as fun-
damental technology performance results continue to meet expectations, and a path 
to  cost  reduction  is  clear,  perseverance  by  project  sponsors  in  maintaining  momen-
tum is crucial. 

Unexpectedly high costs at the mid-stage of technology development have histori-
cally  come  down  following  market  introduction,  experience  gained  from  ‘‘learning- 
by-doing,’’  realization  of  economies  of  scale  in  design  and  production  as  order  vol-
umes  rise,  and  removal  of  contingencies  covering  uncertainties  and  first-of-a-kind 
costs.  An  International  Energy  Agency  study  led  by  Carnegie  Mellon  University 
(CMU)  observed  this  pattern  of  cost-reduction-over-time  for  power  plant  environ-
mental  controls,  and  CMU  predicts  a  similar  reduction  in  the  cost  of  power  plant 
CO2 capture technologies as the cumulative installed capacity grows.2 EPRI concurs 
with their expectations of experience-based cost reductions and believes that RD&D 
on  specifically  identified  technology  refinements  can  lead  to  greater  cost  reductions 
sooner in the deployment phase. 

Of  the  coal-based  power  generating  and  carbon  sequestration  technologies  shown 
in  Figure  1,  only  SCPC  technology  has  reached  commercial  maturity.  It  is  crucial 
that other technologies in the portfolio—namely ultra-supercritical (USC) PC, IGCC, 
CO2 capture  (pre-combustion,  post-combustion,  and  oxy-combustion),  and  CO2 stor-
age—be given sufficient support to reach the stage of declining constant dollar costs 
before society’s requirements for greenhouse gas reductions compel their application 
in large numbers. 

Figure  2  depicts  the  major  activities  in  each  of  the  four  technology  areas  that 
must  take  place  to  achieve  a  robust  set  of  integral  advanced  coal/CCS  solutions. 
Please  note  that  UltraGen  III  is  not  included  in  Figure  2  but  the  schedule  for  ‘‘De-
sign,  construction  &  operation  of  NZE  USC  PC  at  up  to  1,400  °F  w/capture’’  is  ex-
pected  to  commence  around  2020.  Important,  but  not  shown  in  the  figure,  are  the 
interactions  between  RD&D  activities.  For  example,  the  ion  transport  membrane 
(ITM)  oxygen  supply  technology  shown  under  IGCC  may  also  be  able  to  be  applied 
to oxy-combustion PC units. Further, while the individual goals related to efficiency, 
CO2 capture,  and  CO2 storage  present  major  challenges,  significant  challenges  also 

2 IEA  Greenhouse  Gas  R&D  Programme  (IEA  GHG),  ‘‘Estimating  Future  Trends  in  the  Cost 

of CO2 Capture Technologies,’’ 2006/5, January 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

b
1
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

arise  from  complex  interactions  that  occur  when  CO2 capture  processes  are  inte-
grated with gasification- and combustion-based power plant processes. 

51 

Reducing CO2 Emissions Through Improved Coal Power Plant Efficiency— 
A  Key  Companion  to  CCS  That  Lowers  Cost  and  Energy  Requirements 
Improved  thermodynamic  efficiency  reduces  CO2 emissions  by  reducing  the 
amount of fuel required to generate a given amount of electricity. A two-percentage 
point  gain  in  efficiency  provides  a  reduction  in  fuel  consumption  of  roughly  5  per-
cent  and  a  similar  reduction  in  flue  gas  and  CO2 output.  Because  the  size  and  cost 
of  CO2 capture  equipment  is  determined  by  the  volume  of  flue  gas  to  be  treated, 
higher power block efficiency reduces the capital and energy requirements for CCS. 
Depending  on  the  technology  used,  improved  efficiency  can  also  provide  similar  re-
ductions in criteria air pollutants, hazardous air pollutants, and water consumption. 
A  typical  baseloaded  500  MW  (net)  coal  plant  emits  about  3  million  metric  tons 
of  CO2 per  year.  Individual  plant  emissions  vary  considerably  given  differences  in 
plant steam cycle, coal type, capacity factor, and operating regimes. For a given fuel, 
however,  a  new  supercritical  PC  unit  built  today  might  produce  5–10  percent  less 
CO2 per  megawatt-hour  (MWh)  than  the  existing  fleet  average  for  that  coal  type. 
With  an  aggressive  RD&D  program  on  efficiency  improvement,  new  USC  PC 
plants could reduce CO2 emissions per MWh by up to 25 percent relative to the ex-
isting fleet average. Significant efficiency gains are also possible for IGCC plants by 
employing  advanced  gas  turbines  and  through  more  energy-efficient  oxygen  plants 
and synthesis (fuel) gas cleanup technologies. 

EPRI  and  the  Coal  Utilization  Research  Council  (CURC),  in  consultation  with 
DOE,  have  identified  a  challenging  but  achievable  set  of  milestones  for  improve-
ments in the efficiency, cost, and emissions of PC and coal-based IGCC plants. The 
EPRI–CURC Roadmap projects an overall improvement in the thermal efficiency of 
state-of-the  art  generating  technology  from  38–41  percent  in  2010  to  44–49  percent 
by 2025 (on a higher heating value [HHV] basis; see Table 1). As Table 1 indicates, 
power-block  efficiency  gains  (i.e.,  without  capture  systems)  will  be  offset  by  the  en-
ergy  required  for  CO2 capture,  but  as  noted,  they  are  important  in  reducing  the 
overall  cost  of  CCS.  Coupled  with  opportunities  for  major  improvements  in  the  en-
ergy  efficiency  of  CO2 capture  processes  per  se,  aggressive  pursuit  of  the  EPRI– 
CURC RD&D program offers the prospect of coal power plants with CO2 capture in 
2025 that have net efficiencies meeting or exceeding current-day power plants with-
out CO2 capture. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

52 

It  is  also  important  to  note  that  the  numeric  ranges  in  Table  1  are  not  simply 
a reflection of uncertainty, but rather they underscore an important point about dif-
ferences among U.S. coals. The natural variations in moisture and ash content and 
combustion characteristics between coals have a significant impact on attainable ef-
ficiency. An advanced coal plant firing Wyoming and Montana’s Powder River Basin 
(PRB)  coal,  for  example,  would  likely  have  an  HHV  efficiency  2  percentage  points 
lower than the efficiency of a comparable plant firing Appalachian bituminous coals. 
Equally  advanced  plants  firing  lignite  would  ikely  have  efficiencies  2  percentage 
points lower than their counterparts firing PRB. Any government incentive program 
with  an  efficiency-based  qualification  criterion  should  recognize  these  inherent  dif-
ferences in the attainable efficiencies for plants using different ranks of coal. 

Table 1.—Efficiency Milestones in EPRI-CURC Roadmap 

PC & IGCC Systems 
(Without CO2 Capture) 

PC & IGCC Systems 
(With CO2 Capture *) 

2010 

2015 

2020 

2025 

38–41% HHV 

39–43% HHV 

42–46% HHV 

44–49% HHV 

31–32% HHV 

31–35% HHV 

33–39% HHV 

39–46% HHV 

* Efficiency values reflect impact of 90 percent CO2 capture, but not compression or transportation. 

New Plant Efficiency Improvements—IGCC 

Although  IGCC  is  not  yet  a  mature  technology  for  coal-fired  power  plants,  chem-
ical plants around the world have accumulated a 100-year experience base operating 
coal-based  gasification  units  and  related  gas  cleanup  processes.  The  most  advanced 
of these units are similar to the front end of a modern IGCC facility. Similarly, sev-
eral  decades  of  experience  firing  natural  gas  and  petroleum  distillate  have  estab-
lished  a  high  level  of  maturity  for  the  basic  combined  cycle  generating  technology. 
Nonetheless,  ongoing  RD&D  continues  to  provide  significant  advances  in  the  base 
technologies,  as  well  as  in  the  suite  of  technologies  used  to  integrate  them  into  an 
IGCC generating facility. 

Efficiency gains in currently proposed IGCC plants will come from the use of new 
‘‘FB-class’’ gas turbines, which will provide an overall plant efficiency gain of about 
0.6  percentage  point  (relative  to  IGCC  units  with  FA-class  models,  such  as  Tampa 
Electric’s  Polk  Power  Station).  This  corresponds  to  a  decrease  in  the  rate  of  CO2 
emissions  per  MWh  of  about  1.5  percent.  Alternatively,  this  means  1.5  percent  less 
fuel  is  required  per  MWh  of  output,  and  thus  the  required  size  of  pre-combustion 
water-gas shift and CO2 separation equipment would be slightly smaller. 

Figure 3 depicts the anticipated time-frame for further developments identified by 
EPRI’s  CoalFleet  for  Tomorrow program  that  promise  a  succession  of  significant 
improvements in IGCC unit efficiency. Key technology advances under development 
include: 

• larger  capacity  gasifiers  (often  via  higher  operating  pressures  that  boost 

throughput without a commensurate increase in vessel size) 

• integration  of  new  gasifiers  with  larger,  more  efficient  G-  and  H-class  gas  tur-

bines 

ygen plants 

• use of ion transport membrane or other more energy-efficient technologies in ox-

• warm  synthesis  gas  cleanup  and  membrane  separation  processes  for  CO2 cap-

ture that reduce energy losses in these areas 

• recycle  of  liquefied  CO2 to  replace  water  in  gasifier  feed  slurry  (reducing  heat 

loss to water evaporation) 

• hybrid combined cycles using fuel cells to achieve generating efficiencies exceed-

ing those of conventional combined cycle technology 

Improvements  in  gasifier  reliability  and  in  control  systems  also  contribute  to  im-
proved  annual  average  efficiency  by  minimizing  the  number  and  duration  of 
startups and shutdowns. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

Counteracting Gas Turbine Output Loss at High Elevations. IGCC plants designed 
for application in high-elevation locations must account for the natural reduction in 
gas  turbine  power  output  that  occurs  where  the  air  is  thin.  This  phenomenon  is 
rooted  in  the  fundamental  volumetric  flow  limitation  of  a  gas  turbine,  and  can  re-
duce  power  output  by  up  to  15  percent  at  an  elevation  of  5,000  feet  (relative  to  a 
comparable plant at sea level). EPRI is exploring measures to counteract this power 
loss,  including  inlet  air  chilling  (a  technique  used  at  natural  gas  power  plants  to 
mitigate  the  power  loss  that  comes  from  thinning  of  the  air  on  a  hot  day)  and  use 
of  supplemental  burners  between  the  gas  turbine  and  steam  turbine  to  boost  the 
plant’s steam turbine section generating capacity. 

Larger,  Higher  Firing  Temperature  Gas  Turbines.  For  plants  coming  on-line 
around  2015,  the  larger  size  G-class  gas  turbines,  which  operate  at  higher  firing 
temperatures (relative to F-class machines) can improve efficiency by 1 to 2 percent-
age  points  while  also  decreasing  capital  cost  per  kW  capacity.  The  H-class  gas  tur-
bines  coming  on-line  in  the  same  timeframe,  which  also  feature  higher  firing  tem-
peratures  as  well  as  steam-based  internal  cooling  of  hot  turbine  components,  will 
provide a further increase in efficiency and capacity. 

Ion  Transport  Membrane-Based  Oxygen  Plants.  Most  gasifiers  used  in  IGCC 
plants  require  a  large  quantity  of  high-pressure,  high  purity  oxygen,  which  is  typi-
cally  generated  onsite  with  an  expensive  and  energy-intensive  cryogenic  process. 
The ITM process allows the oxygen in high-temperature air to pass through a mem-
brane  while  preventing  passage  of  non-oxygen  atoms.  According  to  developers,  an 
ITM-based  oxygen  plant  consumes  35–60  percent  less  power  and  costs  35  percent 
less  than  a  cryogenic  plant.  DOE  has  been  supporting  development  of  this  tech-
nology. EPRI is performing a due diligence assessment of this technology in advance 
of potential participation in technology scale-up efforts and is planning to solicit an 
industry consortium to support development. 

Supercritical  Heat  Recovery  Steam  Generators.  In  IGCC  plants,  hot  exhaust  gas 
exiting  the  gas  turbine  is  ducted  into  a  heat  exchanger  known  as  a  heat  recovery 
steam  generator  (HRSG)  to  transfer  energy  into  water-filled  tubes  producing  steam 
to  drive  a  steam  turbine.  This  combination  of  a  gas  turbine  and  steam  turbine 
power cycles produces electricity more efficiently than either a gas turbine or steam 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

54 

turbine alone. As with conventional steam power plants, the efficiency of the steam 
cycle in a combined cycle plant increases when turbine inlet steam temperature and 
pressure are increased. The higher exhaust temperatures of G- and H-class gas tur-
bines  offer  the  potential  for  adoption  of  more-efficient  supercritical  steam  cycles. 
Materials  for  use  in  a  supercritical  HRSG  are  generally  established,  and  thus 
should not pose a barrier to technology implementation once G- and H-class gas tur-
bines become the standard for IGCC designs. 

Synthesis  Gas  Cleaning  at  Higher  Temperatures.  The  acid  gas  recovery  (AGR) 
processes  currently  used  to  remove  sulfur  compounds  from  synthesis  gas  require 
that  the  gas  and  solvent  be  cooled  to  about  100  °F,  thereby  causing  a  loss  in  effi-
ciency.  Further  costs  and  efficiency  loss  are  inherent  in  the  process  equipment  and 
auxiliary steam required to recover the sulfur compounds from the solvent and con-
vert them to useable products. Several DOE-sponsored RD&D efforts aim to reduce 
the energy losses and costs imposed by this recovery process. These technologies (de-
scribed below) could be ready—with adequate RD&D support—by 2020: 

• The  Selective  Catalytic  Oxidation  of  Hydrogen  Sulfide  process  eliminates  the 
Claus  and  Tail  Gas  Treating  units,  along  with  the  traditional  solvent-based 
AGR contactor, regenerator, and heat exchangers, by directly converting hydro-
gen sulfide (H2S) to elemental sulfur. The process allows for a higher operating 
temperature of approximately 300 °F, which eliminates part of the low-tempera-
ture  gas  cooling  train.  The  anticipated  benefit  is  a  net  capital  cost  reduction  of 
about $60/kW along with an efficiency gain of about 0.8 percentage point. 
• The RTI/Eastman High-Temperature Desulfurization System uses a regenerable 
dry  zinc  oxide  sorbent  in  a  dual  loop  transport  reactor  system  to  convert  H2S 
and  COS  to  H2O,  CO2,  and  SO2.  Tests  at  Eastman  Chemical  Company  have 
shown  sulfur  species  removal  rates  above  99.9  percent,  with  10  ppm  output 
versus 8,000+ ppm input sulfur, using operating temperatures of 800–1,000 °F. 
This  process  is  also  being  tested  for  its  ability  to  provide  a  high-pressure  CO2 
by-product.  The  anticipated  benefit  for  IGCC,  compared  with  using  a  standard 
oil-industry  process  for  sulfur  removal,  is  a  net  capital  cost  reduction  of  $60– 
$90 per kW, a thermal efficiency gain of 2–4 percent for the gasification process, 
and  a  slight  reduction  in  operating  cost.  Tests  are  also  under  way  for  a  multi- 
contaminant  removal  processes  that  can  be  integrated  with  the  transport 
desulfurization system at temperatures above 480 °F. 

Liquid  CO2-Coal  Slurrying  for  Gasification  of  Low-Rank  Coals.  Future  IGCC 
plants  with  CCS  may  recycle  some  of  the  recovered  liquid  CO2 to  replace  water  as 
the slurrying medium for the coal feed. This is expected to increase gasification effi-
ciency  for  all  coals,  but  particularly  for  subbituminous  coal  and  lignite,  which  have 
naturally  high  moisture  contents.  The  liquid  CO2 has  a  lower  heat  of  vaporization 
than  water  and  is  able  to  carry  more  coal  per  unit  mass  of  fluid.  The  liquid  CO2- 
coal slurry will flash almost immediately upon entering the gasifier, providing good 
dispersion  of  the  coal  particles  and  potentially  yielding  the  higher  performance  of 
a dry-fed gasifier with the simplicity of a slurry-fed system. 

Traditionally, slurry-fed gasification technologies have a cost advantage over con-
ventional dry-fed fuel handling systems, but they suffer a large performance penalty 
when  used  with  coals  containing  a  large  fraction  of  water  and  ash.  EPRI  identified 
CO2 coal  slurrying  as  an  innovative  fuel  preparation  concept  20  years  ago,  when 
IGCC  technology  was  in  its  infancy.  At  that  time,  however,  the  cost  of  producing 
liquid  CO2 was  too  high  to  justify  the  improved  thermodynamic  performance.  Re-
quirements for CCS change that, as it will substantially reduce the incremental cost 
of producing a liquid CO2 stream. 

To date, CO2-coal slurrying has only been demonstrated at pilot scale and has yet 
to  be  assessed  in  feeding  coal  to  a  gasifier,  so  the  estimated  performance  benefits 
remain to be confirmed. It will first be necessary, however, to update previous stud-
ies  to  quantify  the  potential  benefit  of  liquid  CO2 slurries  with  IGCC  plants  de-
signed for CO2 capture. If the predicted benefit is economically advantageous, a sig-
nificant  amount  of  scale-up  and  demonstration  work  would  be  required  to  qualify 
this technology for commercial use. 

Fuel Cells and IGCC. No matter how far gasification and turbine technologies ad-
vance, IGCC power plant efficiency will never progress beyond the inherent thermo-
dynamic limits of the gas turbine and steam turbine power cycles (along with lower 
limits  imposed  by  available  materials  technology).  Several  IGCC-fuel  cell  hybrid 
power  plant  concepts  (IGFC)  aim  to  provide  a  path  to  coal-based  power  generation 
with net efficiencies that exceed those of conventional combined cycle generation. 

Along  with  its  high  thermal  efficiency,  the  fuel  cell  hybrid  cycle  reduces  the  en-
ergy  consumption  for  CO2 capture.  The  anode  section  of  the  fuel  cell  produces  a 
stream  that  is  highly  concentrated  in  CO2.  After  removal  of  water,  this  stream  can 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

be  compressed  for  sequestration.  The  concentrated  CO2 stream  is  produced  without 
having  to  include  a  water-gas  shift  reactor  in  the  process  (see  Figure  4).  This  fur-
ther  improves  the  thermal  efficiency  and  decreases  capital  cost.  IGFC  power  sys-
tems are a long-term solution, however, and are unlikely to see full-scale demonstra-
tion until about 2030. 

The  Changing  Role  of  FutureGen.  In  January  of  this  year,  DOE  announced  a  re-
structured approach to the FutureGen project. Previously, the FutureGen Industrial 
Alliance  and  DOE  were  intending  to  build  a  first-of-its-kind,  near-zero  emissions 
coal-fed IGCC power plant integrated with CCS. The commencement of full-scale op-
erations was targeted for 2013. The project aimed at storing CO2 in a representative 
geologic  formation  at  a  rate  of  at  least  one  million  metric  tons  per  year.  DOE  had 
committed to spend $1.1 billion in support of the project while the FutureGen Indus-
trial Alliance had agreed to contribute $400 million. 

Under its revised approach, DOE will offer to pay the additional cost of capturing 
CO2 at multiple IGCC plants. Each plant would capture and store at least 1 million 
tons  of  CO2 per  year.  DOE’s  goal  is  to  have  the  plants  in  operation  between  2015 
and 2016. 

The  original  FutureGen  concept  was  meant  to  serve  as  a  ‘‘living  laboratory’’  for 
testing  advanced  technologies  that  offered  the  promise  of  clean  environmental  per-
formance  at  a  reduced  cost  and  increased  reliability.  The  original  FutureGen  con-
cept, as shown in Figure 5 was to have the flexibility to conduct full-scale and slip-
stream tests of such scalable advanced technologies as: 

• Membrane processes to replace cryogenic separation for oxygen production 
• An advanced transport reactor sidestream with 30 percent of the capacity of the 

main gasifier 

• Advanced membrane and solvent processes for H2 and CO2 separation 
• A raw gas shift reactor that reduces the upstream clean-up requirements 
• Ultra-low-NOX combustors  that  can  be  used  with  high-hydrogen  synthesis  gas 
• A fuel cell hybrid combined cycle pilot 
• Smart dynamic plant controls including a CO2 management system 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

a
4
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

56 

While  the  revised  DOE  FutureGen  concept  will  meet  the  original  goal  of  having 
a  CCS  test  of  at  least  1  million  tons  of  CO2 per  year  (albeit  two  to  3  years  later 
than  the  original  target),  the  other  original  goal  of  also  hosting  the  development  of 
several  advanced  technologies  for  decreasing  plant  costs  appears  to  have  been 
dropped. 

EPRI  has  responded  to  DOE’s  RFI  on  the  revised  FutureGen  concept.  We  asked 
for  clarification  on  what  aspects  of  the  costs  of  including  CO2 capture  and  storage 
(CCS)  would  be  covered,  and  we  gave  our  estimate  of  what  the  total  costs  would 
be for including CCS on one train of a two-train 600 MW IGCC. We also highlighted 
the  other  major  RD&D  activities  that  are  needed  for  improving  the  efficiency  and 
cost  of  IGCC  technologies  with  CO2 capture  (see  Figure  6).  In  addition,  we  asked 
whether  non-IGCC  coal  power  plants  which  capture  at  least  1  million  tons  of  CO2 
per  year  could  qualify  for  funding  under  the  revised  FutureGen  concept.  For  exam-
ple,  would  the  incremental  CCS  costs  of  a  project  such  as  our  proposed  UltraGen 
advanced  SCPC  plant  with  post-combustion  capture  and  geological  storage  of  CO2 
be eligible for DOE support under the restructured FutureGen concept. 

New Plant Efficiency Improvements—Advanced Pulverized Coal 

Pulverized-coal  power  plants  have  long  been  a  primary  source  of  reliable  and  af-
fordable  power  in  the  United  States  and  around  the  world.  The  advanced  level  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

6
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

s
p
e
.
5
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

57 

maturity  of  the  technology,  along  with  basic  thermodynamic  principles,  suggests 
that significant efficiency gains can most readily be realized by increasing the oper-
ating  temperatures  and  pressures  of  the  steam  cycle.  Such  increases,  in  turn,  can 
be  achieved  only  if  there  is  adequate  development  of  suitable  materials  and  new 
boiler  and  steam  turbine  designs  that  allow  use  of  higher  steam  temperatures  and 
pressures. 

Current  state-of-the-art  plants  use  supercritical  main  steam  conditions  (i.e.,  tem-
perature  and  pressure  above  the  ‘‘critical  point’’  where  the  liquid  and  vapor  phases 
of  water  are  indistinguishable).  SCPC  plants  typically  have  main  steam  conditions 
up  to  1,100  °F.  The  term  ‘‘ultra-supercritical’’  is  used  to  describe  plants  with  main 
steam temperatures in excess of 1,100 °F and potentially as high as 1,400 °F. 

Achieving higher steam temperatures and higher efficiency will require the devel-
opment of new corrosion-resistant, high-temperature nickel alloys for use in the boil-
er  and  steam  turbine.  In  the  United  States,  these  challenges  are  being  address  by 
the  Ultra-Supercritical  Materials  Consortium,  a  DOE  R&D  program  involving  En-
ergy  Industries  of  Ohio,  EPRI,  the  Ohio  Coal  Development  Office,  and  numerous 
equipment suppliers. EPRI provides technical management for the Consortium. Re-
sults  are  applicable  to  all  ranks  of  coal.  As  noted,  higher  power  block  efficiencies 
translate to lower costs for post-combustion CO2 capture equipment. 
It is expected that a USC PC plant operating at about 1,300 °F will be built dur-
ing  the  next  seven  to  10  years,  following  the  demonstration  and  commercial  avail-
ability of advanced materials from these programs. This plant would achieve an effi-
ciency (before installation of CO2 capture equipment) of about 45 percent (HHV) on 
bituminous  coal,  compared  with  39  percent  for  a  current  state-of-the-art  plant,  and 
would reduce CO2 production per net MWh by about 15 percent. 
Ultimately,  nickel-base  alloys  are  expected  to  enable  stream  temperatures  in  the 
neighborhood  of  1,400  °F  and  pre-capture  generating  efficiencies  up  to  47  percent 
HHV  with  bituminous  coal.  This  approximately  10  percentage  point  improvement 
over  the  efficiency  of  a  new  subcritical  pulverized-coal  plant  would  equate  to  a  de-
crease of about 25 percent in CO2 and other emissions per MWh. The resulting sav-
ing in the cost of subsequently installed CO2 capture equipment is substantial. 
Figure 7 illustrates a timeline developed by EPRI’s CoalFleet for Tomorrow pro-
gram  to  establish  efficiency  improvement  and  cost  reduction  goals  for  USC  PC 
plants with CO2 capture. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
7
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

58 

UltraGen  Ultrasupercritical  (USC)  Pulverized  Coal  (PC)  Commercial  Projects. 
EPRI and industry representatives have proposed a program to support commercial 
projects  that  demonstrate  advanced  PC  and  CCS  technologies.  The  vision  entails 
construction of two (or more) commercially operated USC PC power plants that com-
bine  state-of-the-art  pollution  controls,  ultra-supercritical  steam  power  cycles,  and 
innovative CO2 capture technologies. 

The  UltraGen  I  plant  will  use  the  best  of  today’s  proven  ferritic  steels  in  high- 
temperature  boiler  and  steam  turbine  components,  while  UltraGen  II  will  be  the 
first  plant  in  the  United  States  to  feature  nickel-based  alloys  and  is  designed  for 
steam  temperatures  up  to  1,300  °F.  UltraGen  III  will  be  designed  for  steam  tem-
peratures  up  to  1,400 °F  using  materials  currently  under  development  by  the  DOE 
boiler and steam turbine materials program. 

UltraGen  I  will  demonstrate  CO2 capture  modules  that  separate  about  1  million 
tons CO2/yr using the best-established technology. This system will be about 6 times 
the size of the largest CO2 capture system operating on a coal-fired boiler today, and 
will  be  integrated  into  the  thermal  cycle  of  the  boiler  to  minimize  parasitic  loads 
and  capacity  loss.  UltraGen  II  will  at  least  double  the  size  of  the  UltraGen  I  CO2 
capture  system,  and  may  demonstrate  a  new  class  of  chemical  solvent  if  one  of  the 
emerging  low-regeneration-energy  processes  has  reached  a  sufficient  stage  of  devel-
opment.  UltraGen  III  is  expected  to  capture  up  to  90  percent  of  the  CO2,  3.5  times 
more  than  for  UltraGen  I.  All  three  plants  will  demonstrate  ultra-low  emissions, 
and  dry  and  compress  the  captured  CO2 to  demonstrate  long-term  geologic  storage 
and/or use in enhanced oil or gas recovery operations. Figure 8 depicts the proposed 
key features of UltraGen I, II, and III. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
8
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

59 

To  provide  a  platform  for  testing  and  developing  emerging  PC  and  CCS  tech-
nologies,  the  UltraGen  program  will  allow  for  technology  trials  at  existing  sites  as 
well  as  at  the  sites  of  new  projects.  Unlike  FutureGen,  EPRI  expects  the  UltraGen 
projects  will  be  commercially  dispatched  by  electricity  grid  operators.  If  the 
FutureGen concept could accommodate post combustion capture the differential cost 
of  UltraGen  CCS  could  be  part  of  the  full  portfolio  of  projects.  The  differential  cost 
to  the  host  company  for  demonstrating  these  improved  features  are  envisioned  to 
be  offset  by  any  available  tax  credits  (or  other  incentives)  and  by  funds  raised 
through an industry-led consortium formed by EPRI. 

The UltraGen projects represent the type of ‘‘giant step’’ collaborative efforts that 
need to be taken to advance integrated PC/CCS technology to the next phase of evo-
lution  and  assure  competitiveness  in  a  carbon-constrained  world.  Because  of  the 
time  and  expense  for  each  ‘‘design  and  build’’  iteration  for  coal  power  plants  (3  to 
5  years  not  counting  the  permitting  process  and  ∼$2  billion),  there  is  no  room  for 
hesitation  in  terms  of  commitment  to  advanced  technology  validation  and  dem-
onstration  projects.  EPRI  is  currently  discussing  the  UltraGen  project  concept  with 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

0
1
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

s
p
e
.
9
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

60 

several  firms  in  the  U.S.  and  internationally,  and  plans  to  develop  a  consortium  to 
support demonstration of the technology. 

The  UltraGen  projects  will  resolve  technical  and  economic  barriers  to  the  deploy-
ment of USC PC and CCS technology by providing a shared-risk vehicle for testing 
and  validating  high-temperature  materials,  components,  and  designs  in  plants  also 
providing superior environmental performance. 

Figure  9  summarizes  EPRI’s  recommended  major  RD&D  activities  for  improving 
the  efficiency  and  cost  of  USC  PC  technologies  with  CO2 capture.  Please  note  that 
UltraGen  III  is  not  included  in  Figure  9  but  the  schedule  for  ‘‘Design,  construction 
& operation of NZE USC PC at up to 1,400 °F w/capture’’ is expected to commence 
around 2020. 

Efficiency  Improvement  and  CCS  Retrofits  for  the  Existing  PC  Fleet.  It  would  be 
economically  advantageous  to  operate  the  many  reliable  subcritical  PC  units  in  the 
U.S.  fleet  well  into  the  future.  Premature  replacement  of  these  units  or  mandatory 
retrofit  of  these  units  for  CO2 capture  en  masse  would  be  economically  prohibitive. 
Their  flexibility  for  load  following  and  provision  of  support  services  to  ensure  grid 
stability  makes  them  highly  valuable.  With  equipment  upgrades,  many  of  these 
units can realize modest efficiency gains, which, when accumulated across the exist-
ing  generating  fleet  could  make  a  sizable  reduction  in  CO2 emissions.  For  some  ex-
isting  plants,  retrofit  of  CCS  will  make  sense,  but  specific  plant  design  features, 
space  limitations,  and  economic  and  regulatory  considerations  must  be  carefully 
analyzed to determine whether retrofit-for-capture is feasible. 

These upgrades depend on the equipment configuration and operating parameters 

of a particular plant and may include: 

perature 

steam turbine exhaust backpressure, and auxiliary power consumption 

• turbine blading and steam path upgrades 
• turbine control valve upgrades for more efficient regulation of steam 
• cooling tower and condenser upgrades to reduce circulating water temperature, 
• cooling tower heat transfer media upgrades 
• condenser optimization to maximize heat transfer and minimize condenser tem-
• condenser air leakage prevention/detection 
• variable  speed  drive  technology  for  pump  and  fan  motors  to  reduce  power  con-
• air heater upgrades to increase heat recovery and reduce leakage 
• advanced  control  systems  incorporating  neural  nets  to  optimize  temperature, 
pressure, and flow rates of fuel, air, flue gas, steam, and water 
• optimization of water blowdown and blowdown energy recovery 
• optimization of attemperator design, control, and operating scenarios 
• sootblower optimization via ‘‘intelligent’’ sootblower system use 
• coal drying (for plants using lignite and subbituminous coals) 
Coal  Drying  for  Increased  Generating  Efficiency.  Boilers  designed  for  high-mois-
ture  lignite  have  traditionally  employed  higher  feed  rates  (lb/hr)  to  account  for  the 

sumption 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

1
1
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

61 

large  latent  heat  load  to  evaporate  fuel  moisture.  An  innovative  concept  developed 
by Great River Energy (GRE) and Lehigh University uses low-grade heat recovered 
from within the plant to dry incoming fuel to the boiler, thereby boosting plant effi-
ciency  and  output.  [In  contrast,  traditional  thermal  drying  processes  are  complex 
and  require  high-grade  heat  to  remove  moisture  from  the  coal.]  Specifically,  the 
GRE approach uses steam condenser and boiler exhaust heat exchangers to heat air 
and water fed to a fluidized-bed coal dryer upstream of the plant pulverizers. Based 
on successful tests with a pilot-scale dryer and more than a year of continuous oper-
ation with a prototype dryer at its Coal Creek station, GRE (with U.S. Department 
of  Energy  support  and  EPRI  technical  consultation)  is  now  building  a  full  suite  of 
dryers  for  Unit  2  (i.e.,  a  commercial-scale  demonstration).  In  addition  to  the  effi-
ciency  and  CO2 emission  reduction  benefits  from  reducing  the  lignite  feed  moisture 
content  by  about  25  percent,  the  plant’s  air  emissions  will  be  reduced  as  well.3 Ap-
plication  of  this  technology  is  not  limited  to  PC  units  firing  lignite.  EPRI  believes 
it  may  find  application  in  PC  units  firing  subbituminous  coal  and  in  IGCC  units 
with dry-fed gasifiers using low-rank coals. 
Improving CO2 Capture Technologies 

CCS  entails  pre-combustion  or  post-combustion  CO2 capture  technologies,  CO2 
drying  and  compression  (and  sometimes  further  removal  of  impurities),  and  the 
transportation  of  separated  CO2 to  locations  where  it  can  be  stored  away  from  the 
atmosphere for centuries or longer. 

Albeit  at  considerable  cost,  CO2 capture  technologies  can  be  integrated  into  all 
coal-based  power  plant  technologies.  For  both  new  plants  and  retrofits,  there  is  a 
tremendous  need  (and  opportunity)  to  reduce  the  energy  required  to  remove  CO2 
from fuel gas or flue gas. Figure 10 shows a selection of the key technology develop-
ments and test programs needed to achieve commercial CO2 capture technologies for 
advanced  coal  combustion-  and  gasification-based  power  plants  at  a  progressively 
shrinking  constant-dollar  levelized  cost-of-electricity  premium.  Specifically,  the  tar-
get  is  a  premium  of  about  $6/MWh  in  2025  (relative  to  plants  at  that  time  without 
capture)  compared  with  an  estimated  2010  cost  premium  of  perhaps  $40/MWh  (not 
counting the cost of transportation and storage). Such a goal poses substantial engi-
neering  challenges  and  will  require  major  investments  in  RD&D  to  roughly  halve 
the  currently  large  energy  requirements  (operating  costs)  associated  with  CO2 sol-
vent regeneration. Achieving this goal will allow power producers to meet the public 
demand for stable electricity prices while reducing CO2 emissions to address climate 
change concerns. 

Pre-Combustion CO2 Capture (IGCC) 

IGCC technology allows for CO2 capture to take place via an added fuel gas proc-
essing  step  at  elevated  pressure,  rather  than  at  the  atmospheric  pressure  of  post- 
combustion flue gas, permitting capital savings through smaller equipment sizes as 
well as lower operating costs. 

Currently  available  technologies  for  such  pre-combustion  CO2 removal  use  a 
chemical and/or physical solvent that selectively absorbs CO2 and other ‘‘acid gases,’’ 
such as hydrogen sulfide. Application of this technology requires that the CO in syn-
thesis  gas  (the  principal  component)  first  be  ‘‘shifted’’  to  CO2 and  hydrogen  via  a 
catalytic reaction with water. The CO2 in the shifted synthesis gas is then removed 

3 C.  Bullinger,  M.  Ness,  and  N.  Sarunac,  ‘‘One  Year  of  Operating  Experience  with  Prototype 
Fluidized Bed Coal Dryer at Coal Creek Generating Station,’’ 32nd International Technical Con-
ference on Coal Utilization and Fuel Systems, Clearwater, FL, June 10–15, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

2
1
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

62 

via  contact  with  the  solvent  in  an  absorber  column,  leaving  a  hydrogen-rich  syn-
thesis  gas  for  combustion  in  the  gas  turbine.  The  CO2 is  released  from  the  solvent 
in  a  regeneration  process  that  typically  reduces  pressure  and/or  increases  tempera-
ture. 

Chemical  plants  currently  employ  such  a  process  commercially  using  methyl 
diethanolamine (MDEA) as a chemical solvent or the Selexol and Rectisol processes, 
which  rely  on  physical  solvents.  Physical  solvents  are  generally  preferred  when  ex-
tremely  high  (>99.8  percent)  sulfur  species  removal  is  required.  Although  the  re-
quired scale-up for IGCC power plant applications is less than that needed for scale- 
up of post-combustion CO2 capture processes for PC plants, considerable engineering 
challenges  remain  and  work  on  optimal  integration  with  IGCC  cycle  processes  has 
just begun. 

The impact of current pre-combustion CO2 removal processes on IGCC plant ther-
mal efficiency and capital cost is significant. In particular, the water-gas shift reac-
tion  reduces  the  heating  value  of  synthesis  gas  fed  to  the  gas  turbine.  Because  the 
gasifier  outlet  ratios  of  CO  to  methane  to  H2 are  different  for  each  gasifier  tech-
nology, the relative impact of the water-gas shift reactor process also varies. In gen-
eral,  however,  it  can  be  on  the  order  of  a  10  percent  fuel  energy  reduction.  Heat 
regeneration  of  solvents  further  reduces  the  steam  available  for  power  generation. 
Other  solvents,  which  are  depressurized  to  release  captured  CO2,  must  be  re-pres-
surized for reuse. Cooling water consumption is increased for solvents needing cool-
ing after regeneration and for pre-cooling and interstage cooling during compression 
of  separated  CO2 to  a  supercritical  state  for  transportation  and  storage.  Heat  inte-
gration  with  other  IGCC  cycle  processes  to  minimize  these  energy  impacts  is  com-
plex and is currently the subject of considerable RD&D by EPRI and others. 

Membrane CO2 Separation. Technology for separating CO2 from shifted synthesis 
gas  (or  flue  gas  from  PC  plants)  offers  the  promise  of  lower  auxiliary  power  con-
sumption but is currently only at the laboratory stage of development. Several orga-
nizations  are  pursuing  different  approaches  to  membrane-based  applications.  In 
general,  however,  CO2 recovery  on  the  low-pressure  side  of  a  selective  membrane 
can take place at a higher pressure than is now possible with solvent processes, re-
ducing  the  subsequent  power  demand  for  compressing  CO2 to  a  supercritical  state. 
Membrane-based processes can also eliminate steam and power consumption for re-
generating  and  pumping  solvent,  respectively,  but  they  require  power  to  create  the 
pressure  difference  between  the  source  gas  and  CO2-rich  sides.  If  membrane  tech-
nology  can  be  developed  at  scale  to  meet  performance  goals,  it  could  enable  up  to 
a  50  percent  reduction  in  capital  cost  and  auxiliary  power  requirements  relative  to 
current CO2 capture and compression technology. 
Post-Combustion CO2 Capture (PC and Circulating Fluidized-Bed (CFB) Plants) 

The  post-combustion  CO2 capture  processes  being  discussed  for  power  plant  boil-
ers  in  the  near-term  draw  upon  commercial  experience  with  amine  solvent  separa-
tion  at  much  smaller  scale  in  the  food,  beverage  and  chemical  industries,  including 
three U.S. applications of CO2 capture from coal-fired boilers. 

These  processes  contact  flue  gas  with  an  amine  solvent  in  an  absorber  column 
(much  like  a  wet  SO2 scrubber)  where  the  CO2 chemically  reacts  with  the  solvent. 
The CO2-rich liquid mixture then passes to a stripper column where it is heated to 
change the chemical equilibrium point, releasing the CO2. The ‘‘regenerated’’ solvent 
is  then  recirculated  back  to  the  absorber  column,  while  the  released  CO2 may  be 
further  processed  before  compression  to  a  supercritical  state  for  efficient  transpor-
tation to a storage location. 

After  drying,  the  CO2 released  from  the  regenerator  is  relatively  pure.  However, 
successful  CO2 removal  requires  very  low  levels  of  SO2 and  NO2 entering  the  CO2 
absorber,  as  these  species  also  react  with  the  solvent,  requiring  removal  of  the  de-
graded solvent and replacement with fresh feed. Thus, high-efficiency SO2 and NOX 
control systems are essential to minimizing solvent consumption costs for post-com-
bustion  CO2 capture;  currently  the  approach  to  achieving  such  ultra-low  SO2 con-
centrations  is  to  add  a  polishing  scrubber,  a  costly  venture.  Extensive  RD&D  is  in 
progress  to  improve  the  solvent  and  system  designs  for  power  boiler  applications 
and to develop better solvents with greater absorption capacity, less energy demand 
for regeneration, and greater ability to accommodate flue gas contaminants. 

At present, monoethanolamine (MEA) is the ‘‘default’’ solvent for post-combustion 
CO2 capture studies and small-scale field applications. Processes based on improved 
amines,  such  as  Fluor’s  Econamine  FG  Plus  and  Mitsubishi  Heavy  Industries’  KS– 
1,  await  demonstration  at  power  boiler  scale  and  on  coal-derived  flue  gas.  The  po-
tential  for  improving  amine-based  processes  appears  significant.  For  example,  a  re-
cent study based on KS–1 suggests that its impact on net power output for a super-
critical  PC  unit  would  be  19  percent  and  its  impact  on  the  levelized  cost-of-elec-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

tricity would be 44 percent, whereas earlier studies based on suboptimal MEA appli-
cations  yielded  output  penalties  approaching  30  percent  and  cost-of-electricity  pen-
alties of up to 65 percent. 

Accordingly, amine-based engineered solvents are the subject of numerous ongoing 
efforts to improve performance in power boiler post-combustion capture applications. 
Along with modifications to the chemical properties of the sorbents, these efforts are 
addressing the physical structure of the absorber and regenerator equipment, exam-
ining  membrane  contactors  and  other  modifications  to  improve  gas-liquid  contact 
and/or  heat  transfer,  and  optimizing  thermal  integration  with  steam  turbine  and 
balance-of-plant  systems.  Although  the  challenge  is  daunting,  the  payoff  is  poten-
tially  massive,  as  these  solutions  may  be  applicable  not  only  to  new  plants,  but  to 
retrofits where sufficient plot space is available at the back end of the plant. 

Finally,  as  discussed  earlier,  deploying  USC  PC  technology  to  increase  efficiency 
and  lower  uncontrolled  CO2 per  MWh  can  further  reduce  the  cost  impact  of  post- 
combustion CO2 capture. 

Ammonia-Based  Processes.  Post-combustion  CO2 capture  using  ammonia-based 
solvents  offers  the  promise  of  significantly  lower  solvent  regeneration  requirements 
relative to MEA. In the ‘‘chilled ammonia’’ process owned by ALSTOM and currently 
under  development  and  testing  by  ALSTOM  and  EPRI,  respectively,  CO2 is  ab-
sorbed  in  a  solution  of  ammonium  carbonate,  at  low  temperature  and  atmospheric 
pressure. 

Compared  with  amines,  ammonium  carbonate  has  over  twice  the  CO2 absorption 
capacity  and  requires  less  than  half  the  heat  to  regenerate.  Further,  regeneration 
can be performed under higher pressure than amines, so the released CO2 is already 
partially  pressurized.  Therefore,  less  energy  is  subsequently  required  for  compres-
sion  to  a  supercritical  state  for  transportation  to  an  injection  location.  Developers 
have estimated that the parasitic power loss from a full-scale supercritical PC plant 
using  chilled  ammonia  CO2 capture  could  be  as  low  as  15  percent,  with  an  associ-
ated cost-of-electricity penalty of just 25 percent. Part of the reduction in power loss 
comes from the use of low quality heat to regenerate ammonia and reduce the quan-
tity  of  steam  required  for  regeneration.  Following  successful  experiments  at  0.25 
MWe scale, ALSTOM and a consortium of EPRI members built a 1.7 MWe pilot unit 
to test the chilled ammonia process on a flue gas slipstream at We Energies’ Pleas-
ant Prairie Power Plant. Testing at this site began in late March 2008 and will con-
tinue for about 1 year. The American Electric Power Co. (AEP) has announced plans 
to test a scaled-up design (100,000 tons CO2/yr, equivalent to about 20 MWe), incor-
porating  the  lessons  learned  on  the  1.7  MWe unit,  at  its  Mountaineer  station  in 
West Virginia, with start-up scheduled for late 2009. AEP intends to capture, inject, 
and  monitor  for  two-to-five  years  and,  thereafter,  continue  monitoring  CO2 location 
in the underground reservoir for another several years. EPRI plans to develop a con-
sortium to support this Mountaineer CO2 Capture testing. 

Other  ‘‘multi-pollutant’’  control  system  developers  are  also  exploring  ammonia- 
based  processes  for  CO2 removal.  For  example,  Powerspan  and  NRG  Energy,  Inc. 
announced  plans  in  November  2007  to  demonstrate  a  125  MWe design  of 
Powerspan’s  ECO2 system  at  the  Parish  station  in  Texas  starting  up  in  2012,  and 
last month Basin Electric announced its selection of Powerspan to provide a similar 
size ECO2 system for its Antelope Valley station in North Dakota, also with a 2012 
start-up goal. 

Other  Processes.  EPRI  has  identified  over  40  potential  CO2 separation  processes 
that are being developed by various firms or institutes. They include absorption sys-
tems (typically solvent-based similar to the amine and ammonia processes discussed 
above), adsorbed (attachment of the CO2 to a solid that is then regenerated and re- 
used), membranes, and biological systems. Funding comes from a variety of sources, 
primarily  DOE  or  internal  funds,  but  the  funding  is  neither  sufficient  or  well- 
enough coordinated to advance the most promising technologies at the speed needed 
to  achieve  the  goals  of  high  CO2 capture  at  societally-acceptable  cost  and  energy 
drain.  EPRI  is  working  with  the  Southern  Co.  to  select  and  demonstrate  one  of 
these  processes  at  the  20+  MWe scale,  with  the  collected  CO2 injected  into  a  local 
underground  saline  reservoir.  The  capture  portion  of  this  project  will  be  funded 
mostly  by  Southern  Co.,  its  process  supplier,  and  a  collaborative  of  electricity  gen-
eration  companies  assembled  by  EPRI.  The  storage  portion  will  be  funded  largely 
by  DOE  under  Phase  3  of  its  Regional  Carbon  Sequestration  Partnership,  with  co-
funding from the private sector. Start-up of the capture unit and compression/trans-
port/injection system is projected for late 2010. Southern Co. and its teammates in-
tend to capture, inject, and monitor for about 4 years and, thereafter, continue mon-
itoring CO2 location in the underground reservoir for another several years. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Oxy-Fuel Combustion Boilers 

64 

Fuel  combustion  in  a  blend  of  oxygen  and  recycled  flue  gas  rather  than  in  air 
(known  as  oxy-fuel  combustion,  oxy-coal  combustion,  or  oxy-combustion)  is  gaining 
interest  as  a  viable  CO2 capture  alternative  for  PC  and  CFB  plants.  The  process 
is applicable to virtually all fossil-fueled boiler types and is a candidate for retrofits 
as well as new power plants. 

Firing coal with high-purity oxygen alone would result in too high of a flame tem-
perature, which would increase slagging, fouling, and corrosion problems, so the ox-
ygen  is  diluted  by  mixing  it  with  a  slipstream  of  recycled  flue  gas.  As  a  result,  the 
flue gas downstream of the recycle slipstream take-off consists primarily of CO2 and 
water  vapor  (although  it  also  contains  small  amounts  of  nitrogen,  oxygen,  and  cri-
teria  pollutants).  After  the  water  is  condensed,  the  CO2-rich  gas  is  compressed  and 
purified  to  remove  contaminants  and  prepare  the  CO2 for  transportation  and  stor-
age. 
Oxy-combustion boilers have been studied in laboratory-scale and small pilot units 
of  up  to  3  MWt.  Two  larger  pilot  units,  at  ∼10  MWe,  are  now  under  construction 
by  Babcock  &  Wilcox  (B&W)  and  Vattenfall.  An  Australian-Japanese  project  team 
is pursuing a 30 MWe repowering project in Australia. These larger tests will allow 
verification of mathematical models and provide engineering data useful for design-
ing pre-commercial systems. 
CO2 Transport and Geologic Storage 

Application of CO2 capture technologies implies that there will be secure and eco-
nomical  forms  of  long-term  storage  that  can  assure  CO2 will  be  kept  out  of  the  at-
mosphere.  Natural  underground  CO2 reservoirs  in  Colorado,  Utah,  and  other  west-
ern states testify to the effectiveness of long-term geologic CO2 storage. CO2 is also 
found in natural gas reservoirs, where it has resided for millions of years. Thus, evi-
dence suggests that similarly sealed geologic formations will be ideal for storing CO2 
for millennia or longer. 

The most developed approach for large-scale CO2 storage is injection into depleted 
or  partially  depleted  oil  and  gas  reservoirs  and  similar  geologically  sealed  ‘‘saline 
formations’’ (porous rocks filled with brine that is impractical for desalination). Par-
tially  depleted  oil  reservoirs  provide  the  potential  added  benefit  of  enhanced  oil  re-
covery (EOR). [EOR is used in mature fields to recover additional oil after standard 
extraction  methods  have  been  used.  When  CO2 is  injected  for  EOR,  it  causes  resid-
ual  oil  to  swell  and  become  less  viscous,  allowing  some  to  flow  to  production  wells, 
thus  extending  the  field’s  productive  life.]  By  providing  a  commercial  market  for 
CO2 captured from industrial sources, EOR may help the economics of CCS projects 
where  it  is  applicable,  and  in  some  cases  might  reduce  regulatory  and  liability  un-
certainties.  Although  less  developed  than  EOR,  researchers  are  exploring  the  effec-
tiveness  of  CO2 injection  for  enhancing  production  from  depleted  natural  gas  fields 
(particularly  in  compartmentalized  formations  where  pressure  has  dropped)  and 
from  deep  methane-bearing  coal  seams.  DOE  and  the  International  Energy  Agency 
are  among  the  sponsors  of  such  efforts.  However,  at  the  scale  that  CCS  needs  to 
be  deployed  to  help  achieve  atmospheric  CO2 stabilization  at  an  acceptable  level, 
EPRI believes that the primary economic driver for CCS will be the value of carbon 
that results from a future climate policy. 

Geologic sequestration as a CCS strategy is currently being demonstrated in sev-
eral  RD&D  projects  around  the  world.  The  three  largest  projects  (which  are  non- 
power)—Statoil’s  Sleipner  Saline  Aquifer  CO2 Storage  project  in  the  North  Sea  off 
of Norway; the Weyburn Project in Saskatchewan, Canada; and the In Salah Project 
in  Algeria—each  sequester  about  1  million  metric  tons  of  CO2 per  year,  which 
matches the output of one baseloaded 150–200 MW coal-fired power plant. With 17 
collective  operating  years  of  experience,  these  projects  have  thus  far  demonstrated 
that CO2 storage in deep geologic formations can be carried out safely and reliably. 
Statoil estimates that Norwegian greenhouse gas emissions would have risen incre-
mentally  by  3  percent  if  the  CO2 from  the  Sleipner  project  had  been  vented  rather 
than sequestered.4 

Table  2  lists  a  selection  of  current  and  planned  CO2 storage  projects  as  of  early 
2007.  Update  to  Table  2:  The  DF–1  Miller  project  has  been  put  on  hold  and  may 
be  cancelled,  so  no  CO2 capture  is  expected  by  2010.  The  DF-Carson  project  may 
not  startup  by  2011  as  planned.  DOE  has  indicated  that  it  plans  to  revise  the 
FutureGen  project  so  CO2 storage  will  not  take  place  until  after  2012.  In  October 
2007,  the  DOE  awarded  the  first  three  large  scale  carbon  sequestration  projects  in 
the United States. The Plains Carbon Dioxide Reduction Partnership, Southeast Re-

4 http://www.co2captureandstorage.info/projectlspecific.php?projectlid=26. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

gional  Carbon  Sequestration  Partnership,  and  Southwest  Regional  Partnership  for 
Carbon Sequestration, will conduct large volume tests for the storage of one million 
or more tons of CO2 in deep saline reservoirs in the U.S. 

Table 2.—Select Existing and Planned CO2 Storage Projects as of Early 2007 

Project 

CO2 Source 

Country 

Start 

Sleipner 
Weyburn 
In Salah 
Snohvit 
Gorgon 
DF–1 Miller 
DF–2 Carson 
Draugen 
FutureGen 
Monash 
SaskPower 
Ketzin/CO2 
STORE 
Otway 

Totals 

Coal 

Gas. Proc. 

Norway 
Canada 
Algeria 
Gas. Proc. 
Gas. Proc. 
Norway 
Gas. Proc.  Australia 

Gas 

Pet Coke 

Gas 
Coal 
Coal 
Coal 

U.K. 
U.S. 

Norway 

U.S. 

Australia 
Canada 

N/A 

Natural 

Germany 
Australia 

1996 
2000 
2004 
2007 
2010 
2009 
2011 
2012 
2012 
N/A 
N/A 

2007 
2007 

Anticipated amount injected by: 

2006 

9 MT 
5 MT 
2 MT 

0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 
0 

0 
0 

2010 

2015 

13 MT 
12 MT 
7 MT 
2 MT 

0 

1 MT 

0 
0 
0 
0 
0 

18 MT 
17 MT 
12 MT 
5 MT 
12 MT 
8 MT 
16 MT 
7 MT 
2 MT 
N/A 
N/A 

50 KT 
100 KT 

50 KT 
100 KT 

16 MT 

35 MT 

99 MT 

Source:  Sally  M.  Benson  (Stanford  University  GCEP),  ‘‘Can  CO2 Capture  and  Storage  in  Deep  Geological 
Formations  Make  Coal-Fired  Electricity  Generation  Climate  Friendly?’’  Presentation  at  Emerging  Energy  Tech-
nologies  Summit,  UC  Santa  Barbara,  California,  February  9,  2007.  [Note:  Statoil  has  subsequently  suspended 
plans  for  the  Draugen  project  and  announced  a  study  of  CO2 capture  at  a  gas-fired  power  plant  at 
Tjeldbergodden. BP and Rio Tinto have announced the coal-based ‘‘DF–3’’ project in Australia.] 

Enhanced  Oil  Recovery.  Experience  relevant  to  CCS  comes  from  the  oil  industry, 
where CO2 injection technology and modeling of its subsurface behavior have a prov-
en  record  of  accomplishment.  EOR  has  been  conducted  successfully  for  35  years  in 
the  Permian  Basin  fields  of  west  Texas  and  Oklahoma.  Regulatory  oversight  and 
community acceptance of injection operations for EOR seem well established. 

Although the purpose of EOR heretofore has not been to sequester CO2, the prac-
tice  can  be  adapted  to  include  large-volume  residual  CO2 storage.  This  approach  is 
being  demonstrated  in  the  Weyburn-Midale  CO2 monitoring  projects  in  Saskatch-
ewan,  Canada.  The  Weyburn  project  uses  captured  and  dried  CO2 from  the  Dakota 
Gasification Company’s Great Plains synfuels plant near Beulah, North Dakota. The 
CO2 is  transported  via  a  200-mile  pipeline  constructed  of  standard  carbon  steel. 
Over  the  life  of  the  project,  the  net  CO2 storage  is  estimated  at  20  million  metric 
tons, while an additional 130 million barrels of oil will be produced. 

Although EOR might help the economics of early CCS projects in oil-patch areas, 
EOR  sites  are  ultimately  too  few  and  too  geographically  isolated  to  accommodate 
much  of  the  CO2 from  widespread  industrial  CO2 capture  operations.  In  contrast, 
saline formations are available in many—but not all—U.S. locations. 
CCS in the United States 

A  DOE-sponsored  R&D  program,  the  ‘‘Regional  Carbon  Sequestration  Partner-
ships,’’  is  engaged  in  mapping  U.S.  geologic  formations  suitable  for  CO2 storage. 
Evaluations by these Regional Partnerships and others suggest that enough geologic 
storage  capacity  exists  in  the  U.S.  to  hold  many  centuries’  production  of  CO2 from 
coal-based power plants and other large point sources. 

The Regional Partnerships are also conducting pilot-scale CO2 injection validation 
tests across the country in differing geologic formations, including saline formations, 
deep  unmineable  coal  seams,  and  older  oil  and  gas  reservoirs.  Figure  11  illustrates 
some of these options. These tests, as well as most commercial applications for long- 
term  storage,  will  use  CO2 compressed  for  volumetric  efficiency  to  a  liquid-like 
‘‘supercritical’’ state; thus, virtually all CO2 storage will take place in formations at 
least a half-mile deep, where the risk of leakage to shallower groundwater aquifers 
or to the surface is usually very low. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

After  successful  completion  of  pilot-scale  CO2 storage  validation  tests,  the  Part-
nerships will undertake large-volume storage tests, injecting quantities of ∼1 million 
metric  tons  of  CO2 or  more  over  a  several  year  period,  along  with  post-injection 
monitoring  to  track  the  absorption  of  the  CO2 in  the  target  formation(s)  and  to 
check for potential leakage. 

The  EPRI–CURC  Roadmap  identifies  the  need  for  several  large-scale  integrated 
demonstrations of CO2 capture and storage. This assessment was echoed by MIT in 
its  recent  Future  of  Coal  report,  which  calls  for  three  to  five  U.S.  demonstrations 
of about 1 million metric tons of CO2 per year and about 10 worldwide.5 These dem-
onstrations  could  be  the  critical  path  item  in  commercialization  of  CCS  technology. 
In addition, EPRI has identified 10 key topics 6 where further technical and/or policy 
development is needed before CCS can become fully commercial: 

• Caprock integrity 
• Injectivity and storage capacity 
• CO2 trapping mechanisms 
• CO2 leakage and permanence 
• CO2 and mineral interactions 
• Reliable, low-cost monitoring systems 
• Quick response and mitigation and remediation procedures 
• Protection of potable water 
• Mineral rights 
• Long-term liability 
Figure  12  shows  that  EPRI’s  recommended  large-scale  integrated  CO2 capture 
and storage demonstrations is temporally consistent with the Regional Partnerships’ 
‘‘Phase III’’ large-volume CO2 storage test program. EPRI believes that many of the 
storage demonstrations should use CO2 that comes from coal-fired boilers to address 
any uncertainties that may exist about the impact of coal-derived CO2 on its behav-
ior in underground formations. 

5 http://web.mit.edu/coal/The Future of Coal.pdf. 
6 EPRI, Overview of Geological Storage of CO2, Report ID 1012798. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

3
1
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

67 

CO2 Transportation 

Mapping  of  the  distribution  of  potentially  suitable  CO2 storage  formations  across 
the country, as part of the research by the Regional Partnerships, shows that some 
areas have ample storage capacity while others appear to have little or none. Thus, 
implementing  CO2 capture  at  some  power  plants  may  require  pipeline  transpor-
tation  for  several  hundred  miles  to  suitable  injection  locations,  possibly  in  other 
states.  Although  this  adds  cost,  it  should  not  represent  a  technical  hurdle  because 
long-distance, interstate CO2 pipelines have been used commercially in oilfield EOR 
applications.  Economic  considerations  dictate  that  the  purity  requirements  of  coal- 
derived CO2 be established so that the least-cost pipeline and compressor materials 
can  be  used  at  each  application.  From  an  infrastructure  perspective,  EPRI  expects 
that early commercial CCS projects will take place at coal-based power plants near 
sequestration sites or an existing CO2 pipeline. As the number of projects increases, 
regional  CO2 pipeline  networks  connecting  multiple  industrial  sources  and  storage 
sites will be needed. 
Policy-Related Long-Term CO2 Storage Issues 

Beyond developing the technological aspects of CCS, public policy needs to address 
issues such as CO2 storage site permitting, long-term monitoring requirements, and 
post-closure  liability.  CCS  represents  an  emerging  industry,  and  the  jurisdictional 
roles among Federal and state agencies for regulations and their relationship to pri-
vate  carbon  credit  markets  operating  under  Federal  oversight  has  yet  to  be  deter-
mined. 

Currently,  efforts  are  under  way  in  some  states  to  establish  regulatory  frame-
works  for  long-term  geologic  CO2 storage.  Additionally,  stakeholder  organizations 
such  as  the  Interstate  Oil  and  Gas  Compact  Commission  (IOGCC)  are  developing 
their  own  suggested  regulatory  recommendations  for  states  drafting  legislation  and 
regulatory procedures for CO2 injection and storage operations.7 Other stakeholders, 
such  as  environmental  groups,  are  also  offering  policy  recommendations.  EPRI  ex-
pects this field to become very active soon. 

A  state-by-state  approach  to  sequestration  may  not  be  adequate  because  some 
geologic formations, which are ideal for storing CO2, underlie multiple states. At the 
Federal  level,  the  U.S.  EPA  published  a  first-of-its-kind  guidance  (UICPG  #83)  on 
March  1,  2007,  for  permitting  underground  injection  of  CO2.8 This  guidance  offers 
flexibility for pilot projects evaluating the practice of CCS, while leaving unresolved 
the requirements that could apply to future large-scale CCS projects. 
Long-Term CO2 Storage Liability Issues 

Long-term  liability  for  injected  CO2 will  need  to  be  assigned  before  CCS  can  be-
come fully commercial. Because CCS activities will be undertaken to serve the pub-
lic  good,  as  determined  by  government  policy,  and  will  be  implemented  in  response 
to  anticipated  or  actual  government-imposed  limits  on  CO2 emissions,  a  number  of 
policy  analysts  have  suggested  that  the  entities  performing  these  activities  should 
be granted a measure of long-term risk reduction assuming adherence to proper pro-
cedures during the storage site injection operations and closure phases. 
RD&D Investment for Advanced Coal and CCS Technologies 

Developing  the  suite  of  technologies  needed  to  achieve  competitive  advanced  coal 
and  CCS  technologies  will  require  a  sustained  major  investment  in  RD&D.  As 
shown  in  Table  3,  EPRI  estimates  that  an  expenditure  of  approximately  $8  billion 
will  be  required  in  the  10-year  period  from  2008–2017.  The  MIT  Future  of  Coal  re-
port  estimates  the  funding  need  at  up  to  $800–$850  million  per  year,  which  ap-

7 http://www.iogcc.state.ok.us/PDFS/CarbonCaptureandStorageReportandSummary.pdf. 
8 http://www.epa.gov/safewater/uic/pdfs/guideluiclcarbonsequestrationlfinal-03-07.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

4
1
k
a
v
o
n
9
0
4

68 

proaches  the  EPRI  value.  Further,  EPRI  expects  that  an  RD&D  investment  of 
roughly $17 billion will be required over the next 25 years. 

Investment  in  earlier  years  may  be  weighted  toward  IGCC,  as  this  technology  is 
less  developed  and  will  require  more  RD&D  investment  to  reach  the  desired  level 
of  commercial  viability.  As  interim  progress  and  future  needs  cannot  be  adequately 
forecast at this time, the years after 2023 do not distinguish between IGCC and PC. 

Table 3.—RD&D Funding Needs for Advanced Coal Power Generation Technologies with CO2 

Capture 

Total Estimated RD&D 
Funding Needs 
(Public + Private Sectors) 

Advanced Combustion, CO2 
Capture 

Integrated Gasification 
Combined Cycle (IGCC), 
CO4 Capture 

CO2 Storage 

2008–12 

2013–17 

2018–22 

2023–27 

2028–32 

$830M/yr 

$800M/yr 

$800M/yr 

$620M/yr 

$400M/yr 

25% 

50% 

25% 

25% 

50% 

25% 

40% 

40% 

20% 

80% 

80% 

20% 

20% 

By  any  measure,  these  estimated  RD&D  investments  are  substantial.  EPRI  and 
the  members  of  the  CoalFleet  for  Tomorrow program,  by  promoting  collaborative 
ventures  among  industry  stakeholders  and  governments,  believe  that  the  costs  of 
developing  critical-path  technologies  for  advanced  coal  and  CCS  can  be  shouldered 
by  multiple  participants.  EPRI  believes  that  government  policy  and  incentives  will 
also  play  a  key  role  in  fostering  CCS  technologies  through  early  RD&D  stages  to 
achieve widespread, economically feasible deployment capable of achieving major re-
ductions in U.S. CO2 emissions. 

Senator KERRY. Thanks, Mr. Novak. 
I  want  to  welcome  Senator  Stevens  here.  As  I  mentioned,  Sen-
ator Stevens and I have joined together to introduce a commercial- 
scale,  both  capture  and  sequestration  effort  here,  which,  I  person-
ally  think  in  light  of  the  testimony  we’ve  heard  would  be  very  im-
portant to have funded as rapidly as possible. 

Let  me  just  ask  this  threshold  question.  Is  there  anybody  at  the 
table  who  has  testified  who  does  not  accept  the  IPCC  reports  and 
the  fundamental  science  of  anthropogenic  contribution  to  climate 
change? 

So,  every  one  of  you  accept  that  science.  Is  there  anybody  who 
differs with the urgency expressed in the most recent reports about 
the  levels  of  greenhouse  gases  that  we  can  emit  before  we  reach  a 
tipping point, i.e., two degrees, 450 parts per million? OK. 

Yes, Doctor? 
Dr. MARBURGER. Yes, I wouldn’t accept that at face value, I think 

the concept of a tipping point is controversial. 

Senator  KERRY.  Do  you  believe  there  is  a  greenhouse  gas  stand-
ard  which  you  believe  raises  alarm  bells?  Do  you  think  we  can  go 
the  609  parts  per  million  that  we  are  heading  to  at  the  current 
rate? 

Dr.  MARBURGER.  In  my  mind,  the  current  emission  rates  raise 

alarm bells. 

Senator  KERRY.  The  current  rates  do?  So,  in  other  words,  you’re 
arguing from the point of view that it is possible that that may be 
generous? That the 450 may be generous, that it may be less than 
that before you reach tipping point? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

Dr.  MARBURGER.  It’s  not  clear  to  me  whether  there  is  a  tipping 
point.  It  is  clear  that  there  is  a  anthropogenic  impact  on  the  cli-
mate,  that  if  let  go  without  action,  will  cause  unacceptable  im-
pacts—— 

Senator KERRY. Fair enough, let’s work with that, at least. 
If  you  accept,  as  everybody  has  indicated,  the  fundamentals, 
here, then what Mr. Hawkins has suggested, which I have, actually 
put  into  legislation.  We  should  not  build  one  pulverized  coal-fired 
power  plant  that  does  not  now  move  toward  some  variant  of  what 
has  been  talked  about  here,  the  IGCC,  gasification,  etc.,  because 
otherwise, we are digging the hole deeper, are we not? 

Dr. Marburger? 
Dr.  MARBURGER.  It  would  be  highly  desirable  to  make  sure  that 
new  coal-fired  power  plants  have  the  capacity  for  retrofitting  with 
carbon capture and storage as that technology becomes widespread. 
Senator  KERRY.  Are  we,  in  fact,  building  power  plants  that  are 

retrofittable in all circumstances today? 

Anybody? Mr. Hawkins? 
It’s  my  understanding  that  we’re  building  some  pulverized  coal- 
powered  power  plants  that  are  just  the  old  technology.  They  are 
not necessarily set up for retrofit? 

Mr.  HAWKINS.  Yes,  I  participated  as  an  advisor  to  the  MIT  Coal 
Study  that  was  released  last  year,  and  one  of  the  things  that  they 
pointed out correctly, is that while a gasification plant that is built 
without capture is cheaper to retrofit than a pulverized coal plant, 
retrofitting  either  of  them  is  a  pretty  expensive  proposition.  It  is 
much  better  to  build  the  plant  with  that  capture  equipment  from 
the  start  and  there  is  no  reason  to  avoid  doing  that.  We  have  the 
technology  to  do  it.  The  challenges  are  a  matter  of  economics  and 
we  have  policies  that  can  overcome  the  economic  hurdles.  We 
should get on with it. 

Senator KERRY. Mr. Novak, you’re nodding your head. 
Mr.  NOVAK.  It  looks,  in  our  opinion,  you  can  retrofit  some  of 

these plants, it depends on—— 

Senator  KERRY.  When  you  say  our  opinion,  just  for  the  record, 

say it again. 

Mr.  NOVAK.  The  Electric  Power  Research  Institute.  You  can  ret-
rofit  plants  that  are  being  built  today,  it’s  a  question  of  space,  the 
ability  to  fit  those  plants,  and  can  you  get  that  CO2 that  you  cap-
ture  to  a  storage  site?  That’s  another  question  you’d  have  to—to 
pipe it. There’s no question, it will cost money to do that, and espe-
cially a pulverized coal plant, you’re talking about a 30 percent re-
duction, a 30 percent energy penalty, that much less electricity. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  I  agree  that  this  question  of  cost  on  the 
piping is a big question, and in some parts of the country it’s going 
to  be  far  more  economical  and  feasible  than  in  other  parts  of  the 
country. 

Is  there  a  distinction  here  as  to  whether  or  not  you  ought  to 
allow a power plant, if they can’t pipe economically, or do you make 
some provision for that piping? What’s the approach here? 

Mr.  NOVAK.  I  think  that—looking  at  what  the  European  Union 
is  doing,  they’re—they  have  a  directive  that  is  asking  all  new  coal 
plants to be—to be ‘‘capture ready,’’ to have the space, to have the 
ability  to  fit,  and  to  do  an  assessment  of  the  ability  to  transport 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

and  store  that  CO2 to  some  location.  So  that’s—that’s  one  option 
that one could consider for new plants. 

Senator  KERRY.  Now  Dr.  Strakey,  I’d  like  to  try  to  pin  down 
where we are in terms of the FutureGen project. Obviously the ini-
tial  flurry  was  that  this  was  being  abandoned.  I  mean,  that  was 
the  announcement,  we’re  abandoning  the  FutureGen  project  as  we 
know  it.  And  now  we  talk  about  it  as  a  restructuring.  I’m  a  little 
confused,  and  obviously  Mr.  Mudd  is  concerned  at  the  moment 
about a 5-year delay and other potential here. 

So, can you clarify for the Committee, where do we stand, specifi-
cally with respect to the Department’s efforts in the FutureGen sec-
tor and what is the status of FutureGen today? 

Dr.  STRAKEY.  OK,  as  you  know,  the  Department  was  very  con-
cerned about the cost growth in FutureGen project, and we thought 
that going forward with the FutureGen project as it was originally 
proposed, presented unacceptable financial risk in terms of cost es-
calation. 

And as a result, we started—going back to late last fall—looking 
at  other  alternatives  to  try  to  accomplish  the  same  thing  in  a  rea-
sonable time-frame. 

And  the  situation,  since  FutureGen  started  has  changed.  Right 
now,  we  have  a  number  of  plants  that  are  anticipated  being  built, 
but  they’re  faced  with  a  dilemma.  Can  they  build  it  with  carbon 
capture?  They  don’t  know.  And  I  think  they  would  be  willing  to 
build  coal  plants  equipped  with  carbon  capture  if  the  government 
helps finance that part of the project. 

In  addition,  one  of  the  reasons  that  they  can’t  build  them  is  be-
cause  they’re  facing  permit  obstacles,  and  we’ve  seen  that  in  a 
number of states projects have been cancelled or moved, as a result 
of  these  permit  issues.  If  they  have  carbon  capture  equipment 
available  there,  they  might  be  able  to  get  past  their  permit  issues 
and get these plants built. 

Senator  KERRY.  It  seems  like  there’s  a  contradiction  in  that.  If 
they  have  it,  they  can  then  be  built.  The  whole  idea  was  that  you 
were going to help them have it. And in your testimony, your writ-
ten  testimony,  you  say  gasification  technology  holds  substantial 
promise as the best coal conversion technology option to utilize car-
bon capture technologies. 

So,  if  that’s  the  case,  why  has  the  Federal  Government  reduced 
its  commitment,  or  abandoned  its  commitment  to  IGCC  with  CCS 
by  dropping  the  FutureGen  project?  Isn’t  that  the  best  way  to  get 
everybody permitted and up and most rapidly bring this to conclu-
sion? 

Dr.  STRAKEY.  We  believe  that  by  changing  to  the  revised 
FutureGen  or  FutureGen  restructured—we  also  called  it  plan  B— 
then  we’ll  be  able  to  have  multiple  demonstrations,  and  they  will 
come  online  about  2  years  later.  But  they  will  finish  in  about  the 
same  time-frame,  maybe  a  little  bit  later,  but  that  will  lead  to  the 
next wave of commercial plants in a quicker manner. 

Senator KERRY. So, Mr. Mudd, what’s your reaction to that? Why 
do  you  believe  there’s  a  5-year  delay?  Obviously  you  disagree,  and 
what’s the downside? 

Mr. MUDD. Mr. Chairman, it takes a long time for the U.S. Gov-
ernment,  appropriately  so,  to  come  up  with  a  Request  for  Pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

posals,  to  receive  the  bids,  to  negotiate  the  contract,  and  then  to 
award the contract, and then to do the design and cost estimate for 
it.  And  then  there’s  also  a  program  rule  that  says  you  can  not 
begin procurement or the detailed design until you have met all the 
NEPA requirements, gotten the environmental impact statement. 

Typically, it takes 2 to 3 years at best to get the EIS. Now we’re 
very fortunate because of the phenomenal amount of work that was 
done  in  advance,  to  the  get  the  environmental  impact  statement— 
as a credit to the hard working employees of the Department of En-
ergy—to get that done in approximately 14 to 16 months. 

Now having said that, if we look at—right now you start with the 
new  program  today,  and  then  what  is  the  earliest—and  one  can 
ask the questions and conjecture—when’s the earliest that the bids 
would  come  in  to  the  Department  of  Energy,  what’s  the  earliest 
that  the  DOE  could  award  the  contracts,  and  then  do  the  prelimi-
nary  design,  and  then  do  the  EIS,  and  then,  at  that  point,  be  able 
to  procure  the  equipment  in  the  face  of  increasing  escalation  to 
these  prices,  with  the  expectation  that  the  cost  will  go  down?  I 
think these are some severe challenges that one would look at, and 
I believe that it would be 5 years, basically, before the DOE, before 
a participant would be in the position to even begin to procure the 
equipment, based on that. 

Senator KERRY. Dr. Strakey? 
Dr.  STRAKEY.  I  would  say  that  we  are  very  close  to  having  a  so-

licitation ready to go out on the street. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  how  about  how  long  does  it  take  once 

you’ve done that? 

Dr.  STRAKEY.  Mr.  Mudd  said  that  that  it  would  take  3  years  to 
do  the  NEPA  process,  and  I  think  we—in  working  through 
FutureGen—we  cut  that  time  in  half.  So,  I  think  that  our  esti-
mates  are  a  little  more  optimistic  about  when  the  plants  would 
come online than Mr. Mudd’s. 

Senator KERRY. Mr. Childress or Mr. Hawkins, anybody? 
Dr. STRAKEY. But it will be after the original date. 
Senator KERRY. Mr. Hawkins? 
Mr.  HAWKINS.  This  cancellation  or  restructuring  is  clearly  going 
to  result  in  a  delay.  I  think  the  proof  is  in  the  pudding.  It  took  5 
years to get from the announcement—— 

Senator KERRY. Do you agree there will be a delay, Dr. Strakey? 
Dr. STRAKEY. Yes. 
Senator KERRY. Why is that acceptable? 
Dr. STRAKEY. Because we think by having a multiple demonstra-
tions,  it  will  convince  the  commercial  sector  to  move  more  rapidly, 
and  that  they’ll  be  prepared  to  take  that  next  step  for  a  number 
of commercial plants faster. 

Senator KERRY. Mr. Hawkins? 
Mr.  HAWKINS.  Again,  if  we  enacted  bills  that  are  getting  serious 
consideration in Congress, we’ll have multiple demonstrations, and 
we  do  not  need  to  wait  for  a  new  set  of  authorizations,  a  new  set 
of appropriations, a new Administration. 

The  truth  is  that  this  restructuring  is  handing  it  off  to  the  next 
Administration.  This  Administration  is  not  going  to  do  anything, 
rather  than,  maybe  get  a  solicitation  out  the  door,  possibly  get 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

some  responses  to  that  solicitation  at  the  time  they’re  leaving  of-
fice. 

This doesn’t make any sense. We need a faster acting relief pack-

age. 

Senator KERRY. Well, we’ll come back to it. 
Senator Ensign? 
Senator ENSIGN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Obviously there’s a difference of opinion depending on where you 
sit. If we had unlimited funds, we would fund the FutureGen plant 
and fund the other ones that would be proving other technology at 
the  same  time,  moving  on  a  dual-track  process,  so  that  we  could 
have other commercial technologies come onboard. 

But  I  do  want  to  ask  you  this  question.  Because  of  the  different 
types of coal that we have in the United States, if you had just the 
one  FutureGen  plant,  wouldn’t  that  leave  out  half  of  the  United 
States, Mr. Mudd? 

Mr.  MUDD.  Senator  Ensign,  the  FutureGen  project  is  being  de-
signed to be able to address more than the eastern bituminous coal. 
We do recognize that there are efficiency and cost penalties associ-
ated with the other coals, and it’s an issue that absolutely must be 
solved. And the way the FutureGen has been designed is to be able 
to  address  those  penalties  associated  with  the  different  types  of 
coals and be able to test the different types of coals. 

With  respect  to  the  carbon  sequestration  itself,  while  there  are 
different  geologic  formations,  there  are  important  common  parts, 
including  the  liability,  the  permitting,  the  mineral  rights,  and  so 
on.  The  Alliance  spent  over  $1.5  million  of  both—of  the  project 
funds, both private funds and government funds, in addressing the 
legal  issues  associated  with  injecting  CO2.  It’s  not  a  trivial  matter 
to  identify  the  mineral  rights,  negotiate  them,  and  be  able  to  pre-
pare  to  inject  in  those  areas.  Those  are  common  regardless  of 
where you built it. 

Senator ENSIGN. Correct. 
Except,  Dr.  Strakey,  maybe  you  could  address  this.  The  western 
United  States  is  growing  rapidly  and  our  electricity  demands  are 
growing  rapidly  as  well.  My  home  State  and  Arizona  are  some  of 
the fastest growing states in the United States. 

With FutureGen and the significant problems that you have just 
identified,  Mr.  Mudd,  it  would  seem  to  me  that  if  we  need  power 
plants  in  the  future,  we’re  going  to  be  much  farther  behind  as  far 
as clean coal, carbon capture, and sequestration technologies in the 
West  than  the  East  would  be.  Because  of  that,  we  coulbe  be  at  a 
significant disadvantage. 

You  have  mentioned  some  of  the  commonalities,  but  there  are 
significant differences also in storage. Because we are not just look-
ing  at  how  you  can  store  it,  but  what  are  the  effects  of  storing  it. 
I  believe  we  must  study  this  over  several  years.  Isn’t  that  correct? 
Dr.  STRAKEY.  Yes,  that  is  correct.  And  one  of  the  things  we’re 
looking  at  in  the  Carbon  Sequestration  Regional  Partnerships,  is 
doing  some  large  volume  injection  tests  around  the  country  so  we 
get  some  idea  of  the  storage  capability  and  what  the  issues  are 
with different formations. 

I  would  also  add  that  there  is  an  advantage  having  multiple 
demonstrations,  operating  on  different  coals,  including  both  west-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

ern  and  eastern  coals,  because  whichever  gasifier  you  choose,  it’s 
really  going  to  be  optimized  for  one  particular  coal.  And  although 
you  can  test  different  coals  in  that  gasifier,  as  was  planned  in 
FutureGen  originally,  it’s  not  the  same  as  having  the  information 
on optimized gasifiers for each coal. 

Senator ENSIGN. If we were to go with what I mentioned, a dual- 
track  approach,  what  the  Administration  has  proposed,  as  well  as 
keeping  the  FutureGen  plant,  does  anybody  know  how  much  that 
would cost? Are we talking about doubling the cost or are we talk-
ing 21⁄2 times or 11⁄2 times? Does anybody have any idea? 

Dr.  STRAKEY.  Well,  our  estimate  for  the  restructured  FutureGen 
would be in the order of $300 to $600 million per project, of Federal 
funds. And I think the Federal funds in FutureGen original project 
is about $1.3 billion remaining. 

Senator ENSIGN. How much of that has already been spent? Has 

most of that already been spent on the FutureGen plant? 

Dr. STRAKEY. No, a very small amount—— 
Senator ENSIGN. OK. 
Dr. STRAKEY. We’re in the design stage. 
Senator ENSIGN. OK. 
Dr. STRAKEY. Very small. 
Mr.  MUDD.  To  date,  the  funds  have  been  about  $40  million  in 
in  private  money  on 

government  money  and  $10  million 
FutureGen. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  OK,  so  we  are  talking  approximately  double  if 
you are doing four or five of these demonstration projects. You are 
looking at probably doubling the amount of money then, correct? 

Dr. STRAKEY. We’re thinking, for the same $1.3 billion, we might 

get two to four additional demonstrations. 

Senator ENSIGN. OK. 
Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  That’s  all  the  questions  that  I  have. 
Senator KERRY. Thank you very much. 
Let  me  just  pin  down  a  few  things  here  and  then  we  can  hope-

fully wrap up. 

coal-fired power plants? 

Mr.  Hawkins,  what  level  of  capture  do  we  need  to  achieve  from 

Mr. HAWKINS. Well, over the long term, we really have to get as 
much  carbon  out  of  the  power  plants  as  possible.  Right  now  we 
think  that  it’s  feasible  to  do  85  to  90  percent.  Our  view  is  based 
on the history of things like SO2 scrubber technology, that as these 
systems  get  deployed,  they’ll  be  optimized  and  will  do  better  and 
better. 

And,  our  view  is  that  we  can  expect  to  have  commercially  oper-
ating  capture  systems  that  are  in  the  mid-90s  or  possible  even 
higher, but we won’t start there. We’re probably going to start, you 
know, with something less than that, but the important thing is to 
get  the  initial  ones  deployed,  get  the  operating  experience,  and 
then  allow  the  next  designs  to  build  on  that  operating  experience. 
Senator KERRY. Dr. Strakey, originally you had a 90 percent cap-

ture requirement on the Mattoon, correct? 

Dr. STRAKEY. That’s correct. 
Senator  KERRY.  Will  that  be  transferred  down  to  these  other  fa-

cilities? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

to go above 90. 

going below 90. 

the mitigation. 

Senator  KERRY.  I  agree,  which  is  why  I’m  wondering  why  we’re 

Dr. STRAKEY. Because it’s an economic—it’s better—— 
Senator  KERRY.  Economics  don’t  work  out  in  the  far  run  and  on 

74 

Dr.  STRAKEY.  We’re  still  considering  that.  In  the  public  com-
ments  that  we  had  on  the  draft  Request  for  Information,  there 
were quite a few comments that we should lower that and perhaps 
we may lower it. 

Senator  KERRY.  Why  would  you  lower  it,  given  the  increased 
science  and  the  fact  that  you’ve  already  imposed  that,  previously? 
Dr.  STRAKEY.  I  think  when  you  get  to  around  85  percent  or  in 
that  neighborhood,  for  certain  gasifiers,  especially  the  ones  that 
produce  a  little  bit  of  methane,  it’s  very  difficult  and  expensive  to 
get  from  85  to  90.  So,  there’s  some  kind  of  economic  breakpoint 
around there, but generally—— 

Senator  KERRY.  But  absent  some  indication  that  we  can  tolerate 

that additional percentage of emission, don’t we have to? 

Dr. STRAKEY. I’m sorry? 
Senator KERRY. Well, absent some indication that you can get by 
with 85 percent, don’t you have to set the 90 percent and don’t you 
have  to  meet  the  standard  that  science  tells  you  you’ve  got  to  re-
duce? 

Dr.  STRAKEY.  Well,  I  think  in  the  long  run,  you  may  even  have 

Dr. STRAKEY. I would also add one other important point. 
Senator  KERRY.  Let  me  just  finish  that,  though.  The  economics 
are  miserable  if  you’ve  got  to  move  millions  of  people  and  the  in-
surance  industry  walks  away  from  insuring  people,  and  shorelines 
change,  and  you’re  spawning  grounds  disappear,  and  vegetation 
migrates  north,  and  a  whole  bunch  of  other  things  happen.  You 
want to talk about costs, factor in the cost of not doing this. 

Dr. STRAKEY. I understand that. 
Senator KERRY. But are you really translating it into the policy? 
Dr. STRAKEY. I think you have options, also. If you build a plant 
that’s,  say,  85  to  90  percent  now,  to  increase  that  later,  either 
through  just  changes  to  the  process  itself  or  more  importantly, 
through  introduction  of  biomass  into  the  coal  gasification  plant 
itself. And in situations like that, some of our studies show you can 
go net-carbon negative. Now that’s relatively new, but that may be 
a  very  attractive  option  for  converting  some  of  these  plants  later 
on to even higher—— 

Senator  KERRY.  But  will  you  do  that  if  you  don’t  set  the  stand-
ard? It’s like kids with their homework, if you don’t tell them when 
it’s due, it doesn’t get done. 

Dr. STRAKEY. I’m not sure about that one, but we think that, you 
know, 85 percent is a heck of a lot better than what you have now 
and what a lot of people are considering. 

And by the way, the back-up, the default option here is, if we do 
nothing,  we’ll  be  burning  natural  gas  and  that  has  carbon  in  it. 
And  at  some  point,  we’re  going  to  have  to  take  that  out.  So  if  we 
shift  the  economy  to  heavier  reliance  on  natural  gas,  we’ll  pay  the 
price for that later. And it may be even worse. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

Senator  KERRY.  I’m  not  for  that.  I  don’t  disagree  with  you.  But 
as someone pointed out earlier, we don’t have the reserves and the 
demand  is  not  going  to  allow  that  to  happen  anyway.  You  look  at 
the  demand  curve  in  China  today,  let  alone  other  countries.  I 
mean, that’s a nonstarter. 

Dr. STRAKEY. I agree. 
Senator KERRY. Well—— 
Dr.  STRAKEY.  By  the  way,  we  have  not  actually  made  a  deter-
mination  of  what  the  level  would  be,  whether  it  would  be  80,  90, 
whatever. 

Senator KERRY. Well, I urge you, given the givens here, to really 
take  a  hard  look  at  the  facts  as  they’ve  been  laid  out  and  as  the 
scientists  have  laid  them  out  and  what  the  demand  is.  I  think  it 
would be a huge mistake to move backward on that standard, given 
the  unbelievable  amount  of  science  that  is  now  accruing.  Most  re-
cently  the  Arctic,  Antarctic  ice  break-off  and  what  we’re  seeing. 
Every  bit  of  feedback  there  is,  is  coming  back  faster  and  greater 
than  was  predicted.  Cautious  people,  it  seems  to  me,  would  take 
that evidence and process it appropriately. 

Mr. CHILDRESS. Senator, if I might add one item here. We’re get-
ting  very,  and  importantly  so,  focused  on  FutureGen  as  a  Federal 
program.  I  can  say  this  categorically,  I  know  of  no  publicly  an-
nounced  IGCC  in  the  United  States  that’s  prepared  to  move  for-
ward  with  CCS,  the  economics  are  not  there.  And  in  the  absence 
of  a  program—I  don’t  want  the  headlines  to  say  ‘‘Jim  Childress 
agrees  with  Dave  Hawkins  on  everything,’’  but  in  the  absence  of  a 
program  that  provides  regulatory  certainty,  and  addresses  liability 
issues, Mr. Hawkin’s cost sharing scheme may or may not work for 
anybody.  But  you’ve  got  to  have  some  way  to  cost  share  so  that 
those projects that are going to cost more, we know that, can move 
forward financially, can get the investors necessary to do it. 

In  the  absence  of  this,  what  we’re  seeing  is  a  cluster  of  gasifi-
cation  projects  on  the  Gulf  Coast.  It’s  the  industrial  gasification  I 
talked  about.  And,  it’s  for  chemicals,  for  fertilizers,  even  TXU, 
former TXU, now Illuminate, is looking at, has not announced pub-
licly,  some  potential  IGCCs,  but  they  have  a  carbon  sink,  which  is 
enhanced oil recovery, where you make money. Instead of spending 
money to put it in the ground, you’re going to make money. 

Just  a  couple  of  days  ago  a  project  was  announced  in  Louisiana, 
producing  substitute  natural  gas.  Denberry  Resources  has  com-
mitted to buy that CO2 for enhanced oil recovery, and they floated 
a  big  GO  Zone  Bond,  $1.1  billion  bond.  That  is  a  package  that 
makes sense, but it comes together because somebody will pay you 
for  the  CO2 and  it’s  not  an  added  cost  to  capture  it  and  put  it  in 
the ground. 

Senator  KERRY.  Mr.  Novak,  there  are  a  limited  number  of  IGCC 

plants with CCS I know, how many do you know of? 

Mr. NOVAK. IGCC with CCS? None. 
Senator KERRY. None at all. 
Mr.  NOVAK.  There  are  lots  of  gasification,  industrial  gasification 

plants that capture—— 

and CCS? 

Senator KERRY. The North Dakota one doesn’t include both IGCC 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

Mr. NOVAK. That’s a gas—industrial gasification facility that cap-

tures CO2 and produces—and pipes that CO2 to Canada. 

Senator  KERRY.  It  produces  it  for  use  in  enhanced  oil  recovery? 
Mr. NOVAK. That’s correct. 
Senator KERRY. It’s not, OK. 
Mr. NOVAK. It produces gas, it’s a gas—— 
Senator KERRY. Right, so it has capture of it, no storage. 
Mr. NOVAK. It has capture, but no power generation. 
Senator  KERRY.  Right.  Oh,  OK.  I  see,  and  the  combined  cycle 

component of it. 

Mr.  NOVAK.  Right.  And  it  ships  it  to  Canada  and  then  Canada 

pays it for the CO2. That’s—— 

Senator KERRY. Right. 
Mr. NOVAK.—that’s the economic difference. 
Senator KERRY. How many different locations are we using it for, 

Mr.  HAWKINS.  There  are  about  70  projects,  most  of  them  in  the 
United States, a few outside the United States, but we have a cou-
ple of—— 

Senator  KERRY.  We’ve  been  doing  that  for  a  long  time,  haven’t 

the EOR? 

we? 

ize that. 

Mr. HAWKINS. Yes, since the 1970s, and we’re currently injecting 
something on the order of 35 million tons of CO2 a year into these 
formations. Unfortunately, about 80 percent of that is pulled out of 
other natural CO2 reservoirs, so we’re not actually getting—— 

Senator KERRY. Right, I realize that. 
Mr. HAWKINS.—abatement. 
Senator  KERRY.  I  know  we’re  taking  it  from  natural  CO2,  I  real-

Mr.  HAWKINS.  But  we  do  have  lots  of  experience  with  massive 
amounts  of  geologic  CO2 injection,  not  quite  as  large  as  will  come 
out of a typical power plant, but large enough to demonstrate that 
we  know  how  to  handle  these  high  pressure  gases  in  very  large 
quantities, and do it safely. 

Mr.  NOVAK.  But  I  would  suggest  that  we  do  need  to  do  some 
tests in geologic formations, in these deep aquifers or saline forma-
tions  to  show  that  we  know  what  happens  to  that  CO2 when 
we—— 

Senator KERRY. Oh, sure we do. I couldn’t agree more and I testi-
fied recently, before the Energy Committee, because I have a regu-
latory protocol that we’ve put together that we need to get in place. 
People  have  got  to  know  what  the  standards  are  going  to  be, 
what’s the liability going to be, what are the rules going to be, how 
does  this  work?  We’ve  got  to  get  that  out  there.  I  think  that’s  ur-
gent. As urgent as anything else to encouraging people to know the 
rules  they’re  playing  by,  which  is  important  when  you’re  dealing 
with money. People are going to have to have a sense of that. 

Mr.  HAWKINS.  It  is  important  to  note  that  in  addition  to  the  en-
hanced  oil  recovery  activities,  we  have  a  couple  of  fairly  long-run-
ning projects that are injecting CO2 into these other types of forma-
tions.  One  under  the  North  Sea  that  began  in  1996,  it’s  under  the 
seabed in a—in a saline aquifer formation. And another one in Al-
geria  that  is  associated  with  a  gas  field,  but  it’s  not  used  for  en-
hanced oil recovery, it’s permanent storage. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

77 

Senator  KERRY.  Mr.  Novak,  do  you  have  any  sense  of  the  level 
and sort of structure that the the electro-power industry, might put 
into the deployment of CCS technology? 

Mr.  NOVAK.  Senator,  we’ve  done  an  analysis  that  looks  at,  if  we 
had  to  meet  a  future  climate  constraint,  and  we  put  one  into  a 
model,  and  we  put  in  cost  and  performance  data  for  the  alter-
natives,  for  energy  efficiency,  renewable,  coal  with  capture  and 
storage, nuclear power, natural gas, and a large portion of that fu-
ture  generation  would  come  from  CO2,  coal  with  CO2 capture  and 
storage,  and  nuclear.  Those  are  the  two  largest  ones,  based  on 
straight economics. 

Senator KERRY. What about if a cap and trade were to pass here, 
and we were to put that into effect. Would that speed up the appli-
cation of IGCC technology with CCS? 

Mr.  NOVAK.  Senator,  it  would  clearly  move  up—it  could  impact 
deployment  because  then  there’s  a  price  of  carbon.  You  don’t—you 
wouldn’t capture and store carbon unless there’s a reason to do so. 
There’s  no  economic  reason  to  capture  and  store  CO2.  You  either 
need  a  cap  that  puts  a  price  on  carbon,  a  carbon  tax  that  puts  a 
price on carbon, a mandate, or a tax credit, for example, that would 
make it economic for you to capture and store CO2. 

I  think  the  big  issue  in  timing,  Senator,  is  proving  storage.  It 
takes three to 5 years to build a facility, three to 5 years to inject, 
three  to  5  years  to  monitor.  We’ve  got  to  get  those  tests  underway 
and  done.  Unless  we  use  CO2—we  can  use  CO2 from  existing 
sources  and  maybe  move  that  storage  test  up  and  the  regional 
partnerships  are  doing  that.  But  we  need  to  get  these  large-scale 
demonstrations. 

We also need to build IGCC with capture and storage to show we 
can  capture  it  and  we  can  burn  hydrogen  at  full  scale  in  a  com-
bined-cycle turbine and reliably generate electricity. We need to do 
pulverized coal. 

Senator KERRY. How widespread is the storage? I mean, the stor-
age  concept?  Conceptually  we  know  it  works  already,  don’t  we?  As 
we just said, we’re taking natural storage centers and using them, 
so it’s been stored. And if we’re taking it out of there, I assume we 
can put it in there. 

Mr. MUDD. Senator Kerry, though, I want to underscore that you 
can look at any of the components of a plan—of carbon capture and 
sequestration,  and  the  gasification,  and  IGCC,  and  see  how  bits 
and  pieces  have  been  proven  throughout  the  world.  What  has  not 
been  done  is  the  total  integration  of  all  of  these  complex  systems. 
Senator  KERRY.  I  completely  agree  and  I  understand,  which  is 
why  I  introduced  the  legislation  to  get  a  commercial-scale  project 
out there. 

Here’s  the  way  I  see  it.  There  are  certain  saline  aquifers,  other 
areas  where  we  don’t  know  how  air  tight  it  is,  we  don’t  know 
whether  it’s  going  to  leak,  et  cetera.  There  are  some  places  where 
you’ve  obviously  got  to  test  it.  But  in  theory  and  in  principal,  we 
know  that  there  are  existing  caverns  or  cisterns  where,  for  years, 
something  was  contained  in  there,  in  a  non-releasable  form,  until 
we drilled in and opened it up. 

Mr.  NOVAK.  I  think  the  work  that’s  done  under  the  Department 
of Energy Regional Partnerships work has done an atlas of geologic 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

storage  formation.  They  look  like  they—they  appear  to  be  wide-
spread  throughout  the  U.S.,  not  in  every  State,  but  a  lot  of  poten-
tial capacity. The phrase, ‘‘We are the Saudi Arabia of coal, we are 
the  Saudi  Arabia  of  storage  capacity  in  the  world.’’  We  have 
enough, I think, as one of the other witnesses testified, but we need 
to do some site-specific tests for those geologic formations, in those 
regions to make sure that it’s sound and it’s suitable—— 

Senator KERRY. Right, I understand. 
Mr. NOVAK.—and do the tests. 
Senator KERRY. I understand that. 
When  you  talked  about  a  zero  emission  or  a  net  negative  emis-
sion, is that only achievable factoring in the storage? Could you do 
that without storage? 

Dr. STRAKEY. No, storage is an essential part of that. 
Senator  KERRY.  It’s  critical.  There’s  no  other  theory  about  how 

you take the CO2 and dispose—— 

Dr. STRAKEY. That’s right. Essentially, with this extra increment, 
you’re  capturing  CO2 from  the  atmosphere  and  storing  it  geologi-
cally through—— 

Senator  KERRY.  So  what’s  the  best  estimate,  from  a  policy  point 
of  view,  as  to  how  much  CO2,  and  for  how  long  can  we  do  that? 
I mean, there are limits ultimately to how much you’re going to be 
able  to  capture.  Is  this  geared  to  the  ultimate  weaning  of  fossil 
fuels altogether? Or is it geared as some earlier date, in effect, be-
cause  of  the  limits  on  storage  itself?  How  long  do  we  get  the  eco-
nomic benefit of this, and does that amortize out adequately? 

Mr. CHILDRESS. The DOE puts a range of 200 to 500 years given 
current  generating  capacity  in  the  U.S.  And  importantly,  most  of 
that, 90 plus percent of that, is saline aquifers. Enhanced oil recov-
ery is the low-hanging fruit today, that’s why everybody’s being at-
tracted  to  that.  But  the  silver  bullet  is  saline  aquifers,  which  is 
why,  personal  opinion,  we  certainly  need  one  or  more  IGCCs  with 
CCS injecting into saline aquifers. 

Dr. STRAKEY. Senator Kerry? 
Senator KERRY. Yes, sir. 
Dr.  STRAKEY.  If  I  could  add  to  that.  Our  estimate  for  storage  in 
saline  aquifers,  the  upper  estimate  was  on  the  order  of  500  years. 
For enhanced oil recovery there’s capacity for about 83 gigatons. At 
current  emissions  from  North  America,  that  would  be  about  12 
years. 

Mr. HAWKINS. Senator, if I might just add our own view. Capac-
ity  is  not  the  constraint,  there  is  adequate  capacity.  Technology  is 
not  the  constraint,  nor  is  understanding  of  feasibility  the  con-
straint. Both the IPCC and the MIT study concluded that we know 
enough  about  the  geology  of  these  formations  to  safely  store  mil-
lions of tons a year in individual projects. 

What the demonstrations will accomplish is getting hands-on ex-
perience out of the oil industry and into the power sector industry. 
The oil industry knows how to do this stuff. The oil industry under-
stands  the  geology.  This  is  not  a  question  of  sort  of  experimenting 
and  sticking  a  well  in  somewhere  and  saying,  ‘‘Well  gee,  now  we’ll 
see whether it works or not.’’ When that well is drilled, the compa-
nies that operate it will know the CO2 is not going to leak out. The 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

pathways  that  are  the  most  risky  are  other  wells  that  have  been 
drilled  into  the  formation  because  they  form  a  potential  pathway. 
So,  the  understanding  is  very  clear.  What  the  industry  will  do 
before going into a formation is they’ll do a survey, they’ll find that 
the  cap  rock  is  thick,  they  will  survey  the  cap  rock  to  make  sure 
that  there  are  no  natural  fractures  or  faults  that  could  be  a  path-
way, and then they will survey the location of any wells, and evalu-
ate the integrity of the cement to make sure that it can not become 
a  pathway.  This  is  well  understood  as  to  what  needs  to  be  done. 
So, this is not a matter of guesswork. 

Senator KERRY. So, what in your judgment, what’s the delay fac-
tor  here,  in  your  judgment,  Mr.  Hawkins?  Why  aren’t  we  moving 
full speed ahead? 

Mr.  HAWKINS.  Well,  we  have  frankly  been  schizophrenic  about 
the need to attack the global warming problem and we are now ap-
proaching the point where the U.S. is about to get serious in doing 
it.  And,  I  think,  you  know,  frankly,  the  industry  has  been  schizo-
phrenic as well, and all of that has lead to delay. 

But,  I—Senator  Ensign  asked  the  question  about  how  much 
would  it  cost  to  do  a  couple  of  these  projects,  and  the  answer  was 
it, you know, might take $2 billion. 

But  to  put  that  in  perspective,  the  kind  of  policies  to  cap  and 
trade  carbon  dioxide  emissions  that  are  being  discussed,  will  gen-
erate enormous amounts of resources that can be deployed to accel-
erate the deployment of this kind of technology. 

For  example,  in  the  Lieberman-Warner  bill,  there  is  a  provision 
that provides subsidies for going ahead quickly with carbon capture 
and storage, and the funds in that provision alone are on the order 
of $3 to $5 billion a year for 10 years. 

Senator  KERRY.  It’s  a  big  pot.  Well,  we’re  trying  to  win  some 

Mr.  Childress,  what—you  emphasized  the  need  to  develop  these 
plants.  What  do  you  think  would  be  the  best  support  structure, 
how could we most rapidly accelerate this effort? 

Mr.  CHILDRESS.  The  first  thing  that  industry  needs  is  predict-
ability in public policy. The investment community needs the same 
thing. They have to know that there are rules out there and if they 
follow  those  rules  and  make  a  prudent  investment,  they  will  get  a 
return. 

Now,  we  don’t  have  a  price  on  carbon,  it  gets  down  to  some  sort 
of  cost-sharing  to  get  the  first  adopters  in  place.  And  it  has  to  do 
with legal issues such as liability. Once you put that—— 

Senator  KERRY.  You  would  concur  that  cap-and-trade,  in  effect, 

votes. 

is a pricing of carbon? 

Mr.  CHILDRESS.  I  will  say  whatever  puts  a  price  on  carbon,  and 
if that price is such that it will convince investors, if they build an 
IGCC or and SNG plant with CCS; and, they will get a return, that 
will work. 

Senator KERRY. Understood. 
Well,  this  has  been  very  helpful  and  I  appreciate  the  creation  of 
this  record.  Is  there  anything  anybody  feels  they  wanted  to  say 
that they haven’t had a chance to? It’s a wise panel. 

[Laughter.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

Senator KERRY. So I’m going to leave the record open for 2 weeks 
in  case  any  of  our  colleagues  want  to  submit  any  question  to  you 
in  writing.  And  I’m  very,  very  appreciative  to  you  for  taking  time 
to come here today, helping us formulate this. We’ve got a long way 
to  go  and  we’ve  a  very  short  time  to  do  it,  this  has  been  helpful. 
Thank you. 

We stand adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 4:08 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 
Mr. Chairman, thank you for holding this hearing today on coal gasification. 
In  the  United  States  alone,  coal-fired  power  plants  satisfy  more  than  half  of  the 
Nation’s  energy  needs  and  this  percentage  is  likely  to  increase  in  the  future.  Coal 
is  both  abundant,  inexpensive,  and  represents  one  of  our  most  important  natural 
resources. 

It  is  a  stable  commodity  and  a  key  component  in  satisfying  the  United  States’ 
growing  energy  demands.  Coal  production  is  an  important  element  to  our  national 
security. Without it, we would be increasingly reliant on unstable or unfriendly na-
tions for our energy needs. 

Continued  reliance  on  imported  energy  from  volatile  regions  of  the  world  is  not 
a  solution.  We  must  increase  our  domestic  production  in  order  to  remain  globally 
competitive and we must do so in an environmentally responsible manner. 

New  technologies  to  make  this  possible  are  on  the  horizon.  Carbon  capture  and 
sequestration is just one of many processes already in development. Groundbreaking 
research is being conducted to develop new ways to burn coal in order to maximize 
energy yield and employ cleaner and more efficient processes. 

One  of  these  processes  is  the  Integrated  Gasification  Combined  Cycle  or  IGCC. 
The  IGCC  process  is  a  promising  new  technology,  which  has  the  potential  to  in-
crease efficiency by 40 percent. 

However,  I  understand  that  this  process  is  not  conducive  to  all  regions  because 
of  its  limitations  on  the  type  of  coal,  which  can  be  used.  Solutions  must  be  found 
that  will  accommodate  the  local  needs  and  we  must  continue  to  research  and  de-
velop other methods. 

I  believe  that  in  order  to  reduce  our  impact  on  the  environment  while  still  pro-
viding the energy necessary to fuel our economy, we must take steps to find a tech-
nological  solution  and  make  clean  coal  a  reality.  This  is  why  I  am  a  cosponsor  of 
Senator  Kerry’s  clean  coal  demonstration  bill.  S.  2323  would  require  the  Secretary 
of  Energy  to  establish  a  competitive  grant  program  to  provide  assistance  for  com-
mercial  demonstration  projects  for  the  capture  and  sequestration  of  carbon  emis-
sions from coal-fired power plants. 

As  we  move  into  the  future,  many  different  types  of  energy  technology  must  be 
used  in  order  for  this  Nation  to  remain  competitive  and  secure.  Coal  will  continue 
to be the backbone of our Nation’s energy supply, and we must develop ways to use 
it in an efficient and clean manner. 

I look forward to hearing today’s testimony. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

DR. JOSEPH P. STRAKEY, JR. 

Question.  Could  you  please  provide  clarification  on  the  analysis  you  mentioned 
during  oral  testimony  in  regards  to  the  cost  of  implementing  CCS  nationwide  by 
2030. 

Answer.  National  Energy  Technology  Laboratory  (NETL)  examined  a  United 
States policy scenario that applied a tax of $30 per metric ton of carbon dioxide from 
2015  to  2030.  Projections  were  based  upon  cost  and  performance  assumptions  con-
sistent  with  the  U.S.  Energy  Information  Administration’s  2007  Annual  Energy 
Outlook.  Cost  and  performance  for  retrofitting  the  existing  fleet  of  pulverized  coal 
(PC) power plants was based on a recent NETL study (Carbon Dioxide Capture from 
Existing Coal-Fired Power Plants, DOE/NETL–401/110907, revised November 2007). 
The analysis projected that 40 gigawatts (GW) of new advanced coal-fueled power 
plant  capacity  would  be  deployed  with  carbon  capture  and  sequestration  (CCS).  It 
also projected that 100 GW of existing PC net power plant capacity would be retro-
fitted  for  CCS  through  2030.  However,  the  parasitic  energy  consumed  by  the  CCS 

(81) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

equipment would reduce the total net output of these plants to 70 GW (a reduction 
of 30 GW-net). 

The cost of constructing 40 GW of new coal-fueled power plant capacity with CCS 
is  estimated  to  be  $140  billion  (2007-year  dollars),  including  owner’s  costs  but  ex-
cluding  allowance  for  funds  used  during  construction.  Twenty-eight  percent,  or  $40 
billion,  of  the  total  construction  cost  is  attributable  to  adding  CCS.  This  estimate 
assumes  that  the  new  advanced  coal  plants  are  Integrated  Gasification  Combined 
Cycle  (IGCC)  plants  with  a  capital  cost  of  $3,500/kilowatt  (kW),  of  which  $970/kW 
is  attributable  to  CCS.  (If  CCS  was  not  applied  to  the  40  GW  of  new  IGCC  power 
plants, their net capacity would be increased by 15 percent, or 6 GW.) 

The  ‘‘overnight’’  cost  of  retrofitting  100  GW  of  PC  power  plant  capacity  for  CCS 
is estimated to be $95 billion (2007-year dollars). Retrofit costs ($955/kW of pre-ret-
rofit  capacity)  were  escalated  from  July–2006  dollars  to  October–2007  dollars  using 
Chemical  Engineering’s  Plant  Cost  Index.  If  the  resulting  reduction  in  capacity  (30 
GW-net)  was  replaced  by  new  IGCC  plants  with  CCS,  the  replacement  cost  would 
be $105 billion. 

The total cost of CCS for both the new and retrofitted capacity would be $240 bil-
lion (2007-year dollars). The avoided carbon dioxide emissions for the 40 GW of new 
IGCC amounts to approximately 189 million metric tons/yr; for the 100 GW of retro-
fitted PC plants, the avoided CO2 amounts to approximately 550 million metric tons 
per  year  (including  the  CO2 emitted  by  the  30  GW  of  IGCC  replacement  power 
equipped with CCS). 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:10 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074322 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\74322.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

